The differential regulation of human telomerase reverse transcriptase and vascular endothelial growth factor may contribute to the clinically more aggressive behavior of p63-positive breast carcinomas. 
 
p63, a p53 homologue, is a myoepithelial cell marker in the normal mammary gland but p63-positive neoplastic cells may be found in up to 11% of invasive breast carcinomas. This study aims to verify the relationship between p63 expression and several clinicopathological features and tumor markers of clinical significance in breast pathology including key regulators of the cell cycle, oncogenes, apoptosis-related proteins, metalloproteinases and their inhibitors. Immunohistochemistry with 27 primary antibodies was performed in 100 formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded samples of invasive ductal carcinomas. p63-positive cells were found in 16% of carcinomas. p63-positive carcinomas were poorly differentiated, hormone receptor-negative neoplasms with a high proliferation rate. p63 also correlated with advanced pathological stage, tumor size, and the expression of human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT), tissue inhibitor of matrix metalloproteinase 1 (TIMP1) and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF). The expression of TIMP1 suggests that the anti-proteolytic stimuli may be preponderant in p63-positive carcinomas. hTERT activity is associated with nodal metastases and cellular proliferation. VEGF regulates angiogenesis, which is also a fundamental event in the process of tumor growth and metastatic dissemination. Thus, the differential regulation of hTERT and VEGF in p63-positive breast carcinomas may contribute to the clinically more aggressive behavior of these neoplasms. 
Metronomic 5-fluorouracil, oxaliplatin and irinotecan in colorectal cancer. 
 
Metronomic chemotherapy (the frequent, long term, low dose administration of chemotherapeutic drugs) is a promising therapy because it enhances the anti-endothelial activity of conventional chemotherapeutics, but with lower or no toxic effects compared to maximum tolerated dose administration. The aims of the present study were to compare, in vitro and in vivo, the antiangiogenic and antitumor activities of metronomic irinotecan (CPT-11), oxaliplatin (L-OHP) and 5-fluorouracil (5-FU) in colorectal cancer and to investigate the metronomic combination of these drugs. In vitro cell proliferation, combination studies and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) secretion analyses were performed on endothelial (HMVEC-d) and colorectal cancer (HT-29) cells exposed for 144 h to metronomic concentrations of SN-38, the active metabolite of CPT-11, L-OHP and 5-FU. HT-29 human colorectal cancer xenograft model was used and tumour growth, microvessel density and VEGF quantification were performed in tumours after the administration of metronomic CPT-11, L-OHP, 5-FU and their simultaneous combination. Low concentrations of SN-38, but not 5-FU and L-OHP, preferentially inhibited endothelial cell proliferation. Simultaneous and continuous exposure of HT-29 and HMVEC-d cells to low concentrations SN-38+L-OHP+5-FU for 144 h showed a strong antagonism and an unfavorable dose-reduction index. Moreover, the ternary combination resulted in a significant increase of VEGF secretion in HT-29 cancer cells. In a xenograft model metronomic CPT-11, but not 5-FU and L-OHP, significantly inhibits HT-29 tumor growth and microvessel density in the absence of toxicity. On the contrary, metronomic 5-FU+L-OHP+CPT-11 therapy did not affect the microvascular count. The metronomic concept might not universally apply to every cytotoxic drug in colorectal cancer and metronomic combination regimens should be used with caution. 
Current prospects for controlling cancer growth with non-cytotoxic agents--nutrients, phytochemicals, herbal extracts, and available drugs. 
 
In animal or cell culture studies, the growth and spread of cancer can be slowed by many nutrients, food factors, herbal extracts, and well-tolerated, available drugs that are still rarely used in the clinical management of cancer, in part because they seem unlikely to constitute definitive therapies in themselves. However, it is reasonable to expect that mechanistically complementary combinations of these measures could have a worthwhile impact on survival times and, when used as adjuvants, could improve the cure rates achievable with standard therapies. The therapeutic options available in this regard include measures that: down-regulate serum free IGF-I; suppress the synthesis of mevalonic acid and/or certain derivatives thereof; modulate arachidonate metabolism by inhibiting 5-lipoxygenase, 12-lipoxygenase, or COX-2; antagonize the activation of AP-1 transcription factors; promote the activation of PPAR-gamma transcription factors; and that suppress angiogenesis by additional mechanisms. Many of these measures appear suitable for use in cancer prevention. 
Thalidomide and angiostatin inhibit tumor growth in a murine xenograft model of human cervical cancer. 
 
OBJECTIVE: To determine the impact of thalidomide and angiostatin on tumor growth, angiogenesis, and apoptosis in a xenograft model of cervical cancer. METHODS: Human umbilical endothelial cells were treated with angiostatin or thalidomide and bFGF-induced proliferation was assessed with the MTT assay. Human cervical cancer cells (CaSki and SiHa) were injected into the flanks of nude mice. After tumors developed, mice were treated with angiostatin 20 mg/kg/day or thalidomide 200 mg/kg/day for 30 days. Fractional tumor growth was determined and immunohistochemical analysis of tumors was used to determine degree of angiogenesis. TUNEL assay was used to assess apoptosis. RESULTS: Angiostatin inhibited endothelial cell proliferation by 50-60%. Thalidomide had no direct effect on endothelial cells. Angiostatin and thalidomide both inhibited tumor growth by about 55%. We found no additive or synergistic effect when the two agents were combined. Both agents inhibited angiogenesis and induced apoptosis when compared to tumors from control animals. CONCLUSIONS: Angiostatin and thalidomide inhibit tumor growth, angiogenesis, and induce apoptosis in this xenograft model of cervical cancer. 
Bevacizumab and irinotecan therapy in glioblastoma multiforme: a series of 13 cases. 
 
OBJECT: Endothelial proliferation has been recognized as a marker of high-grade or aggressive glioma. Bevacizumab is a humanized immunoglobulin G1 monoclonal antibody to vascular endothelial growth factor that has been shown to have activity in malignant gliomas when combined with irinotecan. The authors report on a case series of 13 patients with recurrent heavily pretreated malignant glioma that was treated with the combination of bevacizumab and irinotecan. METHODS: Standard therapy with primary resection followed by adjuvant chemotherapy and radiation had failed in all patients. The median number of therapies applied, including initial surgery, was 5 (range 3-7 therapies). Nine patients were started on bevacizumab at a dose of 5 mg/m2 every 2 weeks. Four patients received bevacizumab at a dose of 10 mg/m2; irinotecan was given at a dose of 125 mg/m2 every week for 3 weeks. RESULTS: Of the 13 treated patients, 10 (77%) had a radiologically demonstrated partial response and 3 (23%) had stable disease. Six patients (46%) had a clinical response. The median time to disease progression while on treatment was 24 weeks. The median overall survival was 27 weeks. The disease progressed in 8 patients, despite an initial response. Five patients are still responding to therapy. Six of the 8 patients whose disease progressed have died. Bevacizumab was discontinued in 2 patients because of nonfatal intracranial bleeding. CONCLUSIONS: The combination of bevacizumab and irinotecan is safe and has excellent activity even in this relapsed, heavily pretreated population of patients with high-grade malignant glioma, most of whom would not be candidates for clinical trials. 
Caffeine inhibits adenosine induced accumulation of hypoxia-inducible factor-1alpha, vascular endothelial growth factor, and interleukin-8 expression in hypoxic human colon cancer cells. 
 
Frequent coffee consumption has been associated with a reduced risk of colorectal cancer in a number of case-control studies. Coffee is a leading source of methylxanthines, such as caffeine. The induction of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and interleukin-8 (IL-8) is an essential feature of tumor angiogenesis, and the hypoxia-inducible factor-1 (HIF-1) transcription factor is known to be a key regulator of this process. In this study, we investigated the effects of caffeine on HIF-1 protein accumulation and on VEGF and IL-8 expression in the human colon cancer cell line HT29 under hypoxic conditions. Our results show that caffeine significantly inhibits adenosine induced HIF-1alpha protein accumulation in cancer cells. We show that HIF-1alpha and VEGF are increased through A3 adenosine receptor stimulation, whereas the effects on IL-8 are mediated via the A2B subtype. Pretreatment of cells with caffeine significantly reduces adenosine induced VEGF promoter activity and VEGF and IL-8 expression. The mechanism of caffeine seems to involve the inhibition of the extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1/2 (ERK1/2), p38, and Akt, leading to a marked decrease in adenosine induced HIF-1alpha accumulation, VEGF transcriptional activation, and VEGF and IL-8 protein accumulation. From a functional perspective, we observe that caffeine also significantly inhibits the A3 receptor-stimulated cell migration of colon cancer cells. Conditioned media prepared from colon cells treated with an adenosine analog increased human umbilical vein endothelial cell migration. These data provide evidence that adenosine could modulate the migration of colon cancer cells by an HIF-1alpha/VEGF/IL-8 dependent mechanism and that caffeine has the potential to inhibit colon cancer cell growth. 
Mast cells and tumors. The specific enhancement of tumor proliferation in vitro. 
 
Mast cells were found to be unique among the peritoneal leukocytes by virtue of their capacity to enhance profoundly the proliferation of a variety of tumors in vitro. This phenomenon occurs at mast cell/tumor ratios which reflect the stoichiometry of host cell/tumor relationships in vivo. The growth factor was found to reside in mast cell granules and was identified as heparin by sequential purification and enzymatic degradation. This cellular interaction was tumor-specific, although isolated granules could enhance fibroblast proliferation. The findings are discussed in relation to previous morphologic studies, reports of in vitro mast-cell mediated tumor cytotoxicity, and the role of mast cells in angiogenesis and connective tissue proliferation. 
Research advances of endostatin and its short internal fragments. 
 
Endostatin, the C-terminal fragment of collagen XVIII, is a potent angiogenesis inhibitor. At present, there are a large number of research papers on endostatin. However, the action mechanism of endostatin is still a matter of ongoing discussion. The objective of this review is to elucidate its origin and elementary structure, and to discuss its structure basis of activity and action mechanisms based on the latest research. Furthermore some published studies reporting the anti angiogenic effects of endostatin-derived peptides were also reviewed. It is proposed that the amino acid sequence of endostatin contains both angiosuppressive and angiostimulatory domains. Short endostatin fragments may be exploited as a new angiogenesis inhibitor for therapeutic applications, in substitution of the full length endostatin. These studies on endostatin fragments also shed light on our understanding of the molecular action mechanisms of endostatin. 
Characterization of the metabolic changes underlying growth factor angiogenic activation: identification of new potential therapeutic targets. 
 
Angiogenesis is a fundamental process to normal and abnormal tissue growth and repair, which consists of recruiting endothelial cells toward an angiogenic stimulus. The cells subsequently proliferate and differentiate to form endothelial tubes and capillary-like structures. Little is known about the metabolic adaptation of endothelial cells through such a transformation. We studied the metabolic changes of endothelial cell activation by growth factors using human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVECs), [1,2-(13)C(2)]-glucose and mass isotopomer distribution analysis. The metabolism of [1,2-(13)C(2)]-glucose by HUVEC allows us to trace many of the main glucose metabolic pathways, including glycogen synthesis, the pentose cycle and the glycolytic pathways. So we established that these pathways were crucial to endothelial cell proliferation under vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and fibroblast growth factor (FGF) stimulation. A specific VEGF receptor-2 inhibitor demonstrated the importance of glycogen metabolism and pentose cycle pathway. Furthermore, we showed that glycogen was depleted in a low glucose medium, but conserved under hypoxic conditions. Finally, we demonstrated that direct inhibition of key enzymes to glycogen metabolism and pentose phosphate pathways reduced HUVEC viability and migration. In this regard, inhibitors of these pathways have been shown to be effective antitumoral agents. To sum up, our data suggest that the inhibition of metabolic pathways offers a novel and powerful therapeutic approach, which simultaneously inhibits tumor cell proliferation and tumor induced angiogenesis. 
VEGF-targeted therapy: therapeutic potential and recent advances. 
 
After over 30 years of theorizing, the use of angiogenesis inhibitors as anticancer therapy has finally moved from the realm of research to reality. Normal adult vasculature is generally quiescent in nature, with endothelial cells dividing approximately every 10 years. In contrast, the growth of tumors requires constant vascular growth and remodeling in order for solid tumors to grow beyond 1-2 mm(3) in size. Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its receptors are key regulators of the process of angiogenesis, which makes them attractive therapeutic targets. A multitude of VEGF-targeted inhibitory agents are currently being investigated for the treatment of cancer. This review article focuses on recent developments in the use of angiogenesis inhibitors for the treatment of breast, lung, and colorectal cancers. 
Prognostic value of p53 protein expression and vascular endothelial growth factor expression in resected squamous cell carcinoma of the esophagus. 
 
The most common genetic alterations found in a wide variety of cancers are p53 tumor suppressor gene mutations. p53 appears to be a nuclear transcription factor that plays a role in the control of cell proliferation, apoptosis, and the maintenance of genetic stability. Angiogenesis is a critical process in solid tumor growth and metastasis. Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), a recently identified growth factor with significant angiogenic properties, may be a major tumor angiogenesis regulator. Few studies have investigated the association between p53 and VEGF expressions and prognosis in esophageal carcinoma. Forty-seven specimens resected from patients with stage II and III squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) of the esophagus were studied using immunohistochemical staining. VEGF and p53 expressions were observed in 40% and 53% of the tumors, respectively. The p53 and VEGF staining statuses were coincident in only 21% of the tumors, and no significant correlation was found between p53 and VEGF statuses. No clinicopathologic factors were significantly correlated with p53 or VEGF expression. No significant association between p53 and VEGF expressions and poor prognosis was found. In conclusion, p53 and VEGF were not correlated with prognosis in patients with stage II and III SCC of the esophagus. 
Novel biological agents for the treatment of hormone-refractory prostate cancer (HRPC). 
 
Hormone-refractory prostate cancer (HRPC) is an inevitable evolution of prostate carcinogenesis, through which the normal dependence on hormones for growth and survival is bypassed. Although advances in terms of symptoms palliation and quality of life improvement have been addressed with current treatment options, innovative approaches are needed to improve survival rates. A thorough understanding of HRPC-associated molecular pathways and mechanisms of resistance are a prerequisite for novel potential therapeutic interventions. Preclinical and early clinical studies are ongoing to evaluate new therapies that target specific molecular entities. Agents under development include growth factor receptor inhibitors, small molecules targeting signal transduction pathways, apoptosis and cell-cycle regulators, angiogenesis and metastasis inhibitors, differentiation agents, telomerase inactivators, and epigenetic therapeutics. Incorporation of these agents into existing treatment regimens will guide us in the development of a multidisciplinary treatment strategy of HRPC. This article critically reviews published data on new biological agents that are being tested in HRPC clinical trials, highlights ongoing research and considers the future perspectives of this new class of agents. 
High-Dose celecoxib and metronomic "low-dose" cyclophosphamide is an effective and safe therapy in patients with relapsed and refractory aggressive histology non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. 
 
PURPOSE: Angiogenesis is increased in aggressive histology non-Hodgkin's lymphoma and may be a target with selective cyclooxygenase-2 inhibition and metronomic chemotherapy. EXPERIMENTAL DESIGN: We assessed response, toxicity, and biomarkers of angiogenesis to low-dose cyclophosphamide (50 mg p.o. o.d.) and high-dose celecoxib (400 mg p.o. b.i.d.) in adult patients with relapsed or refractory aggressive non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in a multicenter phase II prospective study. RESULTS: Thirty-two of 35 patients (median age, 62 years) are evaluable for response. Patients had primarily relapsed diffuse large B-cell lymphoma (63%) were heavily pretreated (median of three regimens) and high risk (79% international prognostic index,  greater than or=2) and 34% were relapsed after autologous stem cell transplant. With a median follow-up of 8.4 months, the overall best response rate is 37% (2 complete clinical response/complete clinical response unconfirmed and 9 partial response), with 22% achieving stable disease. Median overall and progression-free survivals are 14.4 and 4.7 months, respectively. The median response duration was 8.2 months. The most common toxicity was skin rash (40%); myelosuppression and gastrointestinal side effects were uncommon. Three patients developed deep vein thromboses and two heavily pretreated patients developed treatment related acute myelogenous leukemia or myelodysplasia after 3.7 and 12 months of therapy. Circulating endothelial cells and their precursors declined and remained low in responders, whereas plasma vascular endothelial growth factor trended to decline in responding patients but increase in nonresponders. Trough celecoxib levels achieved targeted anti angiogenic  levels. CONCLUSIONS: Low-dose cyclophosphamide and high-dose celecoxib is well tolerated and active in pretreated aggressive non-Hodgkin's lymphoma. Close surveillance for arterial and venous thrombotic events is recommended. The decline in circulating endothelial cells and their precursors suggests that this combination may be working by inhibiting angiogenesis but should be validated in a larger patient sample. 
Effects of doxycycline on in vitro growth, migration, and gelatinase activity of breast carcinoma cells. 
 
Metastatic disease is one of the major causes of death from cancer in human beings. Several enzyme systems have been implicated in the metastatic process, but the metalloproteinases (MPs) appear to be the major group involved in most instances of neoplastic invasion. Increased MP activity has been correlated with the metastatic potential of many cancers, including breast cancer. MPs also play a role in tumor angiogenesis. Tetracyclines are antimicrobial agents that can suppress MP activity in a variety of tissues, including gingiva, bone, and cartilage. Several reports have indicated that tetracyclines can suppress tumor MPs as well. A synthetic tetracycline, doxycycline, inhibits migration of human MDA-MB-435 breast adenocarcinoma cells through a reconstituted basement membrane (Matrigel), an assay used as an in vitro surrogate for the in vivo process of tumor invasion through basement membranes. Additionally, doxycycline diminishes the proliferation of this breast cancer cell line and also decreases its gelatinolytic activity, as determined by gel zymography. 
Activation of vascular endothelial growth factor through reactive oxygen species mediates 20-hydroxyeicosatetraenoic acid induced endothelial cell proliferation. 
 
20-Hydroxyeicosatetraenoic acid (20-HETE) is formed by the omega-hydroxylation of arachidonic acid by cytochrome P450 4A and 4F enzymes, and it induces angiogenic responses in vivo. To test the hypothesis that 20-HETE increases endothelial cell (EC) proliferation via vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), we studied the effects of WIT003 [20-hydroxyeicosa-5(Z),14(Z)-dienoic acid], a 20-HETE analog on human macrovascular or microvascular EC. WIT003, as well as pure 20-HETE, stimulated EC proliferation by approximately 40%. These proliferative effects were accompanied by increased VEGF expression and release that were observed as early as 4 h after 20-HETE agonist addition. This was accompanied by increased phosphorylation of the VEGF receptor 2. The proliferative effects of 20-HETE were markedly inhibited by a VEGF-neutralizing antibody. Polyethylene glycol-superoxide dismutase (PEG-SOD) markedly inhibited both the increases in VEGF expression and the proliferative effects of 20-HETE. In contrast, administration of the NAD(P)H oxidase inhibitor apocynin had no effect to the proliferative response to 20-HETE. The 20-HETE agonist markedly increased superoxide formation as reflected by an increase in dihydroethidium staining of EC, and this increase was inhibited by PEG-SOD but not by apocynin. 20-HETE also increased the phosphorylation of p42/p44 mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) in EC, whereas an inhibitor of MAPK [U0126, 1,4-diamino-2,3-dicyano-1,4-bis(2-aminophenylthio)butadiene] suppressed the proliferative and the VEGF changes but not the pro-oxidant effects of 20-HETE. These data suggest that 20-HETE stimulates superoxide formation by pathways other than apocynin-sensitive NAD(P)H oxidase, thereby activating MAPK and then enhancing VEGF synthesis that drives EC proliferation. Thus, 20-HETE may be involved in the regulation of EC functions, such as angiogenesis. 
[Photodynamic therapy in severe chronic central serous chorioretinopaty] 
 
OBJECTIVE: To determine the efficacy of Photodynamic Therapy (PDT) in chronic Central Serous Chorioretinopathy (CSC). METHODS: Patients diagnosed with chronic CSC, with clinical evidence of activity and treated with Photodynamic Therapy, are included in this report. All were assessed by a complete ophthalmological examination, including assessment of the best corrected visual acuity (BCVA) using an ETDRS chart, fluorescein and indocyanine angiography and optical coherence tomography (OCT). The main objective of the study was to determine the mean visual acuity change. RESULTS: 11 eyes of 11 patients were included in the study, which had a mean follow-up period of 11 months. The mean BCVA increased from 20/76 to 20/64. 35% of eyes improved their BCVA by 2 lines or more, 45% remained stable and 18% lost 2 lines or more. Choroidal hyperpermeability was reduced in every case. Neurosensorial retinal detachment decreased in 80% of cases. Only one eye received a second PDT treatment due to choroidal neovascularization. An increase of atrophy over the Retinal Pigment Epithelium (RPE) was observed in another patient. CONCLUSIONS: PDT can reduce the clinical signs of activity, such as choroidal hyperpermeability or neurosensorial retinal detachment, in patients affected by chronic CSC. However, the increase in visual acuity is variable, probably due to the extent of RPE damage. 
Mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase signaling promotes growth and vascularization of fibrosarcoma. 
 
We hypothesized that signaling through multiple mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) kinase (MKK) pathways is essential for the growth and vascularization of soft-tissue sarcomas, which are malignant tumors derived from mesenchymal tissues. We tested this using HT-1080, NCI, and Shac fibrosarcoma-derived cell lines and anthrax lethal toxin (LeTx), a bacterial toxin that inactivates MKKs. Western blots confirmed that LeTx treatment reduced the levels of phosphorylated extracellular signal-regulated kinase and p38 MAPK in vitro. Although short treatments with LeTx only modestly affected cell proliferation, sustained treatment markedly reduced cell numbers. LeTx also substantially inhibited the extracellular release of angioproliferative factors including vascular endothelial growth factor, interleukin-8, and basic fibroblast growth factor. Similar results were obtained with cell lines derived from malignant fibrous histiocytomas, leiomyosarcomas, and liposarcomas. In vivo, LeTx decreased MAPK activity and blocked fibrosarcoma growth. Growth inhibition correlated with decreased cellular proliferation and extensive necrosis, and it was accompanied by a decrease in tumor mean vessel density as well as a reduction in serum expression of angioproliferative cytokines. Vital imaging using high-resolution ultrasound enhanced with contrast microbubbles revealed that the effects of LeTx on tumor perfusion were remarkably rapid ( less than 24 h) and resulted in a marked reduction of perfusion within the tumor but not in nontumor tissues. These results are consistent with our initial hypothesis and lead us to propose that MKK inhibition by LeTx is a broadly effective strategy for targeting neovascularization in fibrosarcomas and other similar proliferative lesions. 
Effect of thalidomide affecting VEGF secretion, cell migration, adhesion and capillary tube formation of human endothelial EA.hy 926 cells. 
 
Angiogenesis, new blood vessel formation, is a multistep process, precisely regulated by pro angiogenic cytokines, which stimulate endothelial cells to migrate, proliferate and differentiate to form new capillary microvessels. Excessive vascular development and blood vessel remodeling appears in psoriasis, rheumatoid arthritis, diabetic retinopathy and solid tumors formation. Thalidomide [alpha-(N-phthalimido)-glutarimide] is known to be a potent inhibitor of angiogenesis, but the mechanism of its inhibitory action remains unclear. The aim of the study was to investigate the potential influence of thalidomide on the several steps of angiogenesis, using in vitro models. We have evaluated the effect of thalidomide on VEGF secretion, cell migration, adhesion as well as in capillary formation of human endothelial cell line EA.hy 926. Thalidomide at the concentrations of 0.01 microM and 10 microM inhibited VEGF secretion into supernatants, decreased the number of formed capillary tubes and increased cell adhesion to collagen. Administration of thalidomide at the concentration of 0.01 microM increased cell migration, while at 10 microM, it decreased cell migration. Thalidomide in concentrations from 0.1 microM to 10 microM did not change cell proliferation of 72-h cell cultures. We conclude that anti angiogenic action of thalidomide is due to direct inhibitory action on VEGF secretion and capillary microvessel formation as well as immunomodulatory influence on EA.hy 926 cells migration and adhesion. 
The role of organ vascularization and lipoplex-serum initial contact in intravenous murine lipofection. 
 
Following intravenous administration of cationic lipid-DNA complexes (lipoplexes) into mice, transfection (lipofection) occurs predominantly in the lungs. This was attributed to high entrapment of lipoplexes in the extended lung vascular tree. To determine whether lipofection in other organs could be enhanced by increasing the degree of vascularization, we used a transgenic mouse model with tissue-specific angiogenesis in liver. Tail vein injection of N-(1-(2,3-dioleoyloxy)propyl)-N,N,N-trimethylammonium chloride (DOTAP)/cholesterol lipoplexes resulted in increased lipoplex entrapment in hypervascularized liver but did not boost luciferase expression, suggesting that lipoplex delivery is not a sufficient condition for efficient organ lipofection. Because the intravenously injected lipoplexes migrated within seconds to lungs, we checked whether the effects of immediate contact with serum correlate with lung lipofection efficiency of different DOTAP-based formulations. Under conditions mimicking the injection environment, the lipoplex-serum interaction was strongly dependent on helper lipid and ionic strength: lipoplexes prepared in 150 mM NaCl or lipoplexes with high ( greater than 33 mol%) cholesterol were found to aggregate immediately. This aggregation process was irreversible and was inversely correlated with the percentage of lung cells that took up lipoplexes and with the efficiency of lipofection. No other structural changes in serum were observed for cholesterol-based lipoplexes. Dioleoyl phosphatidylethanolamine-based lipoplexes were found to give low expression, apparently because of an immediate loss of integrity in serum, without lipid-DNA dissociation. Our study suggests that efficient in vivo lipofection is the result of cross-talk between lipoplex composition, interaction with serum, hemodynamics, and target tissue "susceptibility" to transfection. 
Angiotensin II induces soluble fms-Like tyrosine kinase-1 release via calcineurin signaling pathway in pregnancy. 
 
Maternal endothelial dysfunction in preeclampsia is associated with increased soluble fms-like tyrosine kinase-1 (sFlt-1), a circulating antagonist of vascular endothelial growth factor and placental growth factor. Angiotensin II (Ang II) is a potent vasoconstrictor that increases concomitant with sFlt-1 during pregnancy. Therefore, we speculated that Ang II may promote the expression of sFlt-1 in pregnancy. Here we report that infusion of Ang II significantly increases circulating levels of sFlt-1 in pregnant mice, thereby demonstrating that Ang II is a regulator of sFlt-1 secretion in vivo. Furthermore, Ang II stimulated sFlt-1 production in a dose- and time-dependent manner from human villous explants and cultured trophoblasts but not from endothelial cells, suggesting that trophoblasts are the primary source of sFlt-1 during pregnancy. As expected, Ang II induced sFlt-1 secretion resulted in the inhibition of endothelial cell migration and in vitro tube formation. In vitro and in vivo studies with losartan, small interfering RNA specific for calcineurin and FK506 demonstrated that Ang II mediated sFlt-1 release was via Ang II type 1 receptor activation and calcineurin signaling, respectively. These findings reveal a previously unrecognized regulatory role for Ang II on sFlt-1 expression in murine and human pregnancy and suggest that elevated sFlt-1 levels in preeclampsia may be caused by a dysregulation of the local renin/angiotensin system. 
Tumor angiogenesis modulates leukocyte-vessel wall interactions in vivo by reducing endothelial adhesion molecule expression. 
 
The expression of endothelial cell (EC) adhesion molecules involved in leukocyte-vessel wall interactions is suppressed in malignancies. In the present study, we investigated in vivo the regulation of leukocyte-vessel wall interactions by the presence of a tumor. By means of intravital microscopy, tumor necrosis factor alpha stimulated leukocyte-vessel wall interactions were studied in ear skin microvessels of nude mice bearing small human LS174T colon carcinomas and in C57Bl/6 mice bearing murine B16F10 melanomas. Leukocyte-vessel wall interactions were studied both within and outside small tumors growing in the ear, and in ear microvessels of mice with a large tumor growing on their flank. Tumor-free mice were used as controls. Compared with values measured at the edge of the ear and in the contralateral ear, leukocyte adhesion was found to be diminished significantly in vessels inside the ear tumor in both mouse models. This reduction disappeared with increasing distance from the tumor. Surprisingly, the level of leukocyte adhesion in ear venules of mice with a large flank tumor was also reduced significantly. Leukocyte rolling, i.e., the step preceding adhesion, was not influenced by the presence of a tumor in nude mice, but was down-regulated in immune-competent C57Bl/6 mice. Treatment of mice bearing a small ear tumor with a humanized antivascular endothelial growth factor antibody prevented the down-regulation of leukocyte-vessel wall interactions inside the tumor vessels compared with the nontreated group. Fluorescence activated cell sorter analysis showed that isolated tumor ECs have suppressed levels of intercellular adhesion molecule 1 as compared with ECs from normal mouse tissues. In cultured b.END5 cells the tumor necrosis factor alpha induced up-regulation of intercellular adhesion molecule 1 and vascular cell adhesion molecule 1 was reduced in ECs that were preincubated with basic fibroblast growth factor or vascular endothelial growth factor. The current results may have an impact on the effectiveness of clinical immunotherapeutic treatment protocols, because immune effector cells may not be able to enter tumor tissue. 
Thrombospondin-2 plays a protective role in multistep carcinogenesis: a novel host anti tumor defense mechanism. 
 
The angiogenic switch during tumorigenesis is thought to be induced by a change in the balance of pro- angiogenic and anti angiogenic factors. To elucidate the biological role of the endogenous angiogenesis inhibitor thrombospondin-2 (TSP-2) during multistep carcinogenesis, we subjected TSP-2 deficient and wild-type mice to a chemical skin carcinogenesis regimen. Surprisingly, TSP-2 expression was strongly upregulated in the mesenchymal stroma of wild-type mice throughout the consecutive stages of tumorigenesis whereas the angiogenesis factor, vascular endothelial growth factor, was induced predominantly in tumor cells. TSP-2 deficiency dramatically enhanced susceptibility to skin carcinogenesis and resulted in accelerated and increased tumor formation. The angiogenic switch occurred in early stages of pre-malignant tumor formation, and tumor angiogenesis was significantly enhanced in TSP-2 deficient mice. While TSP-2 deficiency did not affect tumor differentiation or proliferation, tumor cell apoptosis was significantly reduced. These results reveal upregulation of an endogenous angiogenesis inhibitor during multi step tumorigenesis and identify enhanced stromal TSP-2 expression as a novel host anti tumor defense mechanism. 
Vasodilator-stimulated phosphoprotein is involved in stress-fiber and membrane ruffle formation in endothelial cells. 
 
Vasodilator-stimulated phosphoprotein (VASP) is highly expressed in vascular endothelial cells, where it has been implicated in cellular reorganization during angiogenesis, as well as in endothelial retraction and changes in vessel permeability. However, the cellular functions of VASP are not known. In this study, we have expressed wild-type and mutant forms of VASP in endothelial cells to determine in what aspects of cytoskeletal behavior this protein participates. Expression of wild-type VASP induces marked membrane ruffling and formation of prominent stress fibers in bovine aortic endothelial cells. Deletion of the proline-rich domain of VASP abolishes its ability to bind profilin but does not affect ruffling or stress fiber formation. Further deletions reveal a sequence within the carboxy-terminal domain that is responsible for in vivo bundle formation. Ruffling occurs only on the expression of forms of VASP that possess bundling activity and the capacity to bind zyxin/vinculin-derived peptide. The ability of distinct subdomains within VASP to bind adhesion proteins and induce F-actin bundling in vivo suggests that this protein could function in the aggregation and tethering of actin filaments during the formation of endothelial cell-substrate and cell-cell contacts. These data provide a mechanism whereby VASP can influence endothelial migration and organization during capillary formation and modulate vascular permeability via effects on endothelial cell contractility. 
Fibroblast growth factor receptor 2-positive fibroblasts provide a suitable microenvironment for tumor development and progression in esophageal carcinoma. 
 
PURPOSE: Tumor fibroblasts (TF) have been suggested to play an essential role in the complex process of tumor-stroma interactions and tumorigenesis. The aim of the present study was to investigate the specific role of TF in the esophageal cancer microenvironment. EXPERIMENTAL DESIGN: An Affymetrix expression microarray was used to compare gene expression profiles between six pairs of TFs and normal fibroblasts from esophageal squamous cell carcinoma (ESCC). Differentially expressed genes were identified, and a subset was evaluated by quantitative real-time PCR and immunohistochemistry. RESULTS: About 43% (126 of 292) of known deregulated genes in TFs were associated with cell proliferation, extracellular matrix remodeling, and immune response. Up-regulation of fibroblast growth factor receptor 2 (FGFR2), which showed the most significant change, was detected in all six tested TFs compared with their paired normal fibroblasts. A further study found that FGFR2-positive fibroblasts were only observed inside the tumor tissues and not in tumor-surrounding stromal tissues, suggesting that FGFR2 could be used as a TF-specific marker in ESCC. Moreover, the conditioned medium from TFs was found to be able to promote ESCC tumor cell growth, migration, and invasion in vitro. CONCLUSIONS: Our study provides new candidate genes for the esophageal cancer microenvironment. Based on our results, we hypothesize that FGFR2(+)-TFs might provide cancer cells with a suitable microenvironment via secretion of proteins that could promote cancer development and progression through stimulation of cancer cell proliferation, induction of angiogenesis, inhibition of cell adhesion, enhancement of cell mobility, and promotion of the epithelial-mesenchymal transition. 
A new autosomal dominant vascular retinopathy syndrome. 
 
We describe a new syndrome with autosomal dominant transmission whose most striking feature is vascular retinopathy. The retinopathy is often associated with migraine, Raynaud's phenomenon and mental changes, mainly forgetfulness, aggression and depression. To define this syndrome we collected medical data on 110 family members. General ophthalmological examination and fluorescein angiography were performed in 61 persons. The retinopathy, as diagnosed in 22 persons, is characterized by central and peripheral microangiopathy, areas of capillary non-perfusion, haemorrhages, cotton wool spots and, in a more advanced stage, occlusion of large retinal vessels, which can induce a neovascular response. A vascular occlusive disorder may be the common aetiological factor of the various manifestation of this syndrome. 
Urokinase receptor: a molecular organizer in cellular communication. 
 
In a variety of cell types, the glycolipid-anchored urokinase receptor (uPAR) is colocalized pericellularly with components of the plasminogen activation system and endocytosis receptors. uPAR is also coexpressed with caveolin and members of the integrin adhesion receptor superfamily. The formation of functional units with these various proteins allows the uPAR to mediate the focused proteolysis required for cell migration and invasion and to contribute both directly and indirectly to cell adhesive processes in a non-proteolytic fashion. This dual activity, together with the initiation of signal transduction pathways by uPAR, is believed to influence cellular behaviour in angiogenesis, inflammation, wound repair and tumor progression metastasis and open up the way for uPAR-based therapeutic approaches. 
An assay to measure angiogenesis in human fat tissue. 
 
BACKGROUND: Inhibition of angiogenesis reverses rodent obesity. A validated assay in human fat tissue is needed to study the role of angiogenesis in human obesity. METHODS: Human fat tissue fragments from surgery were placed in 96-well plates, embedded in fibrin thrombin clot and overlaid with cell culture media containing 20% fetal bovine serum. After 15 days, the clots were examined by histology and electron microscopy. The effect of taxol, cobalt chloride and a heparin-steroid combination was tested in the fat tissue assay and compared to the validated human placental vein angiogenesis model (HPVAM). RESULTS: Blood vessels initiated growth and elongated from the fat tissue fragments over 15 days. Presence of blood vessels was confirmed with histology and electron microscopy. Taxol at 10(-6) and 10(-7) M completely inhibited angiogenesis, while Taxol 10(-8) and 10(-9) M and the heparin-steroid partially inhibited angiogenesis. The response to taxol and heparin-steroid was similar to that of the HPVAM, a validated angiogenesis assay. Cobalt chloride, a stimulator of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) stimulated angiogenesis initiation at 10(-9) M in fat tissue and the HPVAM, but at 10(-10) M blood vessel growth was stimulated only in the fat assay. CONCLUSION: This angiogenesis assay based on human fat tissue uses three-dimensionally intact human tissue. The vessels are derived from quiescient vessels within the fat. These properties allow the angiogenic switch to be evaluated in an in vitro setting. The angiogenic response of fat tissue is not identical to placental tissue. This assay allows exploration of angiogenesis in fat tissue. 
Collagen-poly glycolic acid hybrid matrix with basic fibroblast growth factor accelerated angiogenesis and granulation tissue formation in diabetic mice. 
 
Because poor skin wound healing associated with diabetes is thought to be partly a result from impaired angiogenesis, treatments that improve angiogenesis could have important clinical applications. We herein report the effects of novel developed material, collagen-poly glycolic acid fiber hybrid matrix, being used together with basic fibroblast growth factor to promote wound healing of full-thickness skin defects on the back of type 2 diabetic Lepr(db) mice. Our data indicates that this therapeutic approach markedly promotes angiogenesis and granulation tissue formation in comparison with other conditions 14 days after wounding. 
Regulation of transforming growth factor-beta signaling and vascular diseases. 
 
PURPOSE: Members of the transforming growth factor (TGF)-beta superfamily play critical roles in regulation of various cellular functions. Dysregulation of the signaling mechanisms of the TGF-beta superfamily proteins is associated with clinical diseases such as cancer, fibrotic diseases, and vascular disorders. Therefore, understanding these signaling mechanisms may provide us with novel ways to develop strategies for treating clinical diseases induced by these cytokines. METHODS: This review discusses our current understanding of the mechanisms of TGF-beta signaling, focusing on the roles of TGF-beta in regulation of vascular wall cells and on the regulation of TGF-beta superfamily signals by inhibitory Smads. 
Targeting angiogenesis: progress with anti-VEGF treatment with large molecules. 
 
Angiogenesis -one of the hallmarks of cancer--has emerged as a valid therapeutic target in oncology. The VEGF system represents a key mediator of tumor-initiated angiogenesis and the first target of antiangiogenesis agents introduced in clinical practice. Although anti-VEGF therapies have clearly demonstrated antitumor efficacy in various malignancies, especially when combined with conventional cytotoxic chemotherapy, their mechanism of action is not fully understood. This Review will discuss the rationale for using antiangiogenic compounds and will focus on large molecules, such as antibodies, that target the VEGF system. Clinical data on bevacizumab is discussed in detail. Predictive markers for anti-VEGF agents have not yet been identified and questions regarding the usefulness of bevacizumab in the adjuvant setting as well as its continued use beyond progression remain unanswered, in spite of negative data on bevacizumab in treating patients with adjuvant colon cancer. Nonetheless, anti-VEGF therapy has enhanced the arsenal of anticancer therapies and has provided new insights into the biology of malignancy. 
Molecular characterization of angiogenic properties of human oral squamous cell carcinoma cells. 
 
Little is known about the specificity of angiogenic properties of oral cancer cells and the possible mechanisms. Stimulatory effects on proliferation and migration of human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVEC) characterized the angiogenic properties of oral cancer cells but not normal oral keratinocytes (NOK). ELISA found the presence of vascular endothelial growth factors (VEGF) both in the tested oral cancer cells and NOK. Attenuation of the proangiogenic effects by neutralizing VEGF antibodies suggests VEGF play a key role in the acquisition of the angiogenic phenotype in oral cancer cells. Western blotting of p53 and murine double mutant 2 (Mdm2) together with p53 DNA sequencing analysis indicate that p53 function loss by mutation or overexpression of Mdm2 occurred in all tested oral cancer cells regardless of their etiology. In summary, the angiogenic property of oral cancer cells is mediated by many factors in addition to VEGF and the functional status of p53. 
Hypothesis: Induced angiogenesis after surgery in premenopausal node-positive breast cancer patients is a major underlying reason why adjuvant chemotherapy works particularly well for those patients. 
 
BACKGROUND: We suggest that surgical extirpation of primary breast cancer among other effects accelerates relapse for some premenopausal node-positive patients. These accelerated relapses occur within 10 months of surgery for untreated patients. The mechanism proposed is a stimulation of angiogenesis for distant dormant micrometastases. This has been suggested as one of the mechanisms to explain the mammography paradox for women aged 40-49 years. We could imagine that it also plays a role in adjuvant chemotherapy effectiveness since, perhaps not coincidentally, this is most beneficial for premenopausal node-positive patients. HYPOTHESIS: We speculate that there is a burst of angiogenesis of distant dormant micrometastases after surgery in approximately 20% of premenopausal node-positive patients. We also speculate that this synchronizes them into a temporal highly chemosensitive state and is the underlying reason why adjuvant chemotherapy works particularly well for that patient category. Furthermore, this may explain why cancer in younger patients is more often 'aggressive'. TESTING THE HYPOTHESIS: Stimulation of dormant micrometastases by primary tumor removal is known to occur in animal models. However, we need to determine whether it happens in breast cancer. Transient circulating levels of angioactive molecules and serial high-resolution imaging studies of focal angiogenesis might help. IMPLICATIONS: Short-course cytotoxic chemotherapy after surgery has probably reached its zenith, and other strategies perhaps anti angiogenic methods, are needed to successfully treat more patients. In addition, the hypothesis predicts that early detection, which is designed to find more patients without involved lymph nodes, may not be a synergistic strategy with adjuvant chemotherapy, which works best with positive lymph node patients. 
Matrix metalloproteinase activity and immunohistochemical profile of matrix metalloproteinase-2 and -9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 during human dermal wound healing. 
 
Proteolytic activity is required for the turnover of the extracellular matrix during wound healing. Matrix metalloproteinases can collectively cleave all components of the extracellular matrix, with the endogenous tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 regulating their activity. Breast tissue taken at varying postoperative times (n= 92) or during surgery (controls, n= 17), was used to investigate the temporal and spatial activity of matrix metalloproteinase-2 and -9 and tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 during human wound healing. Matrix metalloproteinase activity, determined using a quenched fluorescence substrate assay, increased during early healing (3-8 weeks) compared to controls, and then decreased between 24 and 36 weeks after surgery (p  less than  0.05 until 24 weeks, Mann-Whitney U-test). Immunohistochemistry scores for matrix metalloproteinase-9 expression were significantly elevated compared to controls in scar endothelial cells and fibroblasts from 2 until 12 and 20 weeks, respectively. Matrix metalloproteinase-2 staining was observed exclusively in fibroblasts, reaching maximum levels 8-12 weeks after surgery, decreasing by 1.5 years but remaining significantly increased. Tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 staining was relatively sparse but was significantly increased until 8 weeks after surgery. These results show that matrix metalloproteinases are present at elevated levels during early wound healing, when angiogenesis occurs, and suggest that matrix metalloproteinase-9 may play a significant role. The later expression of matrix metalloproteinase-2 and -9 in fibroblasts suggests a role in extracellular matrix remodeling. 
Nitric oxide synthase inhibition results in synergistic anti-tumour activity with melphalan and tumour necrosis factor alpha-based isolated limb perfusions. 
 
Nitric oxide (NO) is an important molecule in regulating tumour blood flow and stimulating tumour angiogenesis. Inhibition of NO synthase by L-NAME might induce an anti-tumour effect by limiting nutrients and oxygen to reach tumour tissue or affecting vascular growth. The anti-tumour effect of L-NAME after systemic administration was studied in a renal subcapsular CC531 adenocarcinoma model in rats. Moreover, regional administration of L-NAME, in combination with TNF and melphalan, was studied in an isolated limb perfusion (ILP) model using BN175 soft-tissue sarcomas. Systemic treatment with L-NAME inhibited growth of adenocarcinoma significantly but was accompanied by impaired renal function. In ILP, reduced tumour growth was observed when L-NAME was used alone. In combination with TNF or melphalan, L-NAME increased response rates significantly compared to perfusions without L-NAME (0-64% and 0-63% respectively). An additional anti-tumour effect was demonstrated when L-NAME was added to the synergistic combination of melphalan and TNF (responses increased from 70 to 100%). Inhibition of NO synthase reduces tumour growth both after systemic and regional (ILP) treatment. A synergistic anti-tumour effect of L-NAME is observed in combination with melphalan and/or TNF using ILP. These results indicate a possible role of L-NAME for the treatment of solid tumours in a systemic or regional setting. 
Dopamine regulates phosphorylation of VEGF receptor 2 by engaging Src-homology-2-domain-containing protein tyrosine phosphatase 2. 
 
Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF)-induced receptor phosphorylation is the crucial step for initiating downstream signaling pathways that lead to angiogenesis or related pathophysiological outcomes. Our previous studies have shown that the neurotransmitter dopamine could inhibit VEGF induced phosphorylation of VEGF receptor 2 (VEGFR-2), endothelial cell proliferation, migration, microvascular permeability, and thus, angiogenesis. In this study, we address the mechanism by which VEGFR-2 phosphorylation is regulated by dopamine. Here, we demonstrate that D2 dopamine receptor (D2DR) colocalizes with VEGFR-2 at the cell surface. Dopamine pretreatment increases the translocation and colocalization of Src-homology-2-domain-containing protein tyrosine phosphatase (SHP-2) with D2DR at the cell surface. Dopamine administration leads to increased VEGF induced phosphorylation of SHP-2 and this increased phosphorylation parallels the increased phosphatase activity of SHP-2. Active SHP-2 then dephosphorylates VEGFR-2 at Y951, Y996 and Y1059, but not Y1175. We also observe that SHP-2 knockdown impairs the dopamine-regulated inhibition of VEGF induced phosphorylation of VEGFR-2 and, subsequently, Src phosphorylation and migration. Our data establish a novel role for SHP-2 phosphatase in the dopamine-mediated regulation of VEGFR-2 phosphorylation. 
Imaging tumor angiogenesis. 
 
Since the discovery of vascular-specific growth factors with angiogenic activity, there has been a significant effort to develop cancer drugs that restrict tumorigenesis by targeting the blood supply. In this issue of the JCI, Mancuso et al use mouse models to better understand the plasticity of the tumor vasculature in the face of anti angiogenic therapy (see the related article beginning on page 2610). They describe a rapid regrowth of the tumor vasculature following withdrawal of VEGFR inhibitors, emphasizing the importance of fully understanding the function of these and similar treatments used in the clinic at the cellular and molecular level. 
Inducible nitric oxide synthase modulates angiogenesis in ischemic hindlimb of rat. 
 
BACKGROUND: Angiogenesis plays an important role in maintaining adequate oxygen delivery, and nitric oxide (NO) is a potential regulator of angiogenesis. NO is synthesized through three isoforms of NO synthase (NOS). It is hypothesized that the NO derived from inducible NOS (iNOS) may promote survival of ischemic tissue through angiogenesis. To test this hypothesis, we investigated the effect of iNOS deficiency (by L-NIL) on angiogenesis in a hindlimb ischemia model. METHODS: Thirty-two male wistar rats randomly divided into four groups. In groups 1 & 2, hindlimb ischemia was induced by ligation of femoral artery and they received L-NIL and saline respectively. The animals in groups 3 and 4 also received L-NIL and saline respectively without surgical procedure. After 21 days, the serum concentration of nitrite, capillary density and expression of HIF1alpha were determined. RESULTS: Serum nitrite levels were significantly lower in L-NIL groups (p<0.05). The capillary density in group 1 (ischemia+L-NIL) was significantly different from group 2 (ischemia+saline); group 1: 360.33+/-77.02, group 2: 549+/-81.85 /mm2, p<0.05) .In addition, expression of HIF1alpha was significantly increased in ischemic groups (p<0.05). CONCLUSION: Selective inhibition of iNOS by L-NIL inhibits angiogenesis in a hindlimb ischemic rat model. In addition, ischemia induces expression of HIF1alpha in hypoxic tissue. 
The effect of perfluorocarbon-based artificial oxygen carriers on tissue-engineered trachea. 
 
The biological effect of the perfluorocarbon-based artificial oxygen carrier (Oxygent) was investigated in tissue-engineered trachea (TET) construction. Media supplemented with and without 10% Oxygent were compared in all assessments. Partial tissue oxygen tension (PtO(2)) was measured with polarographic microprobes; epithelial metabolism was monitored by microdialysis inside the TET epithelium perfused with the medium underneath. Chondrocyte-DegraPol constructs were cultured for 1 month with the medium before glycosaminoglycan assessment and histology. Tissue reaction of TET epithelial scaffolds immersed with the medium was evaluated on the chick embryo chorioallantoic membrane. Oxygent perfusion medium increased the TET epithelial PtO(2) (51.2 +/- 0.3 mm Hg vs. 33.4 +/- 0.3 mm Hg at 200 microm thickness; 12.5 +/- 0.1 mm Hg vs. 3.1 +/- 0.1 mm Hg at 400 microm thickness, p  less than  0.01) and decreased the lactate concentration (0.63 +/- 0.08 vs. 0.80 +/- 0.06 mmol/L, p  less than  0.05), lactate/pyruvate (1.87 +/- 0.26 vs. 3.36 +/- 10.13, p  less than  0.05), and lactate/glucose ratios (0.10 +/- 0.00 vs. 0.29 +/- 0.14, p  less than  0.05). Chondrocyte-DegraPol in Oxygent group presented lower glycosaminoglycan value (0.03 +/- 0.00 vs. 0.13 +/- 0.00, p  less than  0.05); histology slides showed poor acid mucopolysaccharides formation. Orthogonal polarization spectral imaging showed no difference in functional capillary density between the scaffolds cultured on chorioallantoic membranes. The foreign body reaction was similar in both groups. We conclude that Oxygent increases TET epithelial PtO(2), improves epithelial metabolism, does not impair angiogenesis, and tends to slow cartilage tissue formation. 
Roles of cell adhesion molecules in tumor angiogenesis induced by cotransplantation of cancer and endothelial cells to nude rats. 
 
Roles of cell adhesion molecules mediating the interaction of cancer and endothelial cells in tumor angiogenesis were investigated using new in vitro and in vivo model systems with a cultured murine endothelial cell line (F-2) and human cultured epidermoid cancer cells (A431). The A431 cells exhibited typical in vitro cell adhesion to the endothelial F-2 cells. The initial step of adhesion was mediated by sialyl Lewis(x) (Le(x)) and sialyl Le(a), the carbohydrate determinants expressed on the cancer cells, and E-selectin expressed constitutively on F-2 cells. Prolonged culture led to the implantation of cancer cells into the monolayer of the F-2 cells, which was mediated mainly by alpha(3)beta(1)-integrin. F-2 cells cultured on Matrigel showed evident tube formation, and coculture of F-2 cells with A431 cells led to the formation of A431 cell nests constantly surrounded by tube-like networks consisting of F-2 cells. This in vitro morphogenesis was inhibited by the addition of anti-sialyl Le(x)/Le(a) or anti-beta(1)-integrin antibodies, which led to the formation of cancer cell aggregates that were independent from the F-2 cell networks. This in vitro morphological appearance was exactly reproduced in the in vivo tumors, which were formed when the mixture of A431 and F-2 cells at the ratio of 10:1 were cotransplanted s.c. into the back of nude rats. The tumors of A431 supplemented with F-2 cells were profoundly vascularized throughout by the tubular structures formed by F-2 cells, the lumen of which contained the host rat blood cells. The tumor mass thus formed was an average 5.8-fold as large as control A431 tumors that were grown without F-2 cells. The co-injection of anti-Le(x)/Le(a) or anti-beta(1)-integrin antibodies produced a marked reduction in the size of A431 tumors, which were not vascularized and accompanied an independent tiny remnant clump of F-2 cells. The size of these A431 tumors did not differ significantly from those of control A431 tumors raised without F-2 cells. These results indicate that the interaction of tumor cells and endothelial cells in orderly tumor angiomorphogenesis is highly dependent on the action of cell adhesion molecules mediating the adhesion of cancer cells to endothelial cells, inhibition of which remarkably retards tumor growth and angiogenesis. 
Effects of spironolactone on corneal allograft survival in the rat. 
 
PURPOSE: Spironolactone has recently been shown to have suppressive effects on several immunoactive and proinflammatory cytokines. In this study, we investigated the effects of spironolactone on the prevention of corneal allograft rejection in a MHC class I/II mismatch rat corneal transplant model. METHODS: Grafted animals for corneal survival analysis were assigned to receive either spironolactone suspension (orally, 100 mg/kg/day, n = 7), phosphate-buffered saline (PBS, orally, same volume as spironolactone, n = 9) or remained untreated (n = 16). Additional grafted rats treated with spironolactone (n = 6) or PBS (n = 8) were sacrificed on day 12 for quantitative RT-PCR analysis for mechanistic studies. RESULTS: Mean (+/-SEM) graft survival was significantly prolonged in animals receiving spironolactone (14.9 +/- 2.0 days) compared with both PBS treated (12.3 +/- 1.2 days, p = 0.007) and untreated controls (13.0 +/- 1.0 days, p = 0.01). We found a decrease in corneal neovascularization in spironolactone treated rats compared with the PBS treated group, although the difference was not statistically significant. Spironolactone affected both systemic (down-regulation of CD25+ cells in spleen) and local immune response (up-regulation of IL-10 in cornea). CONCLUSION: We present initial results demonstrating anti-inflammatory effects of spironolactone. 
Inhibition of Dll4 mediated signaling induces proliferation of immature vessels and results in poor tissue perfusion. 
 
Vascular development is dependent on various growth factors and certain modifiers critical for providing arterial or venous identity, interaction with the surrounding stroma and tissues, hierarchic network formation, and recruitment of pericytes. Notch receptors and ligands (Jagged and Delta-like) play a critical role in this process in addition to VEGF. Dll4 is one of the Notch ligands that regulates arterial specification and maturation events. In the current study, we have shown that loss of function by either targeted allele deletion or use of a soluble form of Dll4 extracellular domain leads to inhibition of Notch signaling, resulting in increased vascular proliferation but defective maturation. Newly forming vessels have thin caliber, a markedly reduced vessel lumen, markedly reduced pericyte recruitment, and deficient vascular perfusion. sDll4 similarly induced defective vascular response in tumor implants leading to reduced tumor growth. Interference with Dll4 Notch signaling may be particularly desirable in tumors that have highly induced Dll4 Notch pathway. 
Antiapoptotic effect of coagulation factor VIIa. 
 
Binding of factor VIIa (FVIIa) to its cellular receptor tissue factor (TF) was previously shown to induce various intracellular signaling events, which were thought to be responsible for TF mediated biologic effects, including angiogenesis, tumor metastasis, and restenosis. To understand the mechanisms behind these processes, we have examined the effect of FVIIa on apoptosis. Serum deprivation induced apoptosis of BHK(+TF) cells was characterized by apoptotic blebs, nuclei with chromatin-condensed bodies, DNA degradation, and activation of caspase 3. FVIIa markedly decreased the number of cells with apoptotic morphology and prevented the DNA degradation as measured by means of TdT-mediated dUTP nick end labeling (TUNEL). The antiapoptotic effect of FVIIa was confirmed by the observation that FVIIa attenuated caspase 3 activation. FVIIa induced antiapoptotic effect was dependent on its proteolytic activity and TF but independent of factor Xa and thrombin. FVIIa induced cell survival correlated with the activation of Akt and was inhibited markedly by the specific PI3-kinase inhibitor, LY294002. Blocking the activation of p44/42 mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) by the specific mitogen-induced extracellular kinase (MEK) inhibitor, U0126, impaired modestly the ability of FVIIa to promote cell survival. In conclusion, FVIIa binding to TF provided protection against apoptosis induced by growth factor deprivation, primarily through activation of PI3-kinase/Akt pathway, and to a lesser extent, p44/42 MAPK pathway. 
Impaired apoptosis of pulmonary endothelial cells is associated with intimal proliferation and irreversibility of pulmonary hypertension in congenital heart disease. 
 
OBJECTIVES: This study sought to assess the cellular and histologic basis of irreversible pulmonary hypertension (PHT) in the clinical setting of congenital heart disease (CHD). BACKGROUND: Although many children with CHD develop pulmonary vascular disease, it is unclear why this complication is reversible after complete repair in some cases but irreversible in others. Because failure of endothelial cell apoptosis might lead to intimal proliferation and lack of reversibility of PHT, we investigated this and other key markers of vasoactivity and angiogenesis in subjects with PHT and CHD. METHODS: We assessed antiapoptotic and proapoptotic markers in vascular and perivascular cells in lung biopsy samples from 18 patients with CHD, 7 with reversible and 11 with irreversible PHT, and 6 control patients. Immunostaining for endothelial nitric oxide synthase, vascular endothelial growth factor, and CD34 (markers of vasoactivity and neoangiogenesis) was also performed. RESULTS: The antiapoptotic protein Bcl-2 was highly expressed by pulmonary endothelial cells in all cases of irreversible PHT but in no cases of reversible PHT, nor in control patients (p  less than  0.001). Intimal proliferation was present in 10 of 11 irreversible PHT cases, but never observed in reversible PHT (p  less than  0.001). Similarly, perivascular inflammatory T-cells expressed more antiapoptotic proteins in irreversible PHT (p  less than  0.01). Irreversible PHT cases were also more likely to show compensatory upregulation of vascular endothelial growth factor and new small vessel formation at the sites of native vessel stenosis or occlusion (p  less than  0.001). CONCLUSIONS: Irreversible PHT is strongly associated with impaired endothelial cell apoptosis and antiapoptotic signaling from perivascular inflammatory cells. These changes are associated with intimal proliferation and vessel narrowing, and thereby may contribute to clinical outcomes associated with pulmonary hypertension. 
Retinal revascularisation in diabetic retinopathy. 
 
The case history of a 33-year-old diabetic patient who has had diabetes for 24 years is presented. When first seen in 1975 he had bilateral proliferative retinopathy with new vessels in the retinal periphery. He had large areas of capillary non-perfusion lateral to the macula in the right eye associated with the new vessels. Nine years later, after extensive repeated photocoagulation, revascularisation of large areas previously not perfused were seen. The vessels are in the plane of the retina and do not have the appearance of new vessels. 
RNA damage and inhibition of neoplastic endothelial cell growth: effects of human and amphibian ribonucleases. 
 
Angiogenesis defines the many steps involved in the growth and migration of endothelial cell derived blood vessels. This process is necessary for the growth and metastasis of tumors, and considerable effort is being expended to find inhibitors of tumor angiogenesis. This usually involves screening of potential anti angiogenic compounds on endothelial cells. To this end, two candidate anti angiogenic RNA-damaging agents, onconase and (-4)rhEDN, were screened for their effects on endothelial cell proliferation using three distinct types of endothelial cells in culture: HPV-16 E6/E7 immortalized human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVECs), a Kras transformed HPV-16 E6/E7 HUVEC (Rhim et al., Carcinogenesis 4, 673-681, 1998), and primary HUVECs. Onconase similarly inhibited proliferation in all three cell lines (IC(50) = 0.3-1.0 microM) while (-4)rhEDN was more effective on immortalized HUVEC cell lines (IC(50) = 0.02-0.06 microM) than on primary HUVECs (IC(50) > 0.1 microM). Differential sensitivity to these agents implies that more than one endothelial cell type must be used in proliferation assays to screen for novel anti angiogenic compounds. 
Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in seizures: a double-edged sword. 
 
Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is a vascular growth factor which induces angiogenesis (the development of new blood vessels), vascular permeability, and inflammation. In brain, receptors for VEGF have been localized to vascular endothelium, neurons, and glia. VEGF is upregulated after hypoxic injury to the brain, which can occur during cerebral ischemia or high-altitude edema, and has been implicated in the blood-brain barrier breakdown associated with these conditions. Given its recently-described role as an inflammatory mediator, VEGF could also contribute to the inflammatory responses observed in cerebral ischemia. After seizures, blood-brain barrier breakdown and inflammation is also observed in brain, albeit on a lower scale than that observed after stroke. Recent evidence has suggested a role for inflammation in seizure disorders. We have described striking increases in VEGF protein in both neurons and glia after pilocarpine-induced status epilepticus in the brain. Increases in VEGF could contribute to the blood-brain barrier breakdown and inflammation observed after seizures. However, VEGF has also been shown to be neuroprotective across several experimental paradigms, and hence could potentially protect vulnerable cells from damage associated with seizures. Therefore, the role of VEGF after seizures could be either protective or destructive. Although only further research will determine the exact nature of VEGF's role after seizures, preliminary data indicate that VEGF plays a protective role after seizures. 
Adenomatoid tumour of the liver. 
 
An unusual primary adenomatoid tumour arising in the normal liver is described. Hepatectomy was performed, and the patient is alive and free of disease 1 year postsurgery. Grossly, the tumour showed a haemorrhagic cut surface with numerous microcystic structures. Histological examination revealed cystic or angiomatoid spaces of various sizes lined by cuboidal, low-columnar, or flattened epithelioid cells with vacuolated cytoplasm and round to oval nuclei. The epithelioid cells were entirely supported by proliferated capillaries and arteries together with collagenous stroma. Immunohistochemical studies showed that the epithelioid cells were strongly positive for a broad spectrum of cytokeratins (AE1/AE3, CAM5.2, epithelial membrane antigen and cytokeratin 7) and mesothelial markers (calretinin, Wilms' tumour 1 and D2-40). These cells were negative for Hep par-1, carcinoembryonic antigen, neural cell adhesion molecule, CD34, CD31 and HMB45. Atypically, abundant capillaries were observed; however, the cystic proliferation of epithelioid cells with vacuoles and immunohistochemical profile of the epithelioid element were consistent with hepatic adenomatoid tumour. 
Angiopoietin/tie-2 as mediators of angiogenesis: a role in congestive heart failure? 
 
Angiogenic factors, in particular vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and the angiopoietins, Ang-1 and -2, have recently generated significant interest, especially in oncology. The process of angiogenesis is also thought to occur in response to ischaemic conditions, which lie at the core of cardiovascular disease states such as coronary artery disease and congestive heart failure. However, current data do not conclusively show evidence of angiogenesis per se in these conditions, despite (for example) the presence of high levels of VEGF and Ang-2. High levels of these angiogenic factors in heart disease also have not translated into clinically significant new vessel formation, as in accelerated cancer growth or proliferative retinopathy. Indeed, we would hypothesize that these angiogenic markers--especially the angiopoietins--do not necessarily translate into new vessel formation in congestive heart failure (CHF), but may well reflect disturbances of endothelial integrity in CHF. 
Molecular mediators of interactions with extracellular matrix components in metastasis and angiogenesis. 
 
Metastasis and tumor angiogenesis are invasive phenomena and share many common properties at the physiological level and some similarities at the molecular level. Each consists of repetitive cycles of interaction with adjacent extracellular matrix components by mediating cellular adhesion, matrix dissolution, and cellular motility to achieve metastasis of cancer cells or neovascularization of tumors. Molecular factors which implement this triad of events are reviewed, as are several signal transduction components which may regulate them. Some potentially promising prognostic, diagnostic, and therapeutic modalities for tumor angiogenesis and metastatic disease are also discussed. 
Tumor microenvironment, a dangerous society leading to cancer metastasis. From mechanisms to therapy and prevention. 
 
Cancer is no longer considered by scientists just a jumble of mutated cells. To grow, invade and metastasize, a treacherous society between cancer and host cells must be formed, and this association provides novel and effective clinical targets for cancer control and prevention. This collection of reviews at the front-edge of scientific knowledge focuses on host-tumor cell interactions, the disastrous consequences they can produce and approaches the ways to break up these cellular conspiracies, to leave the tumor cells unattended and vulnerable. 
Optimizing treatment of choroidal neovascularization feeder vessels associated with age-related macular degeneration. 
 
PURPOSE: To optimize the method of treating choroidal neovascularization  CNV  associated with age-related macular degeneration (AMD). DESIGN: Experimental study and interventional case series. METHODS: The parameters associated with locating and then photocoagulating CNV feeder vessels were identified and optimized using published data and data derived from modeling the choroidal vasculature. Based on these optimized parameters, a prototype diagnostic/treatment system was designed that captures high-speed indocyanine green  ICG  angiogram images and facilitates analysis of the images by enhancing visualization of dye movement through CNV feeder vessels  FVs). The system also permits precise aiming and delivery of 810- nm wavelength photocoagulation laser energy to target FVs on a real-time ICG angiogram image of the choroidal vasculature. Target FVs are tracked by a joy-stick controlled laser aiming beam until an intravenously-injected high-concentration ICG dye bolus is observed to enter the target vessel, at which time the laser is fired. Proof of principle of the combined diagnosis/treatment system design for performing dye enhanced photocoagulation  DEP  in the clinical setting and determination of the minimum DEP laser energy needed to close CNV FVs was made in 11 AMD patients requiring treatment of CNV, but for whom other treatment was not appropriate. RESULTS: Using ICG-DEP, CNV feeder vessels were closed with single pulse laser energy, delivering as little as 0.6 to 1.8 J of energy to the fundus, producing no visible change in the fundus. Successful FV closure was usually indicated immediately by presence of incarcerated ICG dye in the vessel adjacent to the burn site. The prototype system proved relatively easy to operate. After acquiring and interpreting diagnostic angiograms and repositioning a patient in front of the device, feeder vessel DEP and treatment evaluation required 15 to 20 minutes. CONCLUSIONS: Indocyanine green dye enhanced photocoagulation of CNV feeder vessels, facilitated by use of a device that permits real-time visualization of the choroidal circulation while aiming the treatment laser beam, appears to minimize the amount of energy applied to the fundus and the volume of fundus tissue affected by treatment, compared with other treatment modalities. The combination diagnosis/treatment device should be useful in optimizing FV treatment and in refining and evaluating the efficacy of DEP in future clinical trials. 
IL-12 inhibition of endothelial cell functions and angiogenesis depends on lymphocyte-endothelial cell cross-talk. 
 
In vivo IL-12 dependent tumor inhibition rests on the ability of IL-12 to activate a CD8-mediated cytotoxicity, inhibit angiogenesis, and cause vascular injury. Although in vivo studies have shown that such inhibition stems from complex interactions of immune cells and the production of IFN-gamma and other downstream angiostatic chemokines, the mechanisms involved are still poorly defined. Here we show that IL-12 activates an anti angiogenic program in Con A activated mouse spleen cells  activated spc) or human PBMC  activated PBMC). The soluble factors they release in its presence arrest the cycle of endothelial cells (EC), inhibit in vitro angiogenesis, negatively modulate the production of matrix metalloproteinase-9, and the ability of EC to adhere to vitronectin and up-regulate ICAM-1 and VCAM-1 expression. These effects do not require direct cell-cell contact, yet result from continuous interaction between activated lymphoid cells and EC. We used neutralizing Abs to show that the IFN-inducible protein-10 and monokine-induced by IFN-gamma chemokines are pivotal in inducing these effects. Experiments with nu/nu mice, nonobese diabetic-SCID mice, or activated spc enriched in specific cell subpopulations demonstrated that CD4(+), CD8(+), and NK cells are all needed to mediate the full anti angiogenetic effect of IL-12. 
Angiogenesis: initiation and control. 
 
From in vivo experiments using new methods such as the rabbit cornea, it is now becoming clear that the growth of a capillary involves an ordered sequence of events that includes lysis of the basement membrane of a parent venule, directional migration of capillary endothelial cells toward the angiogenic stimulus, lumen formation, development of branches, and anastomosis of the tip of one tube with another to form a loop. It is also clear that diffusible angiogenic stimuli can be released not only from most solid tumors, but also from at least three non-neoplastic cells. These include activated macrophages, sensitized lymphocytes, and adipocytes. Other normal tissues can also stimulate angiogenesis, but the type of cell giving rise to the angiogenic stimulus is unknown, and the period of angiogenic stimulation is brief. With the recent ability to clone capillary endothelial cells and to carry them in long-term culture, it has been possible to further delineate the mechanism of capillary growth. In vitro studies have shown that the mast cell seems to behave as a helper cell for capillary endothelial cells, in some way speeding up their rate of directional migration. At this writing, heparin appears to be the principal mast cell factor responsible for this effect on capillary endothelial cells. One theoretical possibility is that mast cells may prepare the matrix, perhaps by slow release of heparin, so that capillary sprouts can more easily move through it toward their angiogenic target. While the study of angiogenesis as a phenomenon is still in an early phase, it has become possible, by using a combination of in vitro and in vivo techniques, to more thoroughly understand the initiation and control of capillary growth. 
Postoperative progression of pulmonary metastasis in osteosarcoma. 
 
Early relapse with distant metastasis often is observed in patients with cancer after resection of the primary tumor. It is considered that resection of the primary tumor induces activation of systemic angiogenesis and enhances progression of remote metastasis. The authors show that resection of the primary osteosarcoma tumor enhances progression of pulmonary metastasis in animal osteosarcoma models. Matrigel plug neovascularization assay revealed that systemic angiogenic activity was elevated after primary tumor removal (tumor intact group, 1.61 +/- 0.21 g/dL; tumor removed group, 4.92 +/- 0.35 g/dL). In addition, serum concentration of the angiogenesis inhibitor, endostatin, decreased significantly after primary tumor removal. Treatment with the antiangiogenic reagent TNP-470 suppressed postoperative progression of pulmonary metastasis. These results indicate the possibility that activation of angiogenic activity after resection of osteosarcoma tumors enhances progression of pulmonary metastasis. The current data also suggest that administration of antiangiogenic reagents can prevent progression of pulmonary metastasis in osteosarcoma postoperatively. 
Nicked {beta}2-glycoprotein I binds angiostatin 4.5 (plasminogen kringle 1-5) and attenuates its antiangiogenic property. 
 
Angiostatin was first discovered as a plasminogen fragment with antitumor/antiangiogenic property. One of the angiostatin isoforms, that is, angiostatin 4.5 (AS4.5), consisting of plasminogen kringle 1 to 4 and a most part of kringle 5, is produced by autoproteolysis and present in human plasma. beta2-glycoprotein I (beta2GPI) is proteolytically cleaved by plasmin in its domain V (nicked beta2GPI), resulting in binding to plasminogen. Antiangiogenic properties have been recently reported in nicked beta2GPI as well as in intact beta2GPI at higher concentrations. In the present study, we found significant binding of nicked beta2GPI to AS4.5 (K(D) = 3.27 x 10(6) M(-1)). Via this binding, nicked beta2GPI attenuates the antiangiogenic functions of AS4.5 in the proliferation of arterial/venous endothelial cells, in the extracellular matrix invasion and the tube formation of venous endothelial cells, and in vivo angiogenesis. In contrast, intact beta2GPI does not bind to AS4.5 or inhibit its antiangiogenic activity. Thus, nicked beta2GPI exerts dual effects on angiogenesis, that is, nicked beta2GPI promotes angiogenesis in the presence of AS4.5, whereas nicked beta2GPI inhibits angiogenesis at concentrations high enough to neutralize AS4.5. Our data suggest that plasmin-nicked beta2GPI promotes angiogenesis by interacting with plasmin-generated AS4.5 in sites of increased fibrinolysis such as thrombus. 
The candidate tumour suppressor protein ING4 regulates brain tumour growth and angiogenesis. 
 
Gliomas are the most common primary tumours of the central nervous system, with nearly 15,000 diagnosed annually in the United States and a lethality approaching 80% within the first year of glioblastoma diagnosis. The marked induction of angiogenesis in glioblastomas suggests that it is a necessary part of malignant progression; however, the precise molecular mechanisms underlying the regulation of brain tumour growth and angiogenesis remain unresolved. Here we report that a candidate tumour suppressor gene, ING4, is involved in regulating brain tumour growth and angiogenesis. Expression of ING4 is significantly reduced in gliomas as compared with normal human brain tissue, and the extent of reduction correlates with the progression from lower to higher grades of tumours. In mice, xenografts of human glioblastoma U87MG, which has decreased expression of ING4, grow significantly faster and have higher vascular volume fractions than control tumours. We show that ING4 physically interacts with p65 (RelA) subunit of nuclear factor NF-kappaB, and that ING4 regulates brain tumour angiogenesis through transcriptional repression of NF-kappaB-responsive genes. These results indicate that ING4 has an important role in brain tumour pathogenesis. 
    antiangiogenic agent linomide inhibits the growth rate of von Hippel-Lindau paraganglioma xenografts to mice. 
 
The aim of this study was to ascertain the potential usefulness of  anti   angiogenic compound linomide for treatment of von Hippel-Lindau (VHL)-related tumors. Paraganglioma tissue fragments obtained at surgery from a VHL type 2a patient were transplanted s.c. to male BALB/c nu/nu (nude) mice: (a) 2-3-mm fragments for "prevention" experiments; and (b) 2-3-mm fragments allowed to grow to 1 cm for "intervention" studies. Both groups received either 0.5 mg/ml linomide in drinking water or acidified water and were followed until tumor diameter reached 3 cm or for 4 weeks. In both the prevention and intervention experiments, a significant diminution of tumor size and weight was observed in the drug-treated animals. In vivo nuclear magnetic resonance analysis of tumor blood flow in linomide treated animals showed localization of blood vessels almost exclusively to the periphery of the poorly vascularized tumors with a significant reduction of both vascular functionality and vasodilation. Histological examination of tumors from linomide treated animals revealed marked avascularity. Treated animals also displayed a 2.4-fold reduction of tumor vascular endothelial growth factor mRNA levels. Taken together, our data indicate that in VHL disease, therapy directed at inhibition of constitutively expressed VEGF induction of angiogenesis by VHL tumors may constitute an effective medical treatment. 
Enhanced IGF-1 expression improves smooth muscle cell engraftment after cell transplantation. 
 
The functional benefit of cell transplantation after a myocardial infarction is diminished by early cell losses. IGF-1 enhances cell proliferation and survival. We hypothesized that IGF-1 transfected smooth muscle cells (SMCs) would enhance cell survival and improve engraftment after cell transplantation. The IGF-1 gene was transfected into male SMCs and compared with SMCs transfected with a plasmid vector (vector control) and nontransfected SMCs (cell control). IGF-1 mRNA (n=10/group) and protein levels (n=6/group) were higher (P  less than 0.05 for all groups) at 3, 7, and 14 days compared with controls. VEGF was also increased in parallel to enhanced IGF-1 expression. IGF-1 transfected cells demonstrated greater cell proliferation, stimulated angiogenesis, and decreased caspase-3 activity after simulated ischemia and reperfusion (P  less than 0.05 for all groups compared with vector or cell controls). A uniform left ventricular injury was produced in female rats using a cryoprobe. Three weeks later, 2 x 10(6) cells from three groups were implanted into the scar. One week later, IGF-1 transfected SMCs had increased myocardial IGF-1 and VEGF levels, increased Bcl2 expression, limited cell apoptosis, and enhanced vessel formation in the myocardial scar compared with the two control groups (P  less than 0.05 for all groups). The proportion of SMCs surviving in the implanted region was greater (P  less than 0.05) in the IGF-1 transfected group than in the vector or cell controls. Gene enhancement with IGF-1 improved donor cell proliferation, survival, and engraftment after cell transplantation, perhaps mediated by enhanced angiogenesis and reduced apoptosis. 
Acute ethanol exposure disrupts VEGF receptor cell signaling in endothelial cells. 
 
Physiological angiogenesis is regulated by various factors, including signaling through vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) receptors. We previously reported that a single dose of ethanol (1.4 g/kg), yielding a blood alcohol concentration of 100 mg/dl, significantly impairs angiogenesis in murine wounds, despite adequate levels of VEGF, suggesting direct effects of ethanol on endothelial cell signaling (40). To examine the mechanism by which ethanol influences angiogenesis in wounds, we employed two different in vitro angiogenesis assays to determine whether acute ethanol exposure (100 mg/dl) would have long-lasting effects on VEGF induced capillary network formation. Ethanol exposure resulted in reduced VEGF induced cord formation on collagen and reduced capillary network structure on Matrigel in vitro. In addition, ethanol exposure decreased expression of endothelial VEGF receptor-2, as well as VEGF receptor-2 phosphorylation in vitro. Inhibition of ethanol metabolism by 4-methylpyrazole partially abrogated the effect of ethanol on endothelial cell cord formation. However, mice treated with t-butanol, an alcohol not metabolized by alcohol dehydrogenase, exhibited no change in wound vascularity. These results suggest that products of ethanol metabolism are important factors in the development of ethanol induced changes in endothelial cell responsiveness to VEGF. In vivo, ethanol exposure caused both decreased angiogenesis and increased hypoxia in wounds. Moreover, in vitro experiments demonstrated a direct effect of ethanol on the response to hypoxia in endothelial cells, as ethanol diminished nuclear hypoxia-inducible factor-1alpha protein levels. Together, the data establish that acute ethanol exposure significantly impairs angiogenesis and suggest that this effect is mediated by changes in endothelial cell responsiveness to both VEGF and hypoxia. 
Rofecoxib as adjunctive therapy for haemophilic arthropathy. 
 
Joint haemorrhage and subsequent haemophilic arthropathy are significant complications in haemophilia. The pathophysiology involves inflammation and angiogenesis. Cyclooxygenase-2 (COX-2) inhibitors are anti inflammatory agents, which have potent anti inflammatory, anti angiogenic and analgesic properties yet do not affect platelet function in the manner of traditional non-steroidal anti inflammatory drugs. These properties make such agents potentially useful as adjunctive therapy in haemophilia. There is only one prior report describing rofecoxib treatment in a single haemophilia patient. Our objectives were to determine the safety and efficacy of rofecoxib in treating acute haemarthrosis, chronic synovitis, target joints and pain. We conducted a retrospective medical record review of patients treated with rofecoxib for acute haemarthrosis, chronic synovitis, target joint or pain. The safety and efficacy of rofecoxib treatment were determined based on subjective patient reports and physical examinations during follow-up clinic visits. A total of 28 patients between 3 and 37 years of age were treated for a total of 42 courses of rofecoxib treatment. All courses were evaluated for safety and 31 for efficacy. Rofecoxib was used for eight acute haemarthrosis, four target joints, seven cases of synovitis and 12 episodes of pain. Efficacy was demonstrated particularly for chronic synovitis and pain and no serious adverse events occurred. This is the largest study to date evaluating COX-2 inhibitors as adjunctive therapy in haemophilia and suggests that these agents may be an important adjunctive therapy in the management of haemophilia. 
Alpha-melanocyte-stimulating hormone modulates activation of NF-kappa B and AP-1 and secretion of interleukin-8 in human dermal fibroblasts. 
 
Alpha-melanocyte-stimulating hormone (alpha-MSH) has evolved as a mediator of diverse biological activities in an ever growing number of non-melanocytic cell types. One mechanism by which alpha-MSH exerts its effects is modulation of AP-1 and NF-kappa B. These two transcription factors also play an important role in fibroblasts, in extracellular matrix composition, and in cytokine expression. By use of electric mobility shift assays, we demonstrate that alpha-MSH (10(-6) to 10(-14) M) activates AP-1 in human dermal fibroblasts, whereas coincubation with interleukin-1 beta (IL-1 beta) results in suppression of its activation. alpha-MSH also induces activation of NF-kappa B but does not modulate DNA binding on costimulation with IL-1 beta. Since AP-1 and NF-kappa B are key elements in controlling interleukin-8 (IL-8) transcription, human fibroblasts were treated with alpha-MSH and IL-1 beta for 24 hours, and cytokine levels in the supernatants were measured by ELISA. alpha-MSH alone had little effect, whereas coincubation with IL-1 beta led to marked downregulation of IL-8 secretion (at most 288 +/- 152 ng/mL) when compared to treatment with IL-1 beta alone (919 +/- 157 ng/mL). Our results indicate that alpha-MSH exerts modulatory effects on the activation of NF-kappa B and AP-1, and that it can regulate chemokine secretion in human dermal fibroblasts. These effects of alpha-MSH may have important regulatory functions in extracellular matrix composition, wound healing, or angiogenesis. 
A key role for the integrin alpha2beta1 in experimental and developmental angiogenesis. 
 
The alpha2beta1 integrin receptor plays a key role in angiogenesis. Here we investigated the effects of small molecule inhibitors (SMIs) designed to disrupt integrin alpha2 I or beta1 I-like domain function on angiogenesis. In unchallenged endothelial cells, fibrillar collagen induced robust capillary morphogenesis. In contrast, tube formation was significantly reduced by SMI496, a beta1 I-like domain inhibitor and by function-blocking anti-alpha2beta1 but not -alpha1beta1 antibodies. Endothelial cells bound fluorescein labeled collagen I fibrils, an interaction specifically inhibited by SMI496. Moreover, SMI496 caused cell retraction and cytoskeletal collapse of endothelial cells as well as delayed endothelial cell wound healing. SMI activities were examined in vivo by supplementing the growth medium of zebrafish embryos expressing green fluorescent protein under the control of the vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-2 promoter. SMI496, but not a control compound, interfered with angiogenesis in vivo by reversibly inhibiting sprouting from the axial vessels. We further characterized zebrafish alpha2 integrin and discovered that this integrin is highly conserved, especially the I domain. Notably, a similar vascular phenotype was induced by morpholino-mediated knockdown of the integrin alpha2 subunit. By live videomicroscopy, we confirmed that the vessels were largely nonfunctional in the absence of alpha2beta1 integrin. Collectively, our results provide strong biochemical and genetic evidence of a central role for alpha2beta1 integrin in experimental and developmental angiogenesis. 
New vectors and strategies for cardiovascular gene therapy. 
 
Cardiovascular diseases are the major cause of morbidity and mortality in both men and women in industrially developed countries. These disorders may result from impaired angiogenesis, particularly in response to hypoxia. Despite many limitations, gene therapy is still emerging as a potential alternative for patients who are not candidates for traditional revascularization procedures, like angioplasty or vein grafts. This review focuses on recent approaches in the development of new gene delivery vectors, with great respect to newly discovered AAV serotypes and their modified forms. Moreover, some new cardiovascular gene therapy strategies have been highlighted, such as combination of different angiogenic growth factors or simultaneous application of genes and progenitor cells in order to obtain stable and functional blood vessels in ischemic tissue. 
Allogeneic injection of fetal membrane-derived mesenchymal stem cells induces therapeutic angiogenesis in a rat model of hind limb ischemia. 
 
Bone marrow-derived mesenchymal stem cells (BM-MSC) have been demonstrated to be an attractive therapeutic cell source for tissue regeneration and repair. However, it remains unknown whether or not allogeneic transplantation of mesenchymal stem cells (MSC) derived from fetal membranes (FM), which are generally discarded as medical waste after delivery, has therapeutic potential. FM-MSC were obtained from Lewis rats and had surface antigen expression and multipotent potential partly similar to those of BM-MSC. Compared with BM-MSC, FM-MSC secreted a comparable amount of hepatocyte growth factor despite a small amount of vascular endothelial growth factor. FM-MSC and BM-MSC both expressed major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I but not MHC class II antigens and did not elicit allogeneic lymphocyte proliferation in mixed lymphocyte culture. FM-MSC or BM-MSC obtained from Lewis rats were injected into a MHC-mismatched August-Copenhagen-Irish rat model of hind limb ischemia. Three weeks after injection, blood perfusion and capillary density were significantly higher in the FM-MSC and BM-MSC groups than in the phosphate-buffered saline group, and allogeneic FM-MSC and BM-MSC were still observed. In nonischemic hind limb tissues, allogeneic FM-MSC and BM-MSC injection were associated with a comparatively small amount of T lymphocyte infiltration, compared with the injection of allogeneic splenic lymphocytes. In conclusion, allogeneic FM-MSC injection did not elicit a lymphocyte proliferative response and provided significant improvement in a rat model of hind limb ischemia, comparable to the response to BM-MSC. Thus, allogeneic injection of FM-MSC may be a new therapeutic strategy for the treatment of severe peripheral vascular disease. Disclosure of potential conflicts of interest is found at the end of this article. 
Ovarian cancers overexpress the antimicrobial protein hCAP-18 and its derivative LL-37 increases ovarian cancer cell proliferation and invasion. 
 
The role of the pro-inflammatory peptide, LL-37, and its pro-form, human cationic antimicrobial protein 18 (hCAP-18), in cancer development and progression is poorly understood. In damaged and inflamed tissue, LL-37 functions as a chemoattractant, mitogen and pro angiogenic factor suggesting that the peptide may potentiate tumor progression. The aim of this study was to characterize the distribution of hCAP-18/LL-37 in normal and cancerous ovarian tissue and to examine the effects of LL-37 on ovarian cancer cells. Expression of hCAP-18/LL-37 was localized to immune and granulosa cells of normal ovarian tissue. By contrast, ovarian tumors displayed significantly higher levels of hCAP-18/LL-37 where expression was observed in tumor and stromal cells. Protein expression was statistically compared to the degree of immune cell infiltration and microvessel density in epithelial-derived ovarian tumors and a significant correlation was observed for both. It was demonstrated that ovarian tumor tissue lysates and ovarian cancer cell lines express hCAP-18/LL-37. Treatment of ovarian cancer cell lines with recombinant LL-37 stimulated proliferation, chemotaxis, invasion and matrix metalloproteinase expression. These data demonstrate for the first time that hCAP-18/LL-37 is significantly overexpressed in ovarian tumors and suggest LL-37 may contribute to ovarian tumorigenesis through direct stimulation of tumor cells, initiation of angiogenesis and recruitment of immune cells. These data provide further evidence of the existing relationship between pro-inflammatory molecules and ovarian cancer progression. 
M-CSF signals through the MAPK/ERK pathway via Sp1 to induce VEGF production and induces angiogenesis in vivo. 
 
BACKGROUND: M-CSF recruits mononuclear phagocytes which regulate processes such as angiogenesis and metastases in tumors. VEGF is a potent activator of angiogenesis as it promotes endothelial cell proliferation and new blood vessel formation. Previously, we reported that in vitro M-CSF induces the expression of biologically-active VEGF from human monocytes. METHODOLOGY AND RESULTS: In this study, we demonstrate the molecular mechanism of M-CSF induced VEGF production. Using a construct containing the VEGF promoter linked to a luciferase reporter, we found that a mutation reducing HIF binding to the VEGF promoter had no significant effect on luciferase production induced by M-CSF stimulation. Further analysis revealed that M-CSF induced VEGF through the MAPK/ERK signaling pathway via the transcription factor, Sp1. Thus, inhibition of either ERK or Sp1 suppressed M-CSF induced VEGF at the mRNA and protein level. M-CSF also induced the nuclear localization of Sp1, which was blocked by ERK inhibition. Finally, mutating the Sp1 binding sites within the VEGF promoter or inhibiting ERK decreased VEGF promoter activity in M-CSF treated human monocytes. To evaluate the biological significance of M-CSF induced VEGF production, we used an in vivo angiogenesis model to illustrate the ability of M-CSF to recruit mononuclear phagocytes, increase VEGF levels, and enhance angiogenesis. Importantly, the addition of a neutralizing VEGF antibody abolished M-CSF induced blood vessel formation. CONCLUSION: These data delineate an ERK- and Sp1 dependent mechanism of M-CSF induced VEGF production and demonstrate for the first time the ability of M-CSF to induce angiogenesis via VEGF in vivo. 
Angiogenesis in platelet endothelial cell adhesion molecule-1 null mice. 
 
Platelet endothelial cell adhesion molecule (PECAM)-1 has been previously implicated in endothelial cell migration; additionally, anti-PECAM-1 antibodies have been shown to inhibit in vivo angiogenesis. Studies were therefore performed with PECAM-1 null mice to further define the involvement of PECAM-1 in blood vessel formation. Vascularization of subcutaneous Matrigel implants as well as tumor angiogenesis were both inhibited in PECAM-1 null mice. Reciprocal bone marrow transplants that involved both wild-type and PECAM-1 deficient mice revealed that the impaired angiogenic response resulted from a loss of endothelial, but not leukocyte, PECAM-1. In vitro wound migration and single-cell motility by PECAM-1 null endothelial cells were also compromised. In addition, filopodia formation, a feature of motile cells, was inhibited in PECAM-1 null endothelial cells as well as in human endothelial cells treated with either anti-PECAM-1 antibody or PECAM-1 siRNA. Furthermore, the expression of PECAM-1 promoted filopodia formation and increased the protein expression levels of Cdc42, a Rho GTPase that is known to promote the formation of filopodia. In the developing retinal vasculature, numerous, long filamentous filopodia, emanating from endothelial cells at the tips of angiogenic sprouts, were observed in wild-type animals, but to a lesser extent in the PECAM-1 null mice. Together, these data further establish the involvement of endothelial PECAM-1 in angiogenesis and suggest that, in vivo, PECAM-1 may stimulate endothelial cell motility by promoting the formation of filopodia. 
Regulation of the composition of the extracellular matrix by low density lipoprotein receptor-related protein-1: activities based on regulation of mRNA expression. 
 
Low density lipoprotein receptor-related protein-1 (LRP-1) is a catabolic receptor for extracellular matrix (ECM) structural proteins and for proteins that bind to ECM. LRP-1 also is implicated in integrin maturation. In this study, we applied a proteomics strategy to identify novel proteins involved in ECM modeling that are regulated by LRP-1. We show that LRP-1 deficiency in murine embryonic fibroblasts (MEFs) is associated with increased levels of type III collagen and pigment epithelium-derived factor, which accumulate in the substratum surrounding cells. The collagen receptor, uPAR-AP/Endo-180, is also increased in LRP-1 deficient MEFs. Human LRP-1 reversed the changes in protein expression associated with LRP-1 deficiency; however, the endocytic activity of LRP-1 was not involved. Instead, regulation occurred at the mRNA level. Inhibition of c-Jun amino-terminal kinase (JNK) blocked type III collagen expression in LRP-1 deficient MEFs, suggesting regulation of JNK activity as a mechanism by which LRP-1 controls mRNA expression. The ability of LRP-1 to regulate expression of the factors identified here suggests a role for LRP-1 in determining blood vessel structure and in angiogenesis. 
Role of thrombogenic factors in the development of atherosclerosis. 
 
Hemostatic factors play a crucial role in generating thrombotic plugs at sites of vascular damage (atherothrombosis). However, whether hemostatic factors contribute directly or indirectly to the pathogenesis of atherosclerosis remains uncertain. Autopsy studies have revealed that intimal thickening represents the first stage of atherosclerosis and that lipid-rich plaque arises from such lesions. Several factors contribute to the start of intimal thickening. Platelets release several growth factors and bioactive agents that play a central role in development of not only thrombus but also of intimal thickening. We have been investigating which coagulation factors simultaneously, or subsequently with platelet aggregation, participate in thrombus formation. Tissue factor (TF) is an essential initiator of blood coagulation that is expressed in various stages of atherosclerotic lesions in humans and other animals. Factors including thrombin and fibrin, which are downstream of the coagulation cascade activated by TF, also contribute to atherosclerosis. TF is involved in cell migration, embryogenesis and angiogenesis. Thus TF, in addition to factors downstream of the coagulation cascade and the protease-activated receptor 2 activation system, would be a multifactorial regulator of atherogenesis. 
New functions of epidermal growth factor: stimulation of capillary endothelial cell migration and matrix dependent proliferation. 
 
The proliferative response of bovine retinal capillary endothelial cells to EGF is dependent upon attaching the cells to a matrix of fibronectin. Bovine capillary endothelial cells are also stimulated to actively migrate when exposed to EGF in vitro. These activities provide an explanation for the angiogenic properties of EGF in vivo. Capillary cell migration and proliferation are proposed as sensitive quantifiable bioassays to explore the functional domains of the EGF molecule. Studies on the inactivation of these properties of EGF by specific cleavage of the molecule with CNBr or proteases suggest that an intact loop composed in part by amino acid residues 20 to 31 is essential for at least some functions. 
Islet endothelial activation and oxidative stress gene expression is reduced by IL-1Ra treatment in the type 2 diabetic GK rat. 
 
BACKGROUND: Inflammation followed by fibrosis is a component of islet dysfunction in both rodent and human type 2 diabetes. Because islet inflammation may originate from endothelial cells, we assessed the expression of selected genes involved in endothelial cell activation in islets from a spontaneous model of type 2 diabetes, the Goto-Kakizaki (GK) rat. We also examined islet endotheliuml/oxidative stress (OS)/inflammation related gene expression, islet vascularization and fibrosis after treatment with the interleukin-1 (IL-1) receptor antagonist (IL-1Ra). METHODOLOGY/PRINCIPAL FINDINGS: Gene expression was analyzed by quantitative RT-PCR on islets isolated from 10-week-old diabetic GK and control Wistar rats. Furthermore, GK rats were treated s.c twice daily with IL-1Ra (Kineret, Amgen, 100 mg/kg/day) or saline, from 4 weeks of age onwards (onset of diabetes). Four weeks later, islet gene analysis and pancreas immunochemistry were performed. Thirty-two genes were selected encoding molecules involved in endothelial cell activation, particularly fibrinolysis, vascular tone, OS, angiogenesis and also inflammation. All genes except those encoding angiotensinogen and epoxide hydrolase  that were decreased , and 12-lipoxygenase and vascular endothelial growth factor  that showed no change , were significantly up-regulated in GK islets. After IL-1Ra treatment of GK rats in vivo, most selected genes implied in endothelium/OS/immune cells/fibrosis were significantly down-regulated. IL-1Ra also improved islet vascularization, reduced fibrosis and ameliorated glycemia. CONCLUSIONS/SIGNIFICANCE: GK rat islets have increased mRNA expression of markers of early islet endothelial cell activation, possibly triggered by several metabolic factors, and also some defense mechanisms. The beneficial effect of IL-1Ra on most islet endothelial/OS/immune cells/fibrosis parameters analyzed highlights a major endothelial related role for IL-1 in GK islet alterations. Thus, metabolically altered islet endothelium might affect the beta-cell microenvironment and contribute to progressive type 2 diabetic beta-cell dysfunction in GK rats. Counteracting islet endothelial cell inflammation might be one way to ameliorate/prevent beta-cell dysfunction in type 2 diabetes. 
Expression and purification of the catalytic domain of human vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2 for inhibitor screening. 
 
Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), an endothelial cell-specific mitogen, can act in tumor induced angiogenesis by binding to specific receptors on the surface of endothelial cells. One such receptor, VEGFR-2/KDR, plays a key role in VEGF induced angiogenesis. Here, we expressed the catalytic domain of VEGFR-2 as a soluble active kinase using Bac-to-Bac expression system, and investigated correlations between VEGFR-2 activity and enzyme concentration, ATP concentration, substrate concentration and divalent cation type. We used these data to establish a convenient, effective and non-radioactive ELISA screening technique for the identification and evaluation of potential inhibitors for VEGFR-2 kinase. We screened 200 RTK target-based compounds and identified one (TKI-31) that potently inhibited VEGFR-2 kinase activity (IC50=0.596 microM). Treatment of NIH3T3/KDR cells with TKI-31 blocked VEGF induced phosphorylation of KDR in a dose-dependent manner. Moreover, TKI-31 dose-dependently suppressed HUVEC tube formation. Thus, we herein report a novel, efficient method for identifying VEGFR-2 kinase inhibitors and introduce one, TKI-31, that may prove to be a useful new angiogenesis inhibitor. 
Contemporary perspectives on vital pulp therapy: views from the endodontists and pediatric dentists. 
 
The purpose of this study was to determine the level of agreement between pediatric dentists and endodontists at a pulp therapy symposium conjointly sponsored by the American Association of Endodontists (AAE) and the American Academy of Pediatric Dentistry (AAPD) on November 2-3, 2007. Presymposium and postsymposium tests were administered, and respondent answers were compared between pediatric dentists and endodontists. Opinions on 3 areas were sought: pulp therapy for cariously involved primary teeth; indirect pulp treatment (IPT) for cariously involved immature permanent teeth; and innovative treatment options including pulpal revascularization and regeneration. Results were analyzed with chi2 tests. Comparisons of presymposium and postsymposium responses and between the 2 groups of attendees indicated that the pediatric dentistry and endodontic communities agree that formocresol will be replaced as a primary tooth pulpotomy agent, that mineral trioxide is the first choice to take its place, that IPT in primary teeth holds hope as a replacement for pulpotomy, and that IPT is an acceptable pulp therapy technique for cariously involved young permanent teeth. Both groups believe that pulp revascularization and regeneration will be viable treatment modalities in the future. The AAE and the AAPD are positioned to begin preparation of best practice guidelines that share common language and treatment recommendations for pulp therapies performed by both specialties. 
Regulation of tumor angiogenesis by thrombospondin-1. 
 
Angiogenesis plays a critical role in the growth and metastasis of tumors. Thrombospondin-1 (TSP-1) is a potent angiogenesis inhibitor, and down-regulation of TSP-1 has been suggested to alter tumor growth by modulating angiogenesis in a variety of tumor types. Expression of TSP-1 is up-regulated by the tumor suppressor gene, p53, and down-regulated by oncogenes such as Myc and Ras. TSP-1 inhibits angiogenesis by inhibiting endothelial cell migration and proliferation and by inducing apoptosis. In addition, activation of transforming growth factor beta (TGF-beta) by TSP-1 plays a crucial role in the regulation of tumor progression. An understanding of the molecular basis of TSP-1-mediated inhibition of angiogenesis and tumor progression will aid in the development of novel therapeutics for the treatment of cancer. 
Glioma tumor stem-like cells promote tumor angiogenesis and vasculogenesis via vascular endothelial growth factor and stromal-derived factor 1. 
 
Cancer stem cells (CSC) are predicted to be critical drivers of tumor progression due to their self-renewal capacity and limitless proliferative potential. An emerging area of research suggests that CSC may also support tumor progression by promoting tumor angiogenesis. To investigate how CSC contribute to tumor vascular development, we used an approach comparing tumor xenografts of the C6 glioma cell line containing either a low or a high fraction of CSC. Compared with CSC-low tumors, CSC-high tumors exhibited increased microvessel density and blood perfusion and induced increased mobilization and tumor recruitment of bone marrow-derived endothelial progenitor cells (EPC). CSC-high C6 cell cultures also induced higher levels of endothelial cell proliferation and tubule organization in vitro compared with CSC-low cultures. CSC-high cultures and tumors expressed increased level of the pro angiogenic factors vascular endothelial growth factor and stromal-derived factor 1, and when signaling by either factor was blocked, all aspects of angiogenesis observed in CSC-high cultures and tumors, including microvessel density, perfusion, EPC mobilization/recruitment, and stimulation of endothelial cell activity, were reduced to levels comparable with those observed in CSC-low cultures/tumors. These results suggest that CSC contribute to tumor angiogenesis by promoting both local endothelial cell activity and systemic angiogenic processes involving bone marrow-derived EPC in a vascular endothelial growth factor dependent and stromal-derived factor 1 dependent manner. 
An antibody directed against PDGF receptor beta enhances the antitumor and the anti angiogenic activities of an anti VEGF receptor 2 antibody. 
 
Platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) and its receptors (PDGFR) play important roles in tumorigenesis through stimulating tumor growth and promoting angiogenesis via enhancing pericyte recruitment and vessel maturation. Here we produced a neutralizing antibody, 1B3, directed against mouse PDGFRbeta. 1B3 binds to PDGFRbeta with high affinity (9x10(-11)M) and blocks PDGF-BB from binding to the receptor with an IC(50) of approximately 1.2 nM. The antibody also blocks ligand-stimulated activation of PDGFRbeta and downstream signaling molecules, including Akt and MAPK p42/44, in tumor cells. In animal studies, 1B3 significantly enhanced the antitumor and the anti angiogenic activities of DC101, an antibody directed against mouse vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2, in a pancreatic (BxPC-3) and a non-small cell lung (NCI-H460) tumor xenograft models. Treatment with the combination of 1B3 and DC101 in BxPC-3 xenograft-bearing mice resulted in tumor regression in 58% of mice compared to that in 18% of mice treated with DC101 alone. Taken together, these results lend great support to use PDGFRbeta antagonists in combinations with other antitumor and/or anti angiogenic agents in the treatment of a variety of cancers. 
Laser treatment of eccentric leaks in central serous chorioretinopathy resulting in disappearance of untreated juxtafoveal leaks. 
 
In central serous chorioretinopathy (CSCR) laser treatment of leaking points close to the macular center should be avoided because of the possibility of producing juxtafoveal scotoma and stimulating choroidal neovascularization. Nine eyes of nine consecutive patients with CSCR had two or more leaking points within a macular detachment, one of which was foveal or near to the fovea. Photocoagulation with green argon laser was performed in all eyes, treating all the leaking points except for the central one. Visual symptoms regressed after treatment, and the serous detachment was resolved 10 days to 4 weeks after photocoagulation in all cases. Fluorescein angiography showed no leakage at either the central leakage point or the leakage point that had been treated. These results led us to believe that the central or dependent leak in our cases was not sufficient to maintain the serous detachment by itself. An alternative hypothesis is that the untreated leak did not represent real fluid movement but only diffusion of fluorescein molecules, or a false leak. In cases of CSCR with multiple leaks within a single macular detachment, we believe that a foveal leak may be a dependent or false leak and that direct treatment is not necessary. 
Induction of Ets-1 in endothelial cells during reendothelialization after denuding injury. 
 
Ets-1, a transcription factor, is induced in endothelial cells (ECs) during angiogenesis. Here, we investigated the expression of Ets-1 during reendothelialization. When a confluent monolayer of human umbilical vein endothelial cell line, ECV304, was denuded, ECV304 at the wound edge expressed Ets-1. An immunohistochemical analysis revealed that Ets-1 accumulated in migrating cells at the wound edge and returned to basal level when reendothelialization was accomplished. This induction of Ets-1 could be reproduced in in vivo denudation of rat aortic endothelium by a balloon catheter. The induction of Ets-1 in ECs after denudation was regulated transcriptionally, and humeral factors released from injured ECs might not be responsible. Mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) activities were investigated to explore the mechanism of this induction. Although extracellular signal-regulated protein kinase 1/2 (ERK1/2), c-Jun N-terminal kinase 1 (JNK1), and p38 were activated after denudation, the activation of ERK1 and p38 was more rapid and prominent. PD98059, a specific MAPK/ERK kinase (MEK) 1 inhibitor, did not affect the induction of ets-1 mRNA, whereas SB203580, a specific p38 inhibitor, almost completely abrogated its induction. These results indicate that Ets-1 is induced in ECs after denudation through activation of p38. This induction of Ets-1 may be relevant for reendothelialization by regulating the expression of certain genes. 
Expression, regulation, and function of IGF-1, IGF-1R, and IGF-1 binding proteins in blood vessels. 
 
The vascular insulin-like growth factor (IGF)-1 system includes the IGFs, the IGF-1 receptor (IGF-1R), and multiple binding proteins. This growth factor system exerts multiple physiologic effects on the vasculature through both endocrine and autocrine/paracrine mechanisms. The effects of IGF-1 are mediated principally through the IGF-1R but are modulated by complex interactions with multiple IGF binding proteins that themselves are regulated by phosphorylation, proteolysis, polymerization, and cell or matrix association. During the last decade, a significant body of evidence has accumulated, indicating that expression of the components of the IGF system are regulated by multiple factors, including growth factors, cytokines, lipoproteins, reactive oxygen species, and hemodynamic forces. In addition, cross-talk between the IGF system and other growth factors and integrin receptors has been demonstrated. There is accumulating evidence of a role for IGF-1 in multiple vascular pathologies, including atherosclerosis, hypertension, restenosis, angiogenesis, and diabetic vascular disease. This review will discuss the regulation of expression of IGF-1, IGF-1R, and IGF binding proteins in the vasculature and summarize evidence implicating involvement of this system in vascular diseases. 
Targeting TNF for Treatment of Cancer and Autoimmunity. 
 
Tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) was first isolated two decades ago as a macrophageproduced protein that can effectively kill tumor cells. TNF-alpha is also an essential component of the immune system and is required for hematopoiesis, for protection from bacterial infection and for immune cell-mediated cytotoxicity. Extensive research, however, has revealed that TNF-alpha is one of the major players in tumor initiation, proliferation, invasion, angiogenesis and metastasis. The proinflammatory activities link TNF-alpha with a wide variety of autoimmune diseases, including psoriasis, inflammatory bowel disease, rheumatoid arthritis, systemic sclerosis, systemic lupus erythematosus, multiple sclerosis, diabetes and ankylosing spondylitis. Systemic inhibitors of TNF such as etanercept (Enbrel) (a soluble TNF receptor) and infliximab (Remicade) and adalimumab (Humira) (anti-TNF antibodies) have been approved for the treatment inflammatory bowel disease, psoriasis and rheumatoid arthritis. These drugs, however, exhibit severe side effects and are expensive. Hence orally active blockers of TNF-alpha that are safe, efficacious and inexpensive are urgently needed. Numerous products from fruits, vegetable and traditional medicinal plants have been described which can suppress TNF expression and TNF signaling but their clinical potential is yet uncertain. 
Suppression of lung tumor growth and metastasis in mice by adeno-associated virus mediated expression of vasostatin. 
 
PURPOSE: Angiogenesis inhibitors have strong therapeutic potential as antitumor agents in suppressing tumor growth and metastatic progression. Vasostatin, the N-terminal domain of calreticulin, is a potent angiogenesis inhibitor. In this study, we determined the effectiveness of vasostatin delivered by recombinant pseudotype adeno-associated virus 2/5 (rAAV2/5-VAS) as a gene therapy approach for lung cancer treatment. EXPERIMENTAL DESIGN: We used rAAV2/5 to deliver vasostatin intratumorally or systemically in different mouse lung tumor models--subcutaneous, orthotopic xenograft, and spontaneous metastasis lung tumor models. The therapeutic efficacy of rAAV2/5-VAS was determined by monitoring tumor volume, survival rate, and degree of neovascularization after treatment in these models. RESULTS: Mice bearing subcutaneous tumor of rAAV2/5-VAS pretreated Lewis lung carcinoma cells showed >50% reduction in primary tumor volume and reduced spontaneous pulmonary metastases. The tumor-suppressive action of rAAV2/5-VAS in subcutaneous human lung tumor A549 xenograft correlated with a reduced number of capillary vessels in tumors. In the orthotopic xenograft model, rAAV2/5-VAS suppressed metastasis of A549 tumors to mediastinal lymph nodes and contralateral lung. Furthermore, treatment of immunocompetent mice in the spontaneous lung metastases model with rAAV2/5-VAS after primary tumor excision prolonged their median survival from 21 to 51.5 days. CONCLUSION: Our results show the effectiveness of rAAV2/5-VAS as an angiogenesis inhibitor in suppressing tumor growth during different stages of tumor progression, validating the application of rAAV2/5-VAS gene therapy in treatment against lung cancer. 
2-methoxyestradiol inhibits hypoxia-inducible factor 1alpha, tumor growth, and angiogenesis and augments paclitaxel efficacy in head and neck squamous cell carcinoma. 
 
PURPOSE: Head and neck squamous cell carcinomas have been reported to overexpress hypoxia-inducible factor (HIF)-1alpha, a transcription factor that promotes expression of angiogenesis factors and resistance to programmed and therapy-induced cell death. 2-Methoxyestradiol (2ME2) is a natural compound with HIF-1alpha inhibitory activity that is currently being evaluated in phase 1 and 2 clinical trials for advanced solid tumors and multiple myeloma. To our knowledge, this is the first study to evaluate the effects of 2ME2 in head and neck squamous cell carcinoma. EXPERIMENTAL DESIGN: In the present study, we investigated the effects of 2ME2 alone and in combination with paclitaxel, an active agent in recurrent or advanced head and neck squamous cell carcinoma. RESULTS: 2ME2 exhibited antiproliferative and cytotoxic effects in a panel of five head and neck squamous cell carcinoma cell lines in the 0.5 to 10 micromol/L range, including induction of G2-M blockade, caspase-3/7 activation, and apoptosis at 48 hours. 2ME2 resulted in decreased nuclear HIF-1alpha-binding activity and affected the expression of downstream genes, such as bid, a proapoptotic bcl-2 family member, and vascular endothelial growth factor, a proangiogenic cytokine. The up-regulation of Bid (57.5% at 12 hours, P  less than  0.0006) and inhibition of vascular endothelial growth factor secretion (57.7% at 24 hours, P  less than  0.015; and 50.3% at 48 hours, P  less than  0.0006) could be partially attributed to the effects on HIF-1alpha, because HIF-1alpha small interfering RNAs produced similar effects. Finally, in vivo, in a xenograft model of head and neck squamous cell carcinoma using UM-SCC-11A cells, 2ME2 exhibited antitumor and antiangiogenic activity, as measured by CD31 immunostaining. CONCLUSIONS: These results provide support for the use of 2ME2 in combination with paclitaxel for the treatment of recurrent or advanced head and neck squamous cell carcinoma. 
Radiation retinopathy is treatable with anti-vascular endothelial growth factor bevacizumab (Avastin). 
 
PURPOSE: To report on bevacizumab treatment for radiation retinopathy affecting the macula. PATIENTS AND METHODS: Twenty-one patients with radiation retinopathy (edema, hemorrhages, capillary dropout, and neovascularization) and a subjective or objective loss of vision were treated. Treatment involved intravitreal injection of bevacizumab (1.25 mg in 0.05 mL) every 6-12 weeks. Treatment was discontinued at patient request or if there was no measurable response to therapy. Main outcome measures included best corrected visual acuity, ophthalmic examination, retinal photography, and angiography. RESULTS: Bevacizumab treatment was followed by reductions in retinal hemorrhage, exudation, and edema. Visual acuities were stable or improved in 86% (n=18). Three patients discontinued therapy. Each was legally blind before treatment (n=1), experienced little to no subjective improvement (n=2), or was poorly compliant (n=2). Three patients (14%) regained 2 or more lines of visual acuity. No ocular or systemic bevacizumab-related side effects were observed. CONCLUSIONS: Intravitreal bevacizumab can be used to treat radiation retinopathy. In most cases treatment was associated with decreased vascular leakage, stabilization, or improved vision. An anti-vascular endothelial growth factor strategy may reduce tissue damage associated with radiation vasculopathy and neuropathy. 
Clinical significance of chicken ovalbumin upstream promoter-transcription factor II expression in human colorectal cancer. 
 
Chicken ovalbumin upstream promoter-transcription factor II (COUP-TFII) plays an essential role in angiogenesis and development. A previous study showed that the expression of COUP-TFII enhanced invasiveness of human lung carcinoma cells. However, no published data are available concerning the biological and clinical significance of COUP-TFII expression in colorectal cancer. Thus, our objective was to explore the expression of COUP-TFII in colorectal cancer as well as its association with clinicopathological features, and to evaluate the role of COUP-TFII as a prognostic indicator in colorectal cancer. We investigated the presence of COUP-TFII in human colorectal cancer tissues and adjacent normal tissues from 95 primary colorectal cancer patients by immunohistochemistry. The correlation between the expression of COUP-TFII and clinicopathologic features was investigated. The 3-year disease-free survival (DFS) and overall survival (OS) of patients with tumors expressing different levels of COUP-TFII were evaluated by the Kaplan-Meier method. No significant correlation was found between COUP-TFII expression and age at surgery, gender, histopathologic differentiation, vessel invasion, carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), or nodal involvement. However, survival analysis showed that the COUP-TFII positive group had a significantly better OS compared to COUP-TFII negative group (80.4% vs. 57.7%, P=0.0491). Based on our results, COUP-TFII may represent a biomarker for good prognosis in colorectal cancer. 
Impact of tumor cell VEGF expression on the in vivo efficacy of vandetanib (ZACTIMA; ZD6474). 
 
VEGF is the key player in tumor angiogenesis. In the current study, the impact of VEGF expression on the response of tumors to the VEGFR2 associated tyrosine kinase inhibitor vandetanib was evaluated. MATERIALS AND METHODS: Human colon carcinoma (HT29) and murine squamous carcinoma (SCCVII) clonal cell lines expressing varying levels of VEGF were established and their response to vandetanib was assessed in tissue culture and as solid tumors. RESULTS: Vandetanib treatment had no effect on tumor cell clonogenic cell survival in vitro but doses >or=10 nM significantly reduced endothelial cell migration. In vivo, tumors derived from cell clones expressing high levels of VEGF displayed significantly enhanced angiogenesis and more aggressive growth. An intradermal angiogenesis assay was used to demonstrate that a 4-day treatment with vandetanib (50 mg/kg/day) was able to significantly inhibit blood vessel growth induced by both parental and high VEGF expressing tumor cell clones. In the HT29 tumor model, treatment response to vandetanib (50 mg/kg/day, Monday-Friday for 2 weeks) was greatest in xenografts derived from the highest VEGF expressing cell clones. A similar trend was noted in the SCCVII tumor model. The present findings indicate that vandetanib therapy effectively counteracted the aggressive feature of tumor growth resulting from VEGF over-expressing tumor cells and suggest that such tumors may be particularly well suited for anti-VEGF interventions. 
Circulating endothelial cells in malignant disease. 
 
Cancer is a disease largely dependent on neoangiogenesis. Cancer neoangiogenesis is often disordered and abnormal, with evidence of coexisting vascular endothelial dysfunction. A novel method of assessing vascular endothelial function in cancer is via the quantification of circulating endothelial cells (CEC). Unusual in healthy individuals, their presence in elevated numbers often indicates substantial vascular endothelial perturbation. Another interesting cell type is the endothelial progenitor cell (EPC), whose numbers increase in the presence of vascular damage. Recent research suggests that EPCs have an important role in tumor vasculogenesis. Another marker being investigated in the context of vascular dysfunction and coagulopathy is the endothelial microparticle (EMP). Thus, CECs, EPCs and EMPs may represent potentially novel methods for evaluating the vascular status of cancer patients. This review will summarize the current position of CECs, EPCs and EMPs in cell biology terms, with particular emphasis on their relationship to malignant disease. 
Increased serum levels of vascular endothelial growth factor in patients with renal cell carcinoma. 
 
Neovascularization, an essential event for the growth of solid tumors, is regulated by a number of angiogenic factors. One such factor, vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), is considered to exert a potent angiogenic activity, as indicated by immunohistochemical and molecular evidence. In this study we investigated the serum VEGF level (s-VEGF) in patients with renal cell carcinoma (RCC). s-VEGF in peripheral blood samples was analyzed in 40 RCC patients and 40 patients without cancer (controls) using a sandwich enzyme-linked immunoassay. In 20 RCC patients, serum samples were obtained separately from the bilateral renal veins. s-VEGF was also measured before, 4 and 8 weeks after nephrectomy in 11 patients. There were significant differences in s-VEGF between the RCC patients and the controls (207.3+/-32.9 vs. 71.5+/-9.1 pg/ml, mean+/-SE) (P less than 0.005), between the tumor-bearing renal veins and the contralateral ones (P less than 0.01), between the pre- and post-nephrectomy situations (P less than 0.01) and among the various parameters of tumor status such as tumor extent (P less than 0.001) and existence of metastasis (P less than 0.001). s-VEGF significantly correlated with the tumor volume obtained by a three-dimensional measurement (r=0.802, P less than 0.0001). The sensitivity and specificity of s-VEGF at the cut-off level of 100 pg/ml, as determined by the receiver-operating-characteristics curve, were 80.0% and 72.5%, respectively. The results indicate that tumor tissue of RCC liberates VEGF into the systemic blood flow and that s-VEGF is a possible marker for RCC. 
Punica granatum (pomegranate) and its potential for prevention and treatment of inflammation and cancer. 
 
The last 7 years have seen over seven times as many publications indexed by Medline dealing with pomegranate and Punica granatum than in all the years preceding them. Because of this, and the virtual explosion of interest in pomegranate as a medicinal and nutritional product that has followed, this review is accordingly launched. The pomegranate tree, Punica granatum, especially its fruit, possesses a vast ethnomedical history and represents a phytochemical reservoir of heuristic medicinal value. The tree/fruit can be divided into several anatomical compartments: (1) seed, (2) juice, (3) peel, (4) leaf, (5) flower, (6) bark, and (7) roots, each of which has interesting pharmacologic activity. Juice and peels, for example, possess potent antioxidant properties, while juice, peel and oil are all weakly estrogenic and heuristically of interest for the treatment of menopausal symptoms and sequellae. The use of juice, peel and oil have also been shown to possess anticancer activities, including interference with tumor cell proliferation, cell cycle, invasion and angiogenesis. These may be associated with plant based anti-inflammatory effects, The phytochemistry and pharmacological actions of all Punica granatum components suggest a wide range of clinical applications for the treatment and prevention of cancer, as well as other diseases where chronic inflammation is believed to play an essential etiologic role. 
Thrombospondins, metallo proteases and thrombospondin receptors messenger RNA and protein expression in different tumour sublines of the Dunning prostate cancer model. 
 
Thrombospondin is a potent inhibitor of angiogenesis and might therefore be important in controlling tumour growth. TSP interacts with a number of proteases and receptors and in this way inhibits stimulation of angiogenesis. An earlier study showed that thrombospondin is expressed in benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) and high-grade prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia (PIN) but is absent in prostate cancer. The present study was therefore designed to evaluate the expression of thrombospondin 1 and 2 (TSP-1, TSP-2), TSP receptors CD36 and CD47, and matrix-metalloproteases 2 and 9 (MMP-, MMP-9) in a rat prostate cancer model. By using immunohistochemistry, Western blot, and real-time PCR the expression patterns of TSP-1, TSP-2, CD36, CD47, MMP-2, and MMP-9 were investigated in normal rat prostate tissue and five malignant Dunning sublines tissue. TSP-1 mRNA levels were decreased in all tumours compared with normal prostate. However, there was no difference in expression of TSP-2 and CD36 mRNA in these samples. MMP-2 was increased with malignancy, but no expression of MMP-9 was seen. The CD47 receptor did slightly increase with malignancy except for H3327. The results showed that thrombospondin is expressed in normal prostate but not in prostate tumours in a rat model. Simultaneously, MMP-2 expression increases with malignancy. 
The role of platelet-derived endothelial cell growth factor/thymidine phosphorylase in tumor behavior. 
 
Platelet-derived endothelial cell growth-factor (PD-ECGF) is similar to the pyrimidine enzyme thymidine phosphorylase (TP). A high TP expression at tumor sites is correlated with tumor growth, induction of angiogenesis, and metastasis. Therefore, high TP is most likely associated with a poor prognosis. TP is not only expressed in tumor cells but also in tumor surrounding tissues, such as tumor infiltrating macrophages. TP catalyzes the conversion of thymidine to thymine and doxyribose-1-phosphate (dR-1-P). The latter in its parent form or in its sugar form, deoxyribose (dR) may play a role in the induction of angiogenesis. It may modulate cellular energy metabolism or be a substrate in a chemical reaction generating reactive oxygen species. L-deoxyribose (L-dR) and thymidine phosphorylase inhibitor (TPI) can reverse these effects. The mechanism of TP induction is not yet completely clear, but TNF, IL10 and other cytokines have been clearly shown to induce its expression. The various complex interactions of TP give it an essential role in cellular functioning and, hence, it is an ideal target in cancer therapy. 
High density of somatostatin receptors in veins surrounding human cancer tissue: role in tumor-host interaction? 
 
Somatostatin receptors were detected in peritumoral veins of various human cancer tissue specimens. Vascular and neoplastic tissue from 14 colonic adenocarcinomas, 13 carcinoids, 6 renal-cell carcinomas and 7 malignant lymphomas were analyzed for somatostatin receptors by use of quantitative receptor autoradiography. In colonic carcinoma specimens, the peritumoral vessels expressed a high density of somatostatin receptors, whereas the neoplastic tissue itself was receptor negative in many cases. In contrast, the incidence and density of somatostatin receptors in peritumoral vessels was low in well differentiated gastrointestinal and bronchial carcinoids, in contrast to the high density of such receptors in the carcinoid tumor tissue. Autochthonous vessels surrounding other tumors such as renal-cell carcinomas or malignant lymphomas also frequently expressed somatostatin receptors. In all cases, the somatostatin receptors were localized in veins, particularly in the smooth-muscle cell layer. They exhibited specific and high-affinity binding of somatostatin-14, somatostatin-28 and octreotide, suggesting a preferential expression of the SSTR2 receptor subtype. Since the vessels of normal non-neoplastic human tissues, e.g. of intestine or lymphatic organs, have few somatostatin receptors, the increased somatostatin receptor expression in peritumoral vessels observed in this study may be linked to the neoplastic process itself. The results suggest that somatostatin and somatostatin receptors may play a regulatory role for hemodynamic tumor-host interactions, possibly involving tumor stroma generation, tumor environment, angiogenesis and, particularly, vascular drainage of poorly differentiated neoplasms. 
Safety of verteporfin for treatment of subfoveal choroidal neovascular membranes associated with age-related macular degeneration. 
 
Photodynamic therapy (PDT) is a novel treatment entity that exploits the photophysical properties of various photosensitive chemical entities which, upon light activation, results in targeted photooxidation and subsequent tissue destruction. The     angiogenic properties of PDT have been adapted for treatment of subfoveal choroidal neovascular membranes due to disease states such as age-related macular degeneration (AMD). Historically, PDT has been limited by a lack of suitable photosensitive dyes. However, agents such as verteporfin, a second-generation benzoporphyrin derivative, appear to be free from the extensive phototoxicity that limited the success of previous agents. Verteporfin has a high affinity for choroidal neovascular membranes, typically found with exudative AMD, and upon photoactivation results in targeted microvascular damage and thrombus formation with resultant vessel occlusion. Scrutiny of diagnostic indicators for verteporfin administration, including critical angiographic evaluation of lesion size and visual acuity, is essential to treatment success. Large lesions with relatively good visual acuity (20/50 or better) may be at particular risk for marked vision loss following verteporfin administration. Lesion composition also appears to influence visual outcome with verteporfin use. The safety of verteporfin is directly dependent upon the appropriate integration of dosage, infusion and light activation required for a suitable pharmacotherapeutic outcome. When used appropriately, and with adequate patient education regarding photosensitivity, the risk-benefit of verteporfin for the medical treatment of neovascular AMD is favourable. 
Retrospective case series of juxtafoveal choroidal neovascularization treated with photodynamic therapy with verteporfin. 
 
PURPOSE: To describe visual acuity and angiographic outcomes of juxtafoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) treated with photodynamic therapy and verteporfin (PDT). METHODS: Four hundred eighty-four consecutive eyes of 446 patients treated with PDT from January 1, 2001, to June 30, 2002, were identified from billing records. Fluorescein angiograms were reviewed retrospectively to identify juxtafoveal CNV. Eligible patients had CNV in which the central boundary of the lesion was between 1 and 199 microm from the geometric center of the foveal avascular zone (FAZ). Patient charts were reviewed for visual acuity of the treated eye before PDT and at 6- and 12-month follow-up examinations. Presence of subfoveal CNV at 6 and 12 months of follow-up was determined by review of fluorescein angiograms. A lesion was considered subfoveal if it extended underneath the geometric center of the FAZ. RESULTS: Twenty-one eyes had juxtafoveal CNV. Median change in visual acuity both 6 and 12 months after the initial PDT was 0 lines (n = 18 at 6 months, range -14 to + 8 lines; n = 17 at 12 months, range -18 to + 7 lines). Eleven lesions progressed to a subfoveal location by 12 months. Visual acuity in eyes with progressive lesions decreased a median of 4 lines of vision. CONCLUSIONS: Despite a small sample size and limited length of follow-up, this study shows that visual acuity on average can remain stable for at least 12 months after PDT of juxtafoveal lesions. Growth through the foveal center still can occur, however, and this can be associated with substantial visual loss. 
The Down syndrome critical region gene 1 short variant promoters direct vascular bed-specific gene expression during inflammation in mice. 
 
Down syndrome critical region gene 1 (DSCR-1) short variant (DSCR-1s) is an inhibitor of calcineurin/NFAT signaling encoded by exons 4-7 of DSCR1. We previously reported that VEGF induces DSCR-1s expression in endothelial cells, which in turn negatively feeds back to attenuate endothelial cell activation. Here, in order to characterize the role of the promoter that drives DSCR-1s expression in mediating inducible expression in vivo and to determine the functional relevance of DSCR-1s in inflammation, we targeted a DNA construct containing 1.7 kb of the human DSCR1s promoter coupled to the lacZ reporter to the hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyl transferase (Hprt) locus of mice. We determined that lacZ was uniformly expressed in the endothelium of transgenic embryos but was markedly downregulated postnatally. Systemic administration of VEGF or LPS in adult mice resulted in cyclosporine A sensitive reactivation of the DSCR1s promoter and endogenous gene expression in a subset of organs, including the heart and brain. The DSCR1s promoter was similarly induced in the endothelium of tumor xenografts. In a mouse model of endotoxemia, DSCR-1s deficient mice demonstrated increased sepsis mortality, whereas adenovirus mediated DSCR-1s overexpression protected against LPS-induced lethality. Collectively, these data suggest that the DSCR1s promoter directs vascular bed-specific expression in activated endothelium and that DSCR-1s serves to dampen the host response to infection. 
Hyperforin blocks neutrophil activation of matrix metalloproteinase-9, motility and recruitment, and restrains inflammation-triggered angiogenesis and lung fibrosis. 
 
Hyperforin (Hyp), a polyphenol-derivative of St. John's wort (Hypericum perforatum), has emerged as key player not only in the antidepressant activity of the plant but also as an inhibitor of bacteria lymphocyte and tumor cell proliferation, and matrix proteinases. We tested whether as well as inhibiting leukocyte elastase (LE) activity, Hyp might be effective in containing both polymorphonuclear neutrophil (PMN) leukocyte recruitment and unfavorable eventual tissue responses. The results show that, without affecting in vitro human PMN viability and chemokine-receptor expression, Hyp (as stable dicyclohexylammonium salt) was able to inhibit in a dose-dependent manner their chemotaxis and chemoinvasion (IC50=1 microM for both); this effect was associated with a reduced expression of the adhesion molecule CD11b by formyl-Met-Leu-Phe stimulated neutrophils and block of LE triggered activation of the gelatinase matrix metalloproteinase-9. PMN triggered angiogenesis is also blocked by both local injection and daily i.p. administration of the Hyp salt in an interleukin-8 induced murine model. Furthermore, i.p. treatment with Hyp reduces acute PMN recruitment and enhances resolution in a pulmonary bleomycin-induced inflammation model, significantly reducing consequent fibrosis. These results indicate that Hyp is a powerful anti-inflammatory compound with therapeutic potential, and they elucidate mechanistic keys. 
Insulin induced vascular endothelial growth factor expression in retina. 
 
PURPOSE: Clinical studies have demonstrated that intensive insulin therapy causes a transient worsening of retinopathy. The mechanisms underlying the initial insulin induced deterioration of retinal status in patients with diabetes remain unknown. Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is known to be operative in the pathogenesis of diabetic retinopathy. The current study was conducted to characterize the effect of insulin on retinal VEGF gene expression in vitro and in vivo. METHODS: The effect of insulin on VEGF expression in vivo was examined by in situ hybridization studies of rat retinal VEGF transcripts. To examine the mechanisms by which insulin regulates VEGF expression, human retinal pigment epithelial (RPE) cells were exposed to insulin, and VEGF mRNA levels were quantified with RNase protection assays (RPAs). Conditioned media from insulin treated RPE cells were assayed for VEGF protein and capillary endothelial cell proliferation. The capacity of insulin to stimulate the VEGF promoter linked to a luciferase reporter gene was characterized in transient transfection assays. RESULTS: Insulin increased VEGF mRNA levels in the ganglion, inner nuclear, and RPE cell layers. In vitro, insulin increased VEGF mRNA levels in human RPE cells and enhanced VEGF promoter activity without affecting transcript stability. Insulin treatment also increased VEGF protein levels in conditioned RPE cell media in a dose-dependent manner with a median effective concentration of 5 nM. The insulin conditioned RPE cell media stimulated capillary endothelial cell proliferation, an effect that was completely blocked by anti-VEGF neutralizing antibody. CONCLUSIONS: Insulin increases VEGF mRNA and secreted protein levels in RPE cells through enhanced transcription of the VEGF gene. Intensive insulin therapy may cause a transient worsening of retinopathy in patients with diabetes through increased retinal VEGF gene expression. 
Role of the interferon inducible IFI16 gene in the induction of ICAM-1 by TNF-alpha. 
 
The Interferon inducible gene IFI16, a member of the HIN200 family, is activated by oxidative stress and cell density, in addition to Interferons, and it is implicated in the regulation of endothelial cell proliferation and vessel formation in vitro. We have previously shown that IFI16 is required for proinflammatory gene stimulation by IFN-gamma through the NF-kappaB complex. To examine whether IFI16 induction might be extended to other proinflammatory cytokines such as tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha, we used the strategy of the RNA interference to knock down IFI16 expression, and analyze the capability of TNF-alpha to stimulate intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1 or CD54) expression in the absence of functional IFI16. Our studies demonstrate that IFI16 mediates ICAM-1 stimulation by TNF-alpha through the NF-kappaB pathway, thus reinforcing the role of the IFI16 molecule in the inflammation process. 
Effects of morphological patterning on endothelial cell migration. 
 
The migration of vascular endothelial cells (ECs) plays an important role in vascular remodeling. Here we studied the effects of cell morphology on the migration of bovine aortic ECs by culturing cells on micropatterned strips of collagen matrix (60-, 30-, and 15-microm wide). The spreading areas of the cells on 15- and 30-microm wide strips were 30% lower than those on 60-microm wide strips and unpatterned collagen. The cells on 15-microm wide strips completely aligned in the direction of the strip, and had significantly lower shape index than those in all other groups. On strips of all widths, ECs tended to migrate in the direction of strips. ECs on 15-microm wide strips had highest speed, particularly in the direction of the strip. Vinculin staining showed that the leading edge of ECs on 15-microm wide strips had focal adhesions that were oriented with their lamellipodial protrusion and the direction of cell migration; this arrangement of the focal adhesions may promote EC migration. The present study provides direct evidence on the role of cell morphology in EC migration, and will help us to understand the mechanisms of EC migration during angiogenesis and wound healing. 
Ectopic decorin expression up-regulates VEGF expression in mouse cerebral endothelial cells via activation of the transcription factors Sp1, HIF1alpha, and Stat3. 
 
We demonstrate that a proteoglycan decorin (DCN) up-regulates the vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) expression with activation of VEGF regulating transcription factors Sp1, hypoxia-inducible factor 1alpha (HIF1alpha), and signal transducer and activator of transcription 3 (Stat3) via epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), mitogen-activated protein kinase extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1/2 (ERK1/2), and protein kinase B (AKT) pathways in DCN transfected mouse cerebral endothelial (MCE) cells. Treatment with pharmacological inhibitors and small interfering RNAs reveal that induction and activation of Sp1, HIF1alpha, and Stat3 facilitate their nuclear localization and binding to their specific motifs of the VEGF promoter and induce VEGF expression via two independent pathways, DCN/EGFR/phosphoinositide-3 kinase/AKT and DCN/EGFR/ERK1/2, respectively, in DCN synthesizing MCE cells. The cell type specific glycosylation protects Sp1 and HIF1alpha from proteosome degradation and plays an important and novel role in the regulation of VEGF in DCN transfected MCE cells. Induction of gelatinases (matrix metalloproteinase 2 and 9), the serine protease tissue plasminogen activator and plasmin by DCN transfection in MCE cells leads to extracellular proteolysis and to release of matrix bound VEGF and activation of angiogenesis. In this study, we demonstrate that two independent downstream signal pathways, DCN/EGFR/ERK1/2 and DCN/EGFR/phosphoinositide-3 kinase/AKT, mediate up-regulation and activation of transcription factors of VEGF such as HIF1alpha, Stat3, and Sp1 and increase VEGF transcription and angiogenesis in MCE cells. 
Stimulation of endothelial cell migration by vascular permeability factor/vascular endothelial growth factor through cooperative mechanisms involving the alphavbeta3 integrin, osteopontin, and thrombin. 
 
We have identified several mechanisms by which the angiogenic cytokine vascular permeability factor/vascular endothelial growth factor (VPF/VEGF) likely regulates endothelial cells (EC) migration. VPF/VEGF induced dermal microvascular EC expression of mRNAs encoding the alphav and beta3 integrin subunits resulting in increased levels of the alphavbeta3 heterodimer at the cell surface, and VPF/VEGF also induced mRNA encoding osteopontin (OPN), an alphavbeta3 ligand. OPN promoted EC migration in vitro; and VPF/VEGF induction of alphavbeta3 was accompanied by increased EC migration toward OPN. Because thrombin cleavage of OPN results in substantial enhancement of OPN's adhesive properties, and because VPF/VEGF promotes increased microvascular permeability leading to activation of the extrinsic coagulation pathway, we also investigated whether VPF/VEGF facilitates thrombin cleavage of OPN in vivo. Consistent with this hypothesis, co-injection of VPF/VEGF together with OPN resulted in rapid cleavage of OPN by endogenous thrombin. Furthermore, in comparison with native OPN, thrombin cleaved OPN stimulated a greater rate of EC migration in vitro, which was additive to the increased migration associated with induction of alpha v beta 3. Thus, these data demonstrate cooperative mechanisms for VPF/VEGF regulation of EC migration involving the alphavbeta3 integrin, the alphavbeta3 ligand OPN, and thrombin cleavage of OPN. These findings also illustrate an operational link between VPF/VEGF induction of EC gene expression and VPF/VEGF enhancement of microvascular permeability, suggesting that these distinct biological activities may act accordingly to stimulate EC migration during angiogenesis. 
Minimal contribution of marrow-derived endothelial precursors to tumor vasculature. 
 
During embryogenesis, vascular and hemopoietic cells originate from a common precursor, the hemangioblast. Recent evidence suggests the existence of endothelial precursors in adult bone marrow cells, but it is unclear whether those precursors have a role in tumor neovascularization. In this report, we demonstrate that murine bone marrow contains endothelial progenitors, which arise from a cell with self-renewing capacity, and can integrate into tumor microvasculature, albeit at a very low frequency. A transgenic double-reporter strategy allowed us to demonstrate definitively that tumor bone marrow-derived endothelial cells arise by transdifferentiation of marrow progenitors rather than by cell fusion. Single cell transplants showed that a common precursor contributes to both the hemopoietic and endothelial lineages, thus demonstrating the presence of an adult hemangioblast. Furthermore, we demonstrate that increased vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF)-A secretion by tumor cells, as well as activation of VEGF receptor-2 in bone marrow cells does not alter the mobilization and incorporation of marrow-derived endothelial progenitors into tumor vasculature. Finally, in human umbilical cord blood cells, we show that endothelial precursors make up only approximately 1 in 10(7) mononuclear cells but are highly enriched in the CD133+ cell population. By ruling out cell fusion, we clearly demonstrate the existence of an adult hemangioblast, but the differentiation of marrow stem cells toward the endothelial lineage is an extremely rare event. Furthermore, we show that VEGF-A stimulation of hemopoietic cells does not significantly alter this process. 
Role of thrombin in angiogenesis and tumor progression. 
 
Clinical, laboratory, histopathological, and pharmacological evidence support the notion that the coagulation system, which is activated in most cancer patients, plays an important role in tumor biology. Our laboratory has provided evidence that thrombin activates angiogenesis, a process which is essential in tumor growth and metastasis. This event is independent of fibrin formation. At the cellular level many actions of thrombin can contribute to activation of angiogenesis: (1). Thrombin decreases the ability of endothelial cells to attach to basement membrane proteins. (2). Thrombin greatly potentiates vascular endothelial growth factor- (VEGF-) induced endothelial cell proliferation. This potentiation is accompanied by up-regulation of the expression of VEGF receptors (kinase insert domain-containing receptor [KDR] and fms-like tyrosine kinase [Flt-1]). (3). Thrombin increases the mRNA and protein levels of alpha (v)beta (3) integrin and serves as a ligand to this receptor. Furthermore, thrombin increases the secretion of VEGF and enhances the expression and protein synthesis of matrix metalloprotease-9 and alpha (v)beta (3) integrin in human prostate cancer PC-3 cells. These results could explain the angiogenic and tumor promoting effect of thrombin and provide the basis for development of thrombin receptor mimetics or antagonists for therapeutic application. 
Endosialin/TEM 1/CD248 is a pericyte marker of embryonic and tumor neovascularization. 
 
The formation of functional, mature blood vessels depends on the interaction between endothelial cells and pericytes. Commonality exists in the processes involved in vasculature development between tissues whether healthy or diseased. Endosialin/TEM 1 is a cell membrane protein that is expressed in blood vessels during embryogenesis and tumorigenesis but not in normal mature vessels. Antibodies developed to human endosialin were used to investigate endosialin expression and function in human prenatal brain pericytes and pericytes residing in tumors. Anti-endosialin was capable of preventing pericyte tube formation in culture and inhibited migration. Brain pericytes in culture had higher levels of endosialin/TEM 1 than TEMs-2, -3, -4, -5, -7, and -8. Immunocytochemistry revealed that endosialin was present in the cytoplasmic body and in the elongated extensions essential to pericyte function. Transgenic mice engineered to express human endosialin bred on an immunocompromised background allowed the growth of human tumor xenografts. In human colon carcinoma Colo205 and HT29 xenografts grown in human endosialin transgenic mice, endosialin expression was largely confined to NG2 expressing perivascular cells and not CD31 positive endothelial cells. Similar methods applied to human ovarian and colon tumors confirmed endosialin expression by pericytes. The data indicate that endosialin is strongly expressed by pericytes during periods of active angiogenesis during embryonic and tumor development. Anti-endosialin antibodies may have value in identifying vasculature in malignant tissues. With the appropriate agent, targeting endosialin may interfere with blood vessel growth during tumor development. 
Bradycardia induced coronary angiogenesis is dependent on vascular endothelial growth factor. 
 
A marked coronary angiogenesis is known to occur with chronic bradycardia. We tested the hypothesis that vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), an endothelial cell mitogen and a major regulator of angiogenesis, is upregulated in response to low heart rate and consequential increased stroke volume. Bradycardia was induced in rats by administering the bradycardic drug alinidine (3 mg/kg body weight) twice daily. Heart rate decreased by 32% for 20 to 40 minutes after injection and was chronically reduced by 10%, 14%, and 18.5% after 1, 2, and 3 weeks of treatment, respectively. Arterial pressure and cardiac output were unchanged. Left ventricular capillary length density (mm/mm(3)) increased gradually with alinidine administration; a 15% increase after 2 weeks and a 40% increase after 3 weeks of alinidine treatment were documented. Left ventricular weight, body weight, and their ratio were not significantly altered by alinidine treatment. After 1 week of treatment, before an increase in capillary length density, VEGF mRNA increased  greater than 2-fold and then declined to control levels after 3 weeks of treatment. VEGF protein was higher in alinidine treated rats than in controls after 2 weeks and increased further after 3 weeks of treatment. Injection of VEGF neutralizing antibodies over a 2-week period completely blocked alinidin  stimulated angiogenesis. In contrast, bFGF mRNA was not altered by alinidine treatment. These data suggest that VEGF plays a key role in the angiogenic response that occurs with chronic bradycardia. The mechanism underlying this VEGF associated angiogenesis may be an increase in stretch due to enhanced diastolic filling. 
Role of telomeres in vascular senescence. 
 
Telomeres are DNA regions composed of TTAGGG repeats that are located at the ends of chromosomes. Specific proteins associate with the telomeres and form non-nucleosomal DNA-protein complexes that serve as protective caps for the chromosome ends. There is accumulating evidence that progressive telomere shortening is closely related to cardiovascular disease. For example, vascular cell senescence has been reported to occur in human atherosclerotic lesions and this change is associated with telomere shortening. Impairment of telomere integrity causes vascular dysfunction, which is prevented by the activation of telomerase. Mice with short telomeres develop hypertension and exhibit impaired neovascularization. Short telomeres have also been reported in the leukocytes of patients with cardiovascular disease or various cardiovascular risk factors. Although it remains unclear whether short telomeres directly cause cardiovascular disease, manipulation of telomere function is potentially an attractive strategy for the treatment of vascular senescence. 
EPOX inhibits angiogenesis by degradation of Mcl-1 through ERK inactivation. 
 
PURPOSE Anti angiogenic therapy is considered as an effective strategy for controlling the growth and metastasis of tumors. Among a myriad of biological activities described for xanthone derivatives the anti cancer activity is quite remarkable, but the molecular mechanism is not clearly resolved. In the present study we investigated the anti angiogenic mechanism of 3,6-di(2,3-epoxypropoxy)xanthone (EPOX), a novel Mcl-1 targeting drug. EXPERIMENTAL DESIGN To evaluate the anti angiogenic activity of EPOX, we did cell viability, cell cycle, tube formation assay in vitro, and Matrigel plug assay in vivo. To evaluate the effect of EPOX on the endothelial signaling pathway, we did immunoblotting, immunoprecipitation, and immunofluorescence analysis. Intracellular glutathione levels were determined with the use of monochlorobimane, a glutathione-specific probe. RESULTS: EPOX induced endothelial cell apoptosis in association with proteasome dependent Mcl-1 degradation. Down-regulation of Mcl-1 resulted in an increase in Mcl-1 free Bim, activation of Bax, and then signaling of mitochondria-mediated apoptosis. Additionally, glutathione depletion and extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) inactivation was observed in EPOX treated cells. Glutathione supplementation reversed the inhibitory effects of EPOX on ERK, which increases the phosphorylation of Mcl-1 at T(163.) Overexpression of mitogen-activated protein/ERK kinase (MEK) partially reversed the effect of EPOX on Mcl-1 dephosphorylation, ubiquitination, and degradation, further implicating ERK in the regulation of Mcl-1 stability. CONCLUSIONS: This study provides evidence that EPOX induces glutathione depletion, ERK inactivation, and Mcl-1 degradation on endothelial cells, which leads to inhibition of angiogenesis. Our results suggest that EPOX is  novel anti angiogenic agent, making it a promising lead compound for further development in the treatment of angiogenesis related pathologies. 
NF-kappaB and IKK as therapeutic targets in cancer. 
 
The transcription factor NF-kappaB and associated regulatory factors (including IkappaB kinase subunits and the IkappaB family member Bcl-3) are strongly implicated in a variety of hematologic and solid tumor malignancies. A role for NF-kappaB in cancer cells appears to involve regulation of cell proliferation, control of apoptosis, promotion of angiogenesis, and stimulation of invasion metastasis. Consistent with a role for NF-kappaB in oncogenesis are observations that inhibition of NF-kappaB alone or in combination with cancer therapies leads to tumor cell death or growth inhibition. However, other experimental data indicate that NF-kappaB can play a tumor suppressor role in certain settings and that it can be important in promoting an apoptotic signal downstream of certain cancer therapy regimens. In order to appropriately move NF-kappaB inhibitors in the clinic, thorough approaches must be initiated to determine the molecular mechanisms that dictate the complexity of oncologic and therapeutic outcomes that are controlled by NF-kappaB. 
MEK5/ERK5 signaling modulates endothelial cell migration and focal contact turnover. 
 
The formation of new blood vessels from pre-existing ones requires highly coordinated restructuring of endothelial cells (EC) and the surrounding extracellular matrix. Directed EC migration is a central step in this process and depends on cellular signaling cascades that initiate and control the structural rearrangements. On the basis of earlier findings that ERK5 deficiency in mouse EC results in massive defects in vessel architecture, we focused on the impact of the MEK5/ERK5 signaling pathway on EC migration. Using a retroviral gene transfer approach, we found that constitutive activation of MEK5/ERK5 signaling strongly inhibits EC migration and results in massive morphological changes. The area covered by spread EC was dramatically enlarged, accompanied by an increase in focal contacts and altered organization of actin filaments. Consequently, cells were more rigid and show reduced motility. This phenotype was most likely based on decreased focal contact turnover caused by reduced expression of p130Cas, a key player in directed cell migration. We demonstrate for the first time that ERK5 signaling not only is involved in EC survival and stress response but also controls migration and morphology of EC. 
AVE8062: a new combretastatin derivative vascular disrupting agent. 
 
Angiogenesis has an essential role in promoting and supporting tumor growth and it is an important therapeutic target. The tumor vascular network is the result of pro angiogenic and inhibitory factors as well as of the interaction between endothelial cells and extracellular matrix. Different     angiogenic therapeutics have been developed to improve tumor control through vascular-targeting agents (VTA). VTAs can be divided into two groups anti angiogenic agents and vascular-disrupting agents (VDAs). VTAs inhibit specific factors required to induce and direct the angiogenic process, with major activity against small tumor masses and at the tumor periphery, encompassing monoclonal antibodies and small molecules inhibitors of the tyrosine kinase domain of the VEGF receptor. VDAs specifically target and destroy well established tumor vessels with ischemia and destruction of large masses with central hemorrhagic necrosis and survival of a thin peripheral tumor layer. VDAs can be divided into biologics, such as ligand based, and small-molecule agents; this second group includes small-molecule VDAs like flavonoids, such as 5,6-dimethylxanthenone-4-acetic acid (DMXAA), and microtubule-destabilizing agents. In this review we will discuss the mechanism of action, as well as the preclinical and clinical results, of one of the most promising antitubulin agents: the combretastatin A4-phosphate derivative, AVE8062A. 
The tyrosine kinase inhibitor cediranib blocks ligand induced vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-3 activity and lymphangiogenesis. 
 
Solid tumors express a range of factors required to sustain their growth and promote their dissemination. Among these are vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A), the key angiogenic stimulant, and VEGF-C, a primary mediator of lymphangiogenesis. Small molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors offer the potential to inhibit more than one kinase and impede tumor growth by multiple mechanisms. However, their potency toward individual targets can vary. Cediranib (RECENTIN; AZD2171) is an inhibitor of VEGF signaling that has been shown in experimental models to prevent VEGF-A induced angiogenesis and primary tumor growth, yet the effects of cediranib on VEGF receptor (VEGFR)-3 mediated endothelial cell function and lymphangiogenesis are unknown. To better understand the activity of cediranib against VEGFR-3 and its associated signaling events compared with its activity against VEGFR-2, we used the receptor-specific ligands VEGF-E and VEGF-C156S. In human endothelial cells, cediranib inhibited VEGF-E induced phosphorylation of VEGFR-2 and VEGF-C156S induced phosphorylation of VEGFR-3 at concentrations of  less than /=1nmol/L and inhibited activation of downstream signaling molecules. Additionally, cediranib blocked VEGF-C156S induced and VEGF-E induced proliferation, survival, and migration of lymphatic and blood vascular endothelial cells. In vivo, cediranib (6 mg/kg/d) prevented angiogenesis and lymphangiogenesis induced by VEGF-E expressing and VEGF-C156S expressing adenoviruses, respectively. Cediranib (6 mg/kg/day) also blocked angiogenesis and lymphangiogenesis induced by adenoviruses expressing VEGF-A or VEGF-C and compromised the blood and lymphatic vasculatures of VEGF-C expressing tumors. Cediranib may, therefore, be an effective means of preventing tumor progression, not only by inhibiting VEGFR-2 activity and angiogenesis, but also by concomitantly inhibiting VEGFR-3 activity and lymphangiogenesis. 
UFT and its metabolites inhibit the angiogenesis induced by murine renal cell carcinoma, as determined by a dorsal air sac assay in mice. 
 
UFT, an anticancer agent that is composed of tegafur (FT) and uracil at a molar ratio of 1:4, is widely used in clinical practice in Japan to treat cancer patients requiring a long-term chemotherapy, and it is associated with few side effects, if any. In this study, we have evaluated the inhibitory effect of UFT against RENCA cell induced angiogenesis by a dorsal air sac assay. Marked angiogenesis is induced by implantation of a chamber containing RENCA cells into mice. In this model, UFT showed a strong angiogenesis inhibitory effect, whereas 5-fluorouracil (5-FU) and doxifluridine were less effective. Additional experiments revealed FT to be effective component of UFT; uracil remained ineffective in the inhibition of angiogenesis. Moreover, we have found that gamma-hydroxybutyric acid and gamma-butyrolactone, the metabolites of FT, possess a potent angiogenesis inhibitory effect that is amplified when the compounds are administered by a continuous infusion. This may reflect a transition in blood concentration of each metabolite resulting from the administration of UFT. Similar results were also obtained with respect to 5-FU. It was suggested that UFT has a stronger angiogenesis inhibitory effect than did other fluorinated pyrimidines, partly due to its pharmacokinetic properties characterized by maintaining of higher and long-lasting blood levels of 5-FU and partly due the inhibitory effects derived from gamma-hydroxybutyric acid and gamma-butyrolactone, UFT-specific metabolites. 
Interleukin-1 receptor antagonist inhibits ischaemic and excitotoxic neuronal damage in the rat. 
 
Interleukin-1 (IL-1) synthesis in the brain is stimulated by mechanical injury and IL-1 mimics some effects of injury, such as gliosis and neovascularization. We report that neuronal death resulting from focal cerebral ischaemia (middle cerebral artery occlusion, 24 h) is significantly inhibited (by 50%) in rats injected with a recombinant IL-1 receptor antagonist (IL-1ra, 10 micrograms, icv 30 min before and 10 min after ischaemia). Excitotoxic damage due to striatal infusion of an NMDA-receptor agonist (cis-2,4-methanoglutamate) was also markedly inhibited (71%) by injection of the IL-1ra. These data indicate that endogenous IL-1 is a mediator of ischaemic and excitotoxic brain damage, and that inhibitors of IL-1 action may be of therapeutic value in the treatment of acute or chronic neuronal death. 
VEGF165 expressed by a replication-deficient recombinant adenovirus vector induces angiogenesis in vivo. 
 
To evaluate the concept that localized delivery of angiogenic factors via virus-mediated gene transfer may be useful in the treatment of ischemic disorders, the replication-deficient adenovirus (Ad) vector AdCMV.VEGF165 (where CMV is cytomegalovirus and VEGF is vascular endothelial growth factor) containing the cDNA for human VEGF165, a secreted endothelial cell-specific angiogenic growth factor, was constructed. Human umbilical vein endothelial cells (HUVECs) and rat aorta smooth muscle cells (RASMCs) infected with AdCMV.VEGF165 (5 and 20 plaque-forming units [pfu] per cell) demonstrated VEGF mRNA expression and protein secretion into the supernatant. Furthermore, the conditioned medium from these cells enhanced vascular permeability in vivo. In contrast, neither VEGF mRNA nor secreted protein was found in uninfected HUVECs or RASMCs or in cells infected with the control vector AdCMV.beta gal (where beta gal is beta-galactosidase). Assessment of starved HUVECs at 14 days demonstrated sixfold more cells for AdCMV.VEGF165 infected HUVECs (20 pfu per cell) than for either infected or uninfected control cells. RASMC proliferation was unaffected by infection with AdCMV.VEGF165. When plated in 2% serum on dishes precoated with reconstituted basement membrane (Matrigel), HUVECs infected with AdCMV.VEGF165 (20 pfu per cell) differentiated into capillary-like structures. Under similar conditions, both uninfected HUVECs and HUVECs infected with AdCMV.beta gal did not differentiate. To evaluate the ability of AdCMV.VEGF165 to function in vivo, either AdCMV. VEGF165 or AdCMV.beta gal (2 x 10(10) pfu) was resuspended in 0.5 mL Matrigel and injected subcutaneously into mice. Immunohistochemical staining demonstrated VEGF in the tissues surrounding the Matrigel plugs containing AdCMV.VEGF165 up to 3 weeks after injection, whereas no VEGF was found in the control plugs with AdCMV.beta gal. Two weeks after injection, there was histological evidence of neovascularization in the tissues surrounding the Matrigel containing AdCMV.VEGF165, whereas no significant angiogenesis was observed in response to AdCMV.beta gal. Furthermore, the Matrigel plugs with AdCMV.VEGF165 demonstrated hemoglobin content fourfold higher than the plugs with AdCMV.beta gal. Together, these in vitro and in vivo studies are consistent with the concept that Ad vectors may provide a useful strategy for efficient local delivery of VEGF165 in the treatment of ischemic diseases. 
[Glaucoma and ocular ischemic syndrome--case report] 
 
PURPOSE: Ocular ischemic syndrome (OIS) is often poorly diagnosed and treated as primary open angle glaucoma or later on, as neovascular glaucoma. We present a 54 year old male, treated topical since 23 years for glaucoma and sent to our clinic for trabeculectomy because of rapid worsening of vision on right eye with bilateral total excavation of optic disc. MATERIAL AND METHODS: Observational case report. RESULTS: Because of typical signs of IOS (iris neovascularization, mid-peripheral dot and blot hemorrhages in both eyes, narrowed arterioles in right eye, following examinations were performed: Doppler ultrasonography of carotid arteries, digital subtractional angiography of the carotid vessels and magnetic resonance angiography. The examinations showed occlusion of the right common carotid artery and with 80% stenosis of the left common carotid artery, occlusion of abdominal aorta. After phacoemulsification with implantation of intraocular lens because of rapid intumescence cataract in the right eye, and endarterectomy of left external carotid artery, the neovascularization of the iris regressed in both eyes. CONCLUSION: In case of iris neovascularization or mid-peripheral hemorrhages the Doppler sonography of carotid arteries should be performed. Quick cooperation between ophthalmologist, radiologist and vascular surgeon following endarterectomy seems to stop progressing changes of ocular ischemic syndrome. 
An evaluation of low molecular weight heparin and hyperbaric oxygen treatment in the prevention of intra-abdominal adhesions and wound healing. 
 
BACKGROUND: Abdominal surgery can lead to intra-abdominal adhesions with significant morbidity and mortality. To prevent adhesions, an experimental study was planned to designate the effects of low molecular weight (LMW) heparins and hyperbaric oxygen (HBO) therapy both on the formation of adhesions and wound healing. METHODS: Thirty-eight Wistar albino rats underwent laparotomy to cause intra-abdominal adhesions by mechanical abrasion of the cecum and ethanol application. The rats were divided into 4 groups. In the control group (group 1) no further management was undertaken. Group 2 was treated by Enoxaparine Na, group 3 received HBO therapy, and group 4 was given both enoxaparine Na and HBO treatment. RESULTS: There was a statistically significant difference between the control and enoxaparine Na groups regarding adhesions. Statistically significant differences were observed between groups 1 and 4 and between groups 1 and 3 regarding the hydroxyproline content of the abdominal wounds. In the pathologic analysis of the abdominal wounds, there was no statistically significant difference between any of the groups, including the control group, regarding inflammation. Statistically significant differences were observed regarding angiogenesis between the control group and groups 3 and 4. There was also a statistically significant difference regarding fibrosis between groups 1 and 4. CONCLUSIONS: Enoxaparine Na decreased intra-abdominal adhesions, and HBO therapy had no beneficial effect on adhesions. Enoxaparine Na had no harmful effects on wound healing, and HBO therapy increased the process of wound healing. 
Efficient inhibition of ovarian cancer growth and prolonged survival by transfection with a novel pro-apoptotic gene, hPNAS-4, in a mouse model. In vivo and in vitro results. 
 
OBJECTIVE: We transfected ovarian cancer cells and administered recombinant plasmid encoding hPNAS-4 to nude mice bearing ovarian cancer, aiming to evaluate the effect of hPNAS-4 against ovarian cancer in vitro and in vivo. METHODS: Ovarian cancer SKOV3 cells were transfected with hPNAS-4-plasmid, and cell proliferation was evaluated by MTT assay; apoptosis was examined by DNA ladder, Hoechst33258 staining and flow-cytometric assays. Nude mice bearing ovarian cancers were treated with hPNAS-4-p/liposome. Tumor growth was determined and survival was recorded. TUNEL assay and microvessel density was assessed to evaluate apoptosis and angiogenesis. RESULTS: Both inhibition of proliferation (p < 0.05) and induction of apoptosis (p < 0.05) were observed in SKOV3 cells transfected with hPNAS-4-p in vitro. In hPNAS-4-p treated tumor cells in vivo, tumor growth significantly decreased, while the survival time of tumor-bearing mice was prolonged compared with control groups (p < 0.05). Increased apoptosis of tumor cells and decreased angiogenesis in tumor tissue were also observed. CONCLUSIONS: Our promising results on the potential antitumor effects of hPNAS-4 on ovarian cancer in vitro and in vivo may be explained, in part, by the induction of apoptosis and inhibition of angiogenesis. Consequently, hPNAS-4 has potential as a new gene therapy for human ovarian cancer. 
Medical therapy for intermittent claudication. 
 
Medical therapy to improve symptoms, stabilise the underlying vascular disease and improve lower limb outcomes is an important and effective adjunct to lifestyle modification and surgical or endovascular interventions in patients with IC. Randomised placebo controlled trials have shown that the phosphodiesterase III inhibitor cilostazol 100mg bid improves pain-free and maximum walking distance, as well as quality of life, in a range of patients with intermittent claudication in whom there is no evidence of tissue necrosis or rest pain. This review summarises the evidence from 8 pivotal trials of cilostazol involving over 2000 patients with intermittent claudication treated for up to 6 months. There is comparatively less evidence to support the use of other treatment modalities for relief of symptoms in intermittent claudication, but there is considerable interest in therapeutic angiogenesis to promote new vessel formation and enhance collateralisation of the lower limb using recombinant growth factor proteins or gene transfer strategies. The rationale for therapeutic angiogenesis is discussed, together with the most recent results from randomised trials in patients with peripheral arterial disease. 
[Autologous bone marrow stem cell or peripheral blood endothelial progenitor cell therapy in patients with peripheral limb ischaemia] 
 
No effective medical therapies have been developed sofar to enhance blood flow in the legs of patients with peripheral arterial disease (PAD). For patients with limb threatening ischaemia the only option for relief of rest pain or gangraena is amputation. There is evidence in experimental and clinical studies that adult bone marrow-derived stem cells and endothelial progenitor cells participate in the development of new blood vessels, called neoangiogenesis or neovascularization. Clinical results induced by autologous bone marrow stem cells or angiogenic growth/differentiation factors in end-stage patients with PAD are summarized. Considering the relatively few number of patients treated by angiogenic therapy, the interpretation of clinical results needs cautiousness. 
Gene transfer of naked DNA encoding for three isoforms of vascular endothelial growth factor stimulates collateral development in vivo. 
 
Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is a naturally secreted endothelial cell-specific mitogen. We investigated the hypothesis that naked DNA encoding for VEGF could be used in a strategy of arterial gene therapy to stimulate collateral artery development. Plasmid DNA encoding each of the three principal human VEGF isoforms (phVEGF121, phVEGF165, or phVEGF189) was applied to the hydrogel polymer coating of an angioplasty balloon and delivered percutaneously to one iliac artery of rabbits with operatively induced hindlimb ischemia. Compared with control animals transfected with LacZ, site-specific transfection of phVEGF resulted in augmented collateral vessel development documented by serial angiography, and improvement in calf blood pressure ratio (ischemic to normal limb), resting and maximum blood flow, and capillary to myocyte ratio. Similar results were obtained with phVEGF121, phVEGF165, and phVEGF189, which suggests that these isoforms are biologically equivalent with respect to in vivo angiogenesis. The fact that viral or other adjunctive vectors were not required further suggests that secreted gene products may have potential therapeutic utility even when the number of successfully transfected cells remains low. Arterial gene transfer of naked DNA encoding for a secreted angiogenic cytokine, thus, represents a potential alternative to recombinant protein administration for stimulating collateral vessel development. 
Therapeutic angiogenesis: a complex problem requiring a sophisticated approach. 
 
Blood and vascular disorders underlie a plethora of pathologic conditions and are the single most frequent cause of human disease. Ischemia, involving restricted blood flow to tissues is the most common consequence of vessel dysfunction resulting in the disruption of oxygen and nutrient delivery and the accumulation of waste metabolites. Cells cannot survive extended severe ischemia but may be able to adapt to a moderate condition where diffusion to and from bordering nonischemic regions sustains vital functions. Under this condition, the secondary functions of effected cells are likely to be impaired, and a new metabolic equilibrium is established, determined by the level of cross-diffusion and degree of hypoxia. In tissues with a normally high metabolic turnover such as skeletal and cardiac muscle, even mild ischemia causes hypoxia, acidosis, and depressed function (contractility) and eventually threatens myocyte viability and organ function. Ischemic cardiac muscle is additionally vulnerable because reperfusion is essential for survival but reperfusion itself poses additional stress principally from increased production of free radicals during reoxygenation. The latter effect is called reperfusion injury and can cause as much damage as the ischemia. The treatment possibilities for ischemia-related vascular disease are limited. Lipid/cholesterol-lowering agents, diet and antiplatelet adherence (aspirin) therapy may help slow the progression of vessel disease in some instances; but surgical reconstruction may be the only option in advanced stages, and even this is not always an option. An alternative and rather obvious strategy to treat ischemia is to activate endogenous angiogenic or arteriogenic pathways to stimulate revascularization of the tissue. The feasibility of such a strategy has now been established through the results of studies over the past decade, and a new discipline called therapeutic angiogenesis has emerged. This review focuses on the application of therapeutic angiogenesis for treating ischemic muscle disease and includes a critical evaluation of the parameters and limitations of current procedures. The development of this technology has benefited from its application to both peripheral and coronary artery disease and results from both are reviewed here. 
[An experimental study on angiogenesis of non vascularized autogenous bone graft with vascular bundle implantation] 
 
OBJECTIVE: To investigate the effect of vascular bundle implantation in autogenous bone graft on angiogenesis. METHODS: Thirty-six New Zealand white rabbits were evaluated in this study. A portion of bilateral radial bones of a rabbit were removed as free bone grafts, whose periostea were peeled off. In test group, the external maxillary artery bundle was passed through the marrow cavity of the bone. In control group, there was no vascular bundle implantation. Each bone was placed in masseter muscle separately. The rabbits were sacrificed and the specimens were procured at 3 days, 1, 2, 3, 4 and 6 weeks after surgery for histological observation, Chinese ink perfusion and CD34 immunohistochemistry. Microvessel density (MVD) was assessed in order to evaluate angiogenesis of autogenous bone grafts. RESULTS: The bone grafts were found revascularization in 3 days after surgery in the test group, whereas at 2 weeks in the control group. In 3 days, 1 week, 2 weeks, 3 weeks and 4 weeks after surgery, the MVD of test group was significantly higher than that of control group. In 4 weeks after surgery, angiogenesis of test group reached to peak. CONCLUSION: Vascular bundle implantation improved angiogenesis in non vascularized autogenous bone graft in this study. 
Pericytes limit tumor cell metastasis. 
 
Previously we observed that neural cell adhesion molecule (NCAM) deficiency in beta tumor cells facilitates metastasis into distant organs and local lymph nodes. Here, we show that NCAM-deficient beta cell tumors grew leaky blood vessels with perturbed pericyte-endothelial cell-cell interactions and deficient perivascular deposition of ECM components. Conversely, tumor cell expression of NCAM in a fibrosarcoma model (T241) improved pericyte recruitment and increased perivascular deposition of ECM molecules. Together, these findings suggest that NCAM may limit tumor cell metastasis by stabilizing the microvessel wall. To directly address whether pericyte dysfunction increases the metastatic potential of solid tumors, we studied beta cell tumorigenesis in primary pericyte-deficient Pdgfb(ret/ret) mice. This resulted in beta tumor cell metastases in distant organs and local lymph nodes, demonstrating a role for pericytes in limiting tumor cell metastasis. These data support a new model for how tumor cells trigger metastasis by perturbing pericyte-endothelial cell-cell interactions. 
A novel integrin alpha5beta1 antagonistic peptide, A5-1, screened by Protein Chip system as a potent angiogenesis inhibitor. 
 
Integrin alpha5beta1 immobilized on a ProteoChip was used to screen new antagonistic peptides from multiple hexapeptide sub-libraries of the positional scanning synthetic peptide combinatorial library (PS-SPCL). The integrin alpha5beta1-Fibronectin interaction was demonstrated on the chip. A novel peptide ligand, A5-1 (VILVLF), with high affinity to integrin alpha5beta1 was identified from the hexapeptide libraries with this chip-based screening method on the basis of a competitive inhibition assay. A5-1 inhibits the integrin-fibronectin interaction in a dose-dependent manner (IC(50); 1.56+/-0.28 microM. In addition, it inhibits human umbilical vein endothelial cell proliferation, migration, adhesion, tubular network formation, and bFGF induced neovascularization in a chick chorioallantoic membrane. These results suggest that A5-1 will be a potent inhibitor of neovascularization. 
Active hair growth (anagen) is associated with angiogenesis. 
 
After the completion of skin development, angiogenesis, i.e., the growth of new capillaries from pre-existing blood vessels, is held to occur in the skin only under pathologic conditions. It has long been noted, however, that hair follicle cycling is associated with prominent changes in skin perfusion, that the epithelial hair bulbs of anagen follicles display angiogenic properties, and that the follicular dermal papilla can produce angiogenic factors. Despite these suggestive observations, no formal proof is as yet available for the concept that angiogenesis is a physiologic event that occurs all over the mature mammalian integument whenever hair follicles switch from resting (telogen) to active growth (anagen). This study uses quantitative histomorphometry and double-immunohistologic detection techniques for the demarcation of proliferating endothelial cells, to show that synchronized hair follicle cycling in adolescent C57BL/6 mice is associated with substantial angiogenesis, and that inhibiting angiogenesis in vivo by the intraperitoneal application of a fumagillin derivative retards experimentally induced anagen development in these mice. Thus, angiogenesis is a physiologic event in normal postnatal murine skin, apparently is dictated by the hair follicle, and appears to be required for normal anagen development. Anagen associated angiogenesis offers an attractive model for identifying the physiologic controls of cutaneous angiogenesis, and an interesting system for screening the effect of potential anti angiogenic drugs in vivo. 
TGFbeta1, back to the future: revisiting its role as a transforming growth factor. 
 
TGFbeta1 was initially identified in culture media from transformed cells as part of a factor that could produce a transformed phenotype in a nontransformed cell line. Subsequently this activity was separated into TGFbeta and TGFalpha an EGF receptor ligand. With the discovery that TGFbeta1 was a potent growth inhibitor of epithelial cells, and the identification of inactivating mutations within the TGFbeta1 signaling pathway in cancers it became clear that TGFbeta1 signaling is a tumor suppressor pathway for early stages of cancer. However many human carcinomas overexpress TGFbeta1 and this is associated with poor patient prognosis and increased frequency of metastasis. Similar results have been obtained with tumor cell lines and experimental animal models. Thus stage specific duality of function is the emerging paradigm for the role of TGFbeta1 in cancer. This review will focus on the evidence for TGFbeta1 as a tumor promoting and metastasis factor and examine the biological and molecular basis for these effects. It is proposed that the switch from tumor suppressor to oncogene reflects genetic or epigenetic alterations in signaling pathways in tumor cells that alter the readout from the TGFbeta1 pathway. 
Grape seed extract inhibits angiogenesis via suppression of the vascular endothelial growth factor receptor signaling pathway. 
 
Blockade of angiogenesis is an important approach for cancer treatment and prevention. Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is one of the most critical factors that induce angiogenesis and has thus become an attractive target for     angiogenesis treatment. However, most current anti VEGF agents often cause some side effects when given chronically. Identification of naturally occurring VEGF inhibitors derived from diet would be one alternative approach with an advantage of known safety. Grape seed extract (GSE), a widely used dietary supplement, is known to have antitumor activity. In this study, we have explored the activity of GSE on VEGF receptor and angiogenesis. We found that GSE could directly inhibit the kinase activity of purified VEGF receptor 2, a novel activity of GSE that has not been characterized. GSE could also inhibit the VEGF receptor/mitogen-activated protein kinase-mediated signaling pathway in endothelial cells. As a result, GSE could inhibit VEGF-induced endothelial cell proliferation and migration as well as sprout formation from aorta ring. In vivo assay further showed that GSE could inhibit tumor growth and tumor angiogenesis of MDA-MB-231 breast cancer cells in mice. Consistent with the in vitro data, GSE treatment of tumor-bearing mice led to concomitant reduction of blood vessel density and phosphorylation of mitogen-activated protein kinase. Depletion of polyphenol with polyvinylpyrrolidone abolished the     angiogenic activity of GSE, suggesting a water-soluble fraction of polyphenol in GSE is responsible for the     angiogenic activity. Taken together, this study indicates that GSE is a well-tolerated and inexpensive natural VEGF inhibitor and could potentially be useful in cancer prevention or treatment. 
The semaphorin 7A receptor Plexin C1 is lost during melanoma metastasis. 
 
The transformation of normal melanocytes, or melanocyte stem cells, to melanoma, is a complex process involving multiple mechanisms. Loss of tumor suppressor proteins, which function as brakes on cell growth, migration, or cell survival, was recognized early on as an important mechanism for initiation and progression of melanoma. Semaphorins and their cognate receptors, Plexins and neuropilins, are involved in neuronal pathfinding, immune function, and tumor progression through effects on blood vessel growth and cell migration. Semaphorin 7A (Sema7A) is a membrane linked semaphorin that is expressed by human keratinocytes, and we have shown that Sema7A binds to human melanocytes through beta1-integrins and the Plexin C1 receptor. Functional studies showed that Sema7A stimulates cytoskeletal reorganization in human melanocytes, resulting in adhesion and dendrite formation. Downstream targets of Plexin C1 signaling in human melanocytes include cofilin and LIM kinase II, both of which are critical mediators of cell adhesion and migration. In this report, we analyzed the expression of Plexin C1 using immunohistochemistry on sections of primary and matched metastatic lesions from 19 subjects and in a large melanoma tumor microarray. Our data show a significant loss of Plexin C1 in metastatic melanoma compared with primary melanoma, suggesting the possibility that the Plexin C1 receptor is a tumor suppressor protein for melanoma. 
Brn-3a, a neuronal transcription factor of the POU gene family: indications for its involvement in cancer and angiogenesis. 
 
Brn-3a, a member of the POU gene family (so-called because of the similarity with the group of transcription factors Pit, Oct, and Unc), was found in neuronal cells engaged in the transcription activity of the p1 and p2 promoters of the most powerful antiapoptotic gene, namely, Bcl-2. The alternative splicing of Brn-3a mRNA produces two molecular forms: a longer, Bcl-2 transactivating form, and a shorter inactive form, lacking 84 AA in the aminoterminus. In neuronal cells, following Brn-3a gene transfection and superexpression, an increase of 30 fold of the Bcl-2 protein occurs, leading to apoptosis protection. However, recent works demonstrate that Brn-3a expression is not restricted to neuronal cells, as its activity was detected also in cancer cells of non-neuronal nature. Looking for mechanisms linking Brn-3a to carcinogenesis, we discuss the role of this transcription factor in influencing Bcl-2/p53 antagonism and Bcl-2/VEGF induction of tumor angiogenesis, concluding this review with a proposal for the oncogenic nature of Brn-3a. 
Endothelial cell migration and vascular endothelial growth factor expression are the result of loss of breast tissue polarity. 
 
Recruiting a new blood supply is a rate-limiting step in tumor progression. In a three-dimensional model of breast carcinogenesis, disorganized, proliferative transformed breast epithelial cells express significantly higher expression of angiogenic genes compared with their polarized, growth-arrested nonmalignant counterparts. Elevated vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) secretion by malignant cells enhanced recruitment of endothelial cells (EC) in heterotypic cocultures. Significantly, phenotypic reversion of malignant cells via reexpression of HoxD10, which is lost in malignant progression, significantly attenuated VEGF expression in a hypoxia-inducible factor 1alpha independent fashion and reduced EC migration. This was due primarily to restoring polarity: forced proliferation of polarized, nonmalignant cells did not induce VEGF expression and EC recruitment, whereas disrupting the architecture of growth-arrested, reverted cells did. These data show that disrupting cytostructure activates the angiogenic switch even in the absence of proliferation and/or hypoxia and restoring organization of malignant clusters reduces VEGF expression and EC activation to levels found in quiescent nonmalignant epithelium. These data confirm the importance of tissue architecture and polarity in malignant progression. 
Adaptor protein Crk is required for ephrin-B1 induced membrane ruffling and focal complex assembly of human aortic endothelial cells. 
 
Endothelial cell migration is an essential step in vasculogenesis and angiogenesis, in which receptor tyrosine kinases play a pivotal role. We investigated the mechanism by which ephrin-B1 promotes membrane ruffling in human aortic endothelial cells, because membrane ruffling heralds cell body migration. We especially focused on the role of Crk adaptor protein in EphB mediated signaling. Using DsRed tagged Crk and a fluorescent time-lapse microscope, we showed that Crk was recruited to the nascent focal complex after ephrin-B1 stimulation. Furthermore, we found that p130(Cas), but not paxillin, recruited Crk to the nascent focal complex. The necessity of Crk in ephrin-B1 induced membrane ruffling was shown both by the overexpression of dominant negative Crk mutants and by the depletion of Crk by using RNA interference. Then, we examined the role of two major downstream molecules of Crk, Rac1 and Rap1. The dominant negative mutant of Rac1 completely inhibited ephrin-B1 induced membrane ruffling and focal complex assembly. In contrast, rap1GAPII, a negative regulator of Rap1, did not inhibit ephrin-B1 induced membrane ruffling. However, in rap1GAPII expressing cells, ephrin-B1 did not induce membrane spreading, probably due to instability of the focal complex. These results indicated that Crk plays a critical role in Rac1 induced membrane ruffling and Rap1 mediated nascent focal complex stabilization contributing to ephrin-B1 induced human aortic endothelial cells migration. 
Arteriogenesis: the development and growth of collateral arteries. 
 
In patients with atherosclerotic vascular diseases, collateral vessels bypassing major arterial obstructions have frequently been observed. This may explain why some patients remain without symptoms or signs of ischemia. The term  arteriogenesis  was introduced to differentiate the formation of collateral arteries from angiogenesis, which mainly occurs in the ischemic, collateral flow dependent tissue. Many observations in various animal models and humans support that the remodeling of preexisting collateral vessels is the mechanism of collateral artery formation. This remodeling process seems to be mainly flow mediated. It involves endothelial cell activation, basal membrane degradation, leukocyte invasion, proliferation of vascular cells, neointima formation (in most species studied), and changes of the extracellular matrix. The contribution of ischemia to arteriogenesis is still unclear, but arteriogenesis clearly can occur in the absence of any significant ischemia. It is questionable, whether collateral arteries also form de novo in ischemic vascular diseases. A better understanding of the mechanisms of arteriogenesis will be important for the design of more effective strategies for the treatment of patients with ischemic vascular diseases. 
[Activation of sterol regulatory element binding protein and its involvement in endothelial cell migration] 
 
OBJECTIVE: To study the activation of sterol regulatory element binding protein (SREBP) and its critical role in endothelial cell migration. METHODS: Bovine aortic endothelial cells (ECs) were cultured. The expression of SREBP and Cdc42 were determined by Western blot and quantitative real-time PCR. Moreover, outward growth migration model and transwell chamber assay were used to detect ECs migration. RESULTS: (1) SREBP was activated during ECs migration. Western blot analysis demonstrated increased active form SREBP in migrating as compared to non-migrating ECs population. SREBP activation decreased as ECs migration slowed (2) Coincidental with SREBP activation, mRNA expression of its target genes such as low density lipoprotein receptor, HMG-CoA reductase, and fatty acid synthase also increased in migrating ECs population as detected by real-time PCR; (3) Migration induced SREBP activation in ECs was inhibited by SREBP-acting protein RNAi and pharmacologically by 25-hydroxycholesterol; (4) Inhibition of SREBP led to decreased ECs migration in various models; (5) Cells genetically deficient in SREBP-acting protein, S1P, or S2P, phenotypically exhibited impaired migration; (6) SREBP inhibition in ECs suppressed the activity of small GTPase Cdc42, a key molecule for ECs motility. CONCLUSIONS: SREBP is activated during and plays a critical role in ECs migration. Targeting SREBP could become a novel approach in fighting diseases involving abnormal ECs migration. 
Effect of transplanted mesenchymal stem cells from rats of different ages on the improvement of heart function after acute myocardial infarction. 
 
BACKGROUND: Mesenchymal stem cells (MSCs) transplantation is of therapeutic potential after ischemic injury in both experimental and clinical studies. Clinically, elderly patients are more vulnerable to acute myocardial infarction (AMI). But little is known about the characteristics of young donor-derived MSCs transplanted to old patients with AMI. The present study was designed to investigate the effect of transplanted MSCs from rats of different ages on the improvement of heart function after AMI. METHODS: MSCs from Sprague-Dawley (SD) rats were isolated and cultured in vitro. The apoptosis characteristics of MSCs were observed under conditions of ischemia and anoxia. SD rats underwent MI received intramyocardial injection of MSCs from young donor rats (n = 8), old donor rats (n = 8), respectively. AMI control group received equal volume physiological saline. Immunofluorescence was used to observe the differentiation of the grafted cells into cardiomyocytes. Four weeks after cell transplantation, reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) and immunohistochemistry for vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), VIII-factor immunohistochemistry for vessel density, TUNEL, caspase-3 for cardiomyocyte apoptosis, echocardiography and hemodynamic detection for heart function were performed. RESULTS: The apoptosis rate of the old donor-derived MSCs group was significantly higher than that of the young donor-derived MSCs group under conditions of ischemia and anoxia (P  less than  0.05). Engrafted MSCs survived, proliferated and differentiated into myocardium-like cells. VEGF gene expression and capillary density in the old donor-derived group were lower than those in the young donor-derived group but higher than those in the control group (P  less than  0.05). The transplantation of old donor-derived MSCs attenuated apoptosis of cardiomyocytes in the peri-infarct region compared with the control group and the effect was elevated in young donor-derived MSCs (P  less than  0.05). The heart functions (left ventricle ejection fraction (LVEF), left ventricle fractional shortening (LVFS)) were improved more significantly in the old donor-derived MSCs group than in the control group and the heart function in the young donor-derived MSCs group further improved (P  less than  0.05). CONCLUSIONS: Young donor-derived MSCs can improve heart function significantly through angiogenesis and decreasing cardiomyocyte apoptosis when transplanted to the infarcted area. 
Hypoxia-responsive element mediated soluble Tie2 vector exhibits an anti angiogenic activity in vitro under hypoxic condition. 
 
Hypoxia-inducible factor-1 (HIF-1) is one of the key mammalian transcription factors and shows increased levels in both protein stability and intrinsic transcriptional activity during low oxygen tension. Hypoxia-activated functional HIF-1 protein binds to hypoxia-responsive elements (HRE) in the enhancers of several genes including VEGF, the major player in angiogenesis, and initiates their mRNA expression. The molecular mechanisms regulating the gene expression under hypoxic conditions could increase the therapeutic window of tumor-specific delivery systems. In this study, to examine hypoxia-specific production of anti angiogenic therapeutic gene, we constructed 5 copies of HRE (5xHRE) of human VEGF linked to soluble Tie2 (sTie2) driven by minimal SV40 promoter (5xHRE/SV40/sTie2). Our data showed that under hypoxia the secreted sTie2 selectively inhibited tube formation and migration capacities of endothelial cells in vitro. Hence, we propose that the vector system, 5xHRE/SV40/sTie2, might be a useful tool for down-regulating tumor angiogenesis under hypoxic condition. 
Mechanical regulation of the    angiogenic factor CCN1/CYR61 gene requires the combined activities of MRTF-A and CREB-binding protein histone acetyltransferase. 
 
Smooth muscle-rich tissues respond to mechanical overload by an adaptive hypertrophic growth combined with activation of angiogenesis, which potentiates their mechanical overload bearing capabilities. Neovascularization is associated with mechanical strain-dependent induction of angiogenic factors such as CCN1, an immediate-early gene-encoded matricellular molecule critical for vascular development and repair. Here we have demonstrated that mechanical strain-dependent induction of the CCN1 gene involves signaling cascades through RhoA mediated actin remodeling and the p38 stress-activated protein kinase (SAPK). Actin signaling controls serum response factor (SRF) activity via SRF interaction with the myocardin-related transcriptional activator (MRTF)-A and tethering to a single CArG box sequence within the CCN1 promoter. Such activity was abolished in mechanically stimulated mouse MRTF-A(-/-) cells or upon inhibition of CREB-binding protein (CBP) histone acetyltransferase (HAT) either pharmacologically or by siRNAs. Mechanical strain induced CBP mediated acetylation of histones 3 and 4 at the SRF-binding site and within the CCN1 gene coding region. Inhibition of p38 SAPK reduced CBP HAT activity and its recruitment to the SRF.MRTF-A complex, whereas enforced induction of p38 by upstream activators (e.g. MKK3 and MKK6) enhanced both CBP HAT and CCN1 promoter activities. Similarly, mechanical overload induced CCN1 gene expression in vivo was associated with nuclear localization of MRTF-A and enrichment of the CCN1 promoter with both MRTF-A and acetylated histone H3. Taken together, these data suggest that signal controlled activation of SRF, MRTF-A, and CBP provides a novel connection between mechanical stimuli and angiogenic gene expression. 
Therapeutic Electromagnetic Field (TEMF) and gamma irradiation on human breast cancer xenograft growth, angiogenesis and metastasis. 
 
BACKGROUND: The effects of a rectified semi-sinewave signal (15 mT amplitude, 120 pulses per second, EMF Therapeutics, Inc.) (TEMF) alone and in combination with gamma irradiation (IR) therapy in nude mice bearing a human MDA MB231 breast cancer xenograft were tested. Green fluorescence protein transfected cancer cells were injected into the mammary fat pad of young female mice. Six weeks later, mice were randomly divided into four treatment groups: untreated controls; 10 minute daily TEMF; 200 cGy of IR every other day (total 800 cGy); IR plus daily TEMF. Some mice in each group were euthanized 24 hours after the end of IR. TEMF treatment continued for 3 additional weeks. Tumor sections were stained for: endothelial cells with CD31 and PAS or hypoxia inducible factor 1alpha (HIF). RESULTS: Most tumors  less than 35 mm3 were white but tumors  greater than 35 mm3 were pink and had a vascularized capsule. The cortex within 100 microns of the capsule had little vascularization. Blood vessels, capillaries, and endothelial pseudopods were found at  greater than 100 microns from the capsule (subcortex). Tumors  greater than 35 mm3 treated with IR 24 hours previously or with TEMF had decreased blood vessels in the subcortex and more endothelial pseudopods projecting into hypoxic, HIF positive areas than tumors from the control group. Mice that received either IR or TEMF had significantly fewer lung metastatic sites and slower tumor growth than did untreated mice. No harmful side effects were attributed to TEMF. CONCLUSION: TEMF therapy provided a safe means for retarding tumor vascularization, growth and metastasis. 
AngiomiRs--key regulators of angiogenesis. 
 
The formation of new blood vessels through the process of angiogenesis is critical in vascular development and homeostasis. Aberrant angiogenesis leads to a variety of diseases, such as ischemia and cancer. Recent studies have revealed important roles for miRNAs in regulating endothelial cell (EC) function, especially angiogenesis. Mice with EC-specific deletion of Dicer, a key enzyme for generating miRNAs, display defective postnatal angiogenesis. Specific miRNAs (angiomiRs) have recently been shown to regulate angiogenesis in vivo. miRNA-126, an EC-restricted miRNA, regulates vascular integrity and developmental angiogenesis. miR-378, miR-296, and the miR-17-92 cluster contribute to tumor angiogenesis. Manipulating angiomiRs in the settings of pathological vascularization represents a new therapeutic approach. 
Intracerebral grafting of cultured autologous skin fibroblasts into the rat striatum: an assessment of graft size and ultrastructure. 
 
To identify a suitable donor cell population for gene therapy applications to the central nervous system, primary fibroblasts isolated from skin biopsies and maintained in culture are employed as autologous cells for intracerebral grafting within the adult rat striatum. Results from the present investigation reveal that cultured primary skin fibroblasts cease to proliferate once they reach confluence; these cells are thus contact inhibited in vitro. Following implantation within the striatum, the volume of the primary fibroblast grafts, stained immunohistochemically for fibronectin, does not differ significantly at 3 and 8 weeks. The graft size is dependent on the density of the cell suspension, but not dependent on either the number of passages the cells are taken through in culture prior to grafting or on the postoperative survival period. Ultrastructural evidence reveals that at 8 weeks the grafts are composed primarily of collagen and fibroblasts with rough endoplasmic reticulum and vesicles. Reactive astrocytic processes and phagocytic cells are also present in the grafts. The grafts are extensively vascularized with capillaries composed of nonfenestrated endothelium; intercellular junctions are evident at sites of apposition between endothelial cells. It is concluded that primary skin fibroblasts are able to survive for at least 8 weeks following intracerebral implantation and continue to synthesize collagen and fibronectin in vivo. Also, the grafts maintain a constant volume between 3 and 8 weeks, thereby indicating that primary skin fibroblasts do not produce tumors. Finally, dynamic host-to-graft interactions--including phagocytic migration, astrocytic hypertrophy and infiltration within the grafts, and angiogenesis -are features that constitute the structural integration of primary skin fibroblasts grafted within the adult rat central nervous system. 
Aflibercept (AVE0005): an alternative strategy for inhibiting tumour angiogenesis by vascular endothelial growth factors. 
 
BACKGROUND: Aberrant angiogenesis is a landmark feature in cancer, which is important for proliferation, growth and metastasis, and is mediated by various pro angiogenic factors. The VEGF pathway is one of the most important and best-studied angiogenic pathways. Inhibition of this pathway may provide clinical benefits to cancer patients. OBJECTIVES: Strategies to inhibit the VEGF pathway, including antibodies to VEGF, antibodies to the extracellular domain of VEGFR-1 or VEGFR-2, decoy receptors for VEGF and tyrosine kinase inhibitors of VEGFRs, are summarized. METHODS: This review outlines and compares the latest development of these strategies, with emphasis on aflibercept, a novel decoy fusion protein of domain 2 of VEGFR-1 and domain 3 of VEGFR-2 with the Fc fragment of IgG1. RESULTS: Aflibercept was shown to have early clinical activity. Multiple studies are ongoing to determine the clinical benefits of aflibercept in cancer patients. 
Vascular proliferation and enhanced expression of endothelial nitric oxide synthase in human peritoneum exposed to long-term peritoneal dialysis. 
 
Long-term peritoneal dialysis (PD) is associated with alterations in peritoneal permeability and loss of ultrafiltration. These changes originate from increased peritoneal surface area, but the morphologic and molecular mechanisms involved remain unknown. The hypothesis that modifications of activity and/or expression of nitric oxide synthase (NOS) isozymes might play a role in these modifications, via enhanced local production of nitric oxide, was tested in this study. NOS activities were measured by the L-citrulline assay in peritoneal biopsies from seven control subjects, eight uremic patients immediately before the onset of PD, and 13 uremic patients on short-term ( less than 18 mo, n = 6) or long-term( greater than 18 mo, n = 7) PD. Peritoneal NOS activity is increased fivefold in long-term PD patients compared with control subjects. In uremic patients, NOS activity is positively correlated with the duration of PD. Increased NOS activity is mediated solely by Ca(2+)-dependent NOS and, as shown by immunoblotting, an upregulation of endothelial NOS. The biologic relevance of increased NOS in long-term PD was demonstrated by enhanced nitrotyrosine immunoreactivity and a significant increase in vascular density and endothelial area in the peritoneum. Immunoblotting and immunostaining studies demonstrated an upregulation of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) mostly along the endothelium lining peritoneal blood vessels in long-term PD patients. In the latter, VEGF colocalized with the advanced glycation end product pentosidine deposits. These data provide a morphologic (angiogenesis and increased endothelial area) and molecular (enhanced NOS activity and endothelial NOS upregulation) basis for explaining the permeability changes observed in long-term PD. They also support the implication of local advanced glycation end product deposits and liberation of VEGF in that process. 
The merits of vascular targeting for gynecologic malignancies. 
 
Neovascularization is an early and critical step in tumor development and progression. Tumor vessels are distinct from their normal counterparts morphologically as well as at a molecular level. Recent studies on factors involved in tumor vascular development have identified new therapeutic targets for inhibiting tumor neovascularization and thus tumor progression. However, the process of tumor blood vessel formation is complex, and each tumor exhibits unique features in its vasculature. An understanding of the relative contribution of various pathways in the development of tumor vasculature is critical for developing effective and selective therapeutic approaches. Several such agents are currently in clinical trials, and many others are under development. In this review, the mechanisms and factors involved in tumor blood vessel formation are discussed. In addition, selected novel classes of antivascular therapies, including those targeting tumor endothelial cells and other components of the tumor vasculature, are summarized. 
Regulation of skin microvasculature angiogenesis, cell migration, and permeability by a specific inhibitor of PKCalpha. 
 
Activation of protein kinase C (PKC) induces phenotypic changes in the morphology of microvascular endothelial cells that affect major functions of the microvasculature. These functions include the first stages of sprouting in angiogenesis, cell migration following wounding, and vascular permeability. The specific isoform(s) of PKC responsible for each of these changes has not been previously identified. In this study, we used two inflammatory agents, IL-1beta and phorbol myristic acetate, to activate PKC isozymes and specific inhibitors of PKCalpha (Go6976) and PKCbeta (hispidin) to distinguish how each of these isoform(s) controls angiogenesis, wound healing, and permeability. In all cases, only inhibition of PKCalpha inhibited each of these functions when compared to the inhibition of PKCbeta. Additional analysis of the mechanism of action of Go6976 (RT-PCR, Western blots, and immunohistochemistry) of the changes in the phosphorylated and nonphosphorylated forms of PKCalpha in the cell membrane and cytoplasm confirmed the specificity of PKCalpha inhibition by Go6976. These studies therefore indicate a specific and a regulatory role of the PKCalpha isoform in three major endothelial cell functions that are important in the maintenance of microvascular homeostasis. 
Proliferative diabetic retinopathy is associated with a low level of the natural ocular anti angiogenic agent pigment epithelium-derived factor (PEDF) in aqueous humor. a pilot study. 
 
Retinopathy is the most common microvascular diabetes complication and represents a major threat to the eyesight. The aim of this study was to address the role of pro- and anti angiogenic molecules in diabetic retinopathy in the aqueous humor of the eye. Aqueous humor was collected at cataract surgery from 19 diabetic patients and from 13 age- and sex-matched normoglycemic controls. Levels of pro angiogenic vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and angiogenic inhibitor pigment epithelium-derived factor (PEDF) were determined. Angiogenic activity of the aqueous humor was quantified by measuring its effect on the migration of capillary endothelial cells. In the aqueous fluid, VEGF levels were increased in diabetics (mean values: 501 vs. 367 pg/ml; p = 0.05), compared to controls. PEDF was found to be decreased in diabetics (mean values: 2080 vs. 5780 ng/ml; p = 0.04) compared to controls. In seven diabetic patients with proliferative retinopathy, the most profound finding was a significant decrease of the PEDF level (mean value: 237 ng/ml), whereas VEGF levels were comparable to diabetic patients without proliferation (mean value: 3153; p = 0.003). Angiogenic activity in samples of patients from the control group was generally inhibitory due to PEDF, and inhibition was blocked by neutralizing antibodies to PEDF. Likewise, in diabetics without proliferation, angiogenic activity was also blocked by antibodies to PEDF. We will demonstrate here that the level of the natural ocular anti angiogenic agent PEDF is inversely associated with proliferative retinopathy. PEDF is an important negative regulator of angiogenic activity of aqueous humor. Our data may have implications for the development of novel regimens for diabetic retinopathy. 
Morphogenesis of embryonic CNS vessels. 
 
This chapter focuses on the morphology of blood vessel formation in and around the early central nervous system (CNS, i.e., brain and spinal cord) of avian embryos. We discuss cell lineages, proliferation and interactions of endothelial cells, pericytes and smooth muscle cells, and macrophages. Due to space limitations, we can not review the molecular control of CNS angiogenesis, but refer the reader to other chapters in this book and to recent publications on the assembly of the vasculature (1,2). 
Inhibition of PDGF stimulated and matrix mediated proliferation of human vascular smooth muscle cells by SPARC is independent of changes in cell shape or cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitors. 
 
Interactions among growth factors, cells, and extracellular matrix regulate proliferation during normal development and in pathologies such as atherosclerosis. SPARC (secreted protein, acidic, and rich in cysteine) is a matrix associated glycoprotein that modulates the adhesion and proliferation of vascular cells. In this study, we demonstrate that SPARC inhibits human arterial smooth muscle cell proliferation stimulated by platelet-derived growth factor or by adhesion to monomeric type I collagen. Binding studies with SPARC and SPARC peptides indicate specific and saturable interaction with smooth muscle cells that involves the C-terminal Ca2+-binding region of the protein. We also report that SPARC arrests monomeric collagen supported smooth muscle cell proliferation in the late G1-phase of the cell cycle in the absence of an effect on cell shape or on levels of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitors. Cyclin-dependent kinase-2 activity, p107 and cyclin A levels, and retinoblastoma protein phosphorylation are markedly reduced in response to the addition of exogenous SPARC and/or peptides derived from specific domains of SPARC. Thus, SPARC, previously characterized as an inhibitor of platelet-derived growth factor binding to its receptor, also antagonizes smooth muscle cell proliferation mediated by monomeric collagen at the level of cyclin-dependent kinase-2 activity. 
Retinal microangiopathies overlying pigment epithelial detachment in age-related macular degeneration. 
 
PURPOSE: To evaluate alterations in the retinal vasculature overlying pigment epithelial detachments (PED) in exudative age-related macular degeneration (ARMD) using indocyanine green and fluorescein angiography. METHODS: Forty-one patients (41 eyes) with a clinical diagnosis of exudative ARMD with PED underwent simultaneous fluorescein and indocyanine green angiography, also under high (10 degrees ) magnification. Vascular abnormalities in the retina were compared between patients with vascularized (n = 34, group 1) and nonvascularized (n = 7, group 2) PED on indocyanine green angiography and correlated with the size of the PED and the presence of serous retinal detachment. RESULTS: In all, 67 vascular abnormalities were found by indocyanine green angiography and only 22 by fluorescein angiography; this finding was statistically significant (P  less than  0.0001). The finding of retinal vasculopathy (32 patients in group 1 and two patients in group 2) was directly correlated with the presence of choroidal neovascularizations (P = 0.002). There was also a direct correlation between the presence of choroidal neovascularization and size of the PED (P = 0.03). The number of retinal vascular findings was not significantly correlated with serous elevation of the retina. CONCLUSIONS: Retinal vasculopathies may be observed in eyes with PED and are detectable by indocyanine green and fluorescein angiography. 
Rab GTPase regulation of VEGFR2 trafficking and signaling in endothelial cells. 
 
OBJECTIVE: Vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2 (VEGFR2) is a receptor tyrosine kinase that regulates vascular physiology. However, mechanism(s) by which VEGFR2 signaling and trafficking is coordinated are not clear. Here, we have tested endocytic Rab GTPases for regulation of VEGFR2 trafficking and signaling linked to endothelial cell migration. METHODS AND RESULTS: Quiescent VEGFR2 displays endosomal localization and colocalization with the Rab5a GTPase, an early endosome fusion regulator. Expression of GTP or GDP bound Rab5a mutants block activated VEGFR2 trafficking and degradation. Manipulation of Rab7a GTPase activity associated with late endosomes using overexpression of wild-type or mutant proteins blocks activated VEGFR2 trafficking and degradation. Depletion of Rab7a decreased VEGFR2 Y1175 phosphorylation but increased p42/44 (pERK1/2) MAPK phosphorylation. Endothelial cell migration was increased by Rab5a depletion but decreased by Rab7a depletion. CONCLUSIONS: Rab5a and Rab7a regulate VEGFR2 trafficking toward early and late endosomes. Our data suggest that VEGFR2 mediated regulation of endothelial function is dependent on different but specific Rab mediated GTP hydrolysis activity required for endosomal trafficking. 
Promoting angiogenesis via manipulation of VEGF responsiveness with notch signaling. 
 
Promoting angiogenesis via delivery of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and other angiogenic factors is both a potential therapy for cardiovascular diseases and a critical aspect for tissue regeneration. The recent demonstration that VEGF signaling is modulated by the Notch signaling pathway, however, suggests that inhibiting Notch signaling may enhance regional neovascularization, by altering the responsiveness of local endothelial cells to angiogenic stimuli. We tested this possibility with in vitro assays using human endothelial cells, as well as in a rodent hindlimb ischemia model. Treatment of cultured human endothelial cells with DAPT, a gamma secretase inhibitor, increased cell migration and sprout formation in response to VEGF stimulation with a biphasic dependence on DAPT concentration. Further, delivery of an appropriate combination of DAPT and VEGF from an injectable alginate hydrogel system into ischemic hindlimbs led to a faster recovery of blood flow than VEGF or DAPT alone; perfusion levels reached 80% of the normal level by week 4 with combined DAPT and VEGF delivery. Direct intramuscular or intraperitoneal injection of DAPT did not result in the same level of improvement, suggesting that appropriate presentation of DAPT (gel delivery) is important for its activity. DAPT delivery from the hydrogels also did not lead to any adverse side effects, in contrast to systemic introduction of DAPT. Altogether, these results suggest a new approach to promote angiogenesis by controlling Notch signaling, and may provide new options to treat patients with diseases that diminish angiogenic responsiveness. 
Angiogenesis  biomedical technology. 
 
All of these studies show that angiogenesis research can benefit from new biomedical technology tools currently being developed, as well as contribute by providing new technologies that can be used in other areas of medicine. It is hoped that the chapters in this book in this area will provide the reader with an up-to-date appreciation of some of the exciting research that is currently being pursued. 
Upregulation of vascular endothelial growth factor receptors is associated with advanced neuroblastoma. 
 
BACKGROUND: Angiogenesis is essential for tumor growth and relies on the production of angiogenic factors. Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is a major regulator of angiogenesis that binds to tyrosine kinase receptors Flt-1 and KDR. The interaction of VEGF and its receptors at gene and protein levels in neuroblastoma remains widely unknown. METHODS: Tumor biopsy specimens and serum were obtained from 37 neuroblastoma patients; adrenal biopsy sections and sera of 7 normal children served as controls. Biopsy specimens were examined by real-time reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) and Western blotting; serum was analyzed by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). VEGF-A(165), B, C, Flt-1, and KDR were analyzed. RESULTS: VEGF isoforms and its receptors' mRNA were expressed in neuroblastoma and control tissues. Whereas the ligands were increased in stages III and IV, the receptors were upregulated in stage III only. At protein level, VEGF-B and C, Flt-1, and KDR were not detectable in tissue lysates, whereas VEGF-A was increased in stages III and IV. Serum VEGF protein levels were upregulated in stage III. CONCLUSIONS: VEGF-A(165) is one of the major angiogenesis regulators among the ligands' family of VEGF, whereas its receptors KDR, and most probably Flt-1, may contribute to a poor prognosis (angiogenic) phenotype, as indicated by their upregulated MRNA levels in stage III neuroblastoma. VEGF-A(165) mainly contributes to increased serum VEGF levels and may serve as a diagnostic tool in advanced-stage neuroblastoma. 
Transcriptional and post-translation regulation of the Tie1 receptor by fluid shear stress changes in vascular endothelial cells. 
 
The interaction between the vascular endothelium and hemodynamic forces (and more specifically, fluid shear stress), induced by the flow of blood, plays a major role in vascular remodeling and in new blood vessels formation via a process termed arteriogenesis. Tie1 is an orphan tyrosine kinase receptor expressed almost exclusively in endothelial cells and is required for normal vascular development and maintenance. The present study demonstrates that Tie1 expression is rapidly down-regulated in endothelial cells exposed to shear stress, and more so to shear stress changes. This down-regulation is accompanied by a rapid cleavage of Tie1 and binding of the cleaved Tie1 45 kDa endodomain to Tie2. The rapid cleavage of Tie1 is followed by a transcriptional down-regulation in response to shear stress. The activity of the Tie1 promoter is suppressed by shear stress and by tumor necrosis factor alpha. Shear stress induced transcriptional suppression of Tie1 is mediated by a negative shear stress response element, localized in a region of 250 bp within the promoter. The rapid down-regulation of Tie1 by shear stress changes and its rapid binding to Tie2 may be required for destabilization of endothelial cells in order to initiate the process of vascular restructuring. 
Store operated calcium entry promotes shape change in pulmonary endothelial cells expressing Trp1. 
 
Activation of Ca2+ entry is known to produce endothelial cell shape change, leading to increased permeability, leukocyte migration, and initiation of angiogenesis in conduit vessel endothelial cells. The mode of Ca2+ entry regulating cell shape is unknown. We hypothesized that activation of store operated Ca2+ channels (SOCs) is sufficient to promote cell shape change necessary for these processes. SOC activation in rat pulmonary arterial endothelial cells increased free cytosolic Ca2+ that was dependent on a membrane current having a net inward component of 5.45 +/- 0.90 pA/pF at -80 mV. Changes in endothelial cell shape accompanied SOC activation and were dependent on Ca2+ entry induced reconfiguration of peripheral (cortical) filamentous actin (F-actin). Because the identity of pulmonary endothelial SOCs is unknown, but mammalian homologues of the Drosophila melanogaster transient receptor potential (trp) gene have been proposed to form Ca2+ entry channels in nonexcitable cells, we performed RT-PCR using Trp oligonucleotide primers in both rat and human pulmonary arterial endothelial cells. Both cell types were found to express Trp1, but neither expressed Trp3 nor Trp6. Our study indicates that 1) Ca2+ entry in pulmonary endothelial cells through SOCs produces cell shape change that is dependent on site specific rearrangement of the microfilamentous cytoskeleton and 2) Trp1 may be a component of pulmonary endothelial SOCs. 
[Ambiguity role of neutrophils in oncogenesis] 
 
The review is focused on the participation of polymorphonuclear granulocytes (neutrophils) in development and spreading of a tumor. We consider both the well known functions of neutrophils (degranulation, production of reactive oxygen species (ROS)) and the recently shown one (presentation of an antigene). The special attention is focused on the ambiguity of the neutrophil role in oncogenesis. The dominant view is that neutrophils display exclusively antitumor properties. The update information testifies about protumoral activity of neutrophils: they migrate to a tumor and promote angiogenesis and metastasis at late stages of the tumor. It is interesting that certain components of neutrophil cytotoxic arsenal (ROS, cytokines, specific enzymes) participate both in antitumoral defenses of an organism and protumoral activity. 
Involvement of PTEN promoter methylation in cerebral cavernous malformations. 
 
BACKGROUND AND PURPOSE: Cerebral cavernous malformations (CCMs) are prevalent cerebral vascular lesions involving aberrant angiogenesis. However, the underlying mechanism is poorly understood. Phosphatase and tension homolog deleted on chromosome 10 (PTEN), a tumor suppressor, is frequently deficient in various pathologies due to mutation or epigenetic alterations. PTEN promoter hypermethylation is a major epigenetic silencing mechanism leading to activation of angiogenesis in tumors. The present study aimed to investigate whether PTEN promoter methylation was involved in CCMs. METHODS: PTEN promoter methylation was detected in surgical specimens of CCMs (n=69) by methylation-specific polymerase chain reaction. The methylation status was correlated to the clinical manifestations and to PTEN expression, which was analyzed by both Western blot and immunohistochemistry. To investigate the endothelial proliferation and the potential signaling pathways affected by PTEN methylation, proliferating cell nuclear antigen as well as phosphor-Akt and phosphor-Erk1,2 were detected by immunofluorescence and Western blot, respectively, in CCM specimens. RESULTS: Methylation-specific polymerase chain reaction revealed PTEN promoter methylation in 15.9% CCMs. Strikingly, 5 of 6 familial CCMs showed PTEN promoter methylation (83.3%), which was significantly higher than in sporadic cases (9.4%; P<0.001). In addition, PTEN promoter methylation appeared more frequently in multiple CCMs, including familial cases (46.7%), than that in single-lesioned CCMs (11.8%; P<0.05). Immunostaining and Western blot revealed a more significant PTEN downregulation in PTEN methylated CCMs in comparison to PTEN unmethylated CCMs. Reduced PTEN expression was inversely correlated to the expression of proliferating cell nuclear antigen and to the activation of Erk1,2, but not of Akt. CONCLUSIONS: We reported here for the first time the involvement of PTEN promoter methylation in CCMs, particularly in familial CCMs, suggesting this epigenetic alteration as a potential pathomechanism of CCMs. The identification of Erk1,2 as triggered signaling in the lesions may be valuable for the development of effective therapy for this disease. 
Domain 5 of cleaved high molecular weight kininogen inhibits endothelial cell migration through Akt. 
 
Domain 5 (D5) of cleaved high molecular weight kininogen (HKa) inhibits angiogenesis in vivo and endothelial cell migration in vitro, but the cell signaling pathways involved in HKa and D5 inhibition of endothelial cell migration are incompletely delineated. This study examines the mechanism of HKa and D5 inhibition of two potent stimulators of endothelial cell migration, sphingosine 1-phosphate (S1P) and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), that act through the P13-kinase-Akt signaling pathway. HKa and D5 inhibit bovine pulmonary artery endothelial cell (BPAE) or human umbilical vein endothelial cell chemotaxis in the modified-Boyden chamber in response toVEGF or S1P. The inhibition of migration by HKa is reversed by antibodies to urokinase-type plasminogen activator receptor. Both HKa and D5 decrease the speed of BPAE cell migration and alter the morphology in live, time-lapse microscopy after stimulation with S1P or VEGF. HKa and D5 reduce the localization of paxillin to the focal adhesions after S1P and VEGF stimulation. To better understand the intracellular signaling pathways, we examined the effect of HKa on the phosphorylation of Akt and its downstream effector, GSK-3alpha HKa and D5 inhibit phosphorylation of Akt and GSK-3alpha after stimulation withVEGF and S1P. Inhibitors of Akt and P13-kinase, the upstream activator of Akt, block endothelial cell migration and disrupt paxillin localization to the focal adhesions after stimulation with VEGF and S1P. Therefore we suggest that HKa through its D5 domain alters P13-kinase-Akt signaling to inhibit endothelial cell migration through alterations in the focal adhesions. 
Formation of new bone during vertical distraction osteogenesis of the human mandible is related to the presence of blood vessels. 
 
We examined the effect of distraction rate on blood vessel growth in intramembraneous ossification after vertical distraction osteogenesis in the human mandible. Six edentulous patients (aged 60+/-9 years) with a severely atrophic mandible underwent bone augmentation with distraction osteogenesis. Two distraction rates (0.5 and 1 mm/day) were compared and for each group three patients were analyzed. Vascular histomorphometry was carried out in two different areas in the distraction gap: (1) in the first and (2) in the second 1 mm area from the osteotomy line, representing the oldest and younger new-bone area, respectively. Correlation analysis was performed between blood vessel parameters and the amount of new bone formed during distraction. Histological analysis demonstrated the presence of blood vessels throughout the soft connective tissue in the distraction gap. The volume density of blood vessels between the two investigated areas was significantly lower in the 1 mm/day groups, suggesting a delay in angiogenesis in this group of patients. A positive correlation between blood vessel volume and bone volume density was found in the younger new-bone area but not in the oldest new-bone area. This correlation was due to a higher number of blood vessels rather than to a larger size of the blood vessels. Our data suggest that the lower blood vessel density found in the patients with 1 mm/day distraction rate may be related to disruption of angiogenesis in the soft connective tissue of the gap or to a less optimal mechanical stimulation of cells involved in angiogenesis. This probably results in the slower rate of osteogenesis seen at the 1 mm/day distraction rate compared with the 0.5 mm/day distraction rate. The data support the concept that a positive relationship exists between the density of blood vessels and the formation of bone. For distraction of the human mandible in elderly patients, a distraction rate of 0.5 mm/day seems beneficial. 
Protection from experimental ocular herpetic keratitis by a heat-killed virus vaccine. 
 
New Zealand white rabbits were given limbal inoculations of a heat-killed suspension of herpes simplex virus (HSV) in a lysate of human embryonic kidney cells. At intervals of four to 14 days, the animals were challenged by intrastromal inoculation with 10,000 plaque-forming units of viable HSV. Epithelial keratitis, disciform edema, and necrotizing keratitis with neovascularization of the cornea developed in control animals. Epithelial keratitis and corneal edema also developed in the immunized animals during the first week after virus challenge, but these symptoms rapidly resolved during the following weeks. The absence of iritis, neovascularization, and necrotizing keratitis in the corneas of the immunized animals was particularly striking. 
Subretinal neovascularization following rubella retinopathy. 
 
A 17-year-old girl and an 11-year-old girl with rubella retinopathy had decreased vision in one eye secondary to subretinal neovascularization and hemorrhage. In both cases a disciform scar with permanent decrease in central vision resulted. 
Possible role of cyclooxygenase II in the acquisition of ovarian luteal function in rodents. 
 
The development of the corpus luteum (CL), which involves angiogenesis, is essential for the establishment of early pregnancy. We investigated the roles of the prostaglandin synthases cyclooxygenase (COX) I and COX-II in angiogenesis and progesterone production in the newly formed CL, using inhibitors of the COX enzymes and the gonadotropin induced pseudopregnant rat as a model. Injection of indomethacin, a nonselective COX inhibitor, on the day of ovulation and the following day decreased serum levels of progesterone, as did injection of the selective COX-II inhibitor NS-398. In contrast, a selective COX-I inhibitor, SC-560, had no effect on serum progesterone concentrations. None of the inhibitors had any effect on the weight of the superovulated ovaries or on the synthesis of progesterone by cultured luteal cells. To determine whether changes in angiogenesis are responsible for the decrease in progesterone synthesis, we measured hemoglobin and CD34 levels in luteinized ovaries following injection of COX inhibitors and measured the relative frequency of cells positive for platelet-endothelial cell adhesion molecule as a specific marker for endothelial cells. All of these parameters were reduced by the COX-II inhibitors, suggesting that changes in the vasculature are responsible for the decrease in serum progesterone. Histological examination of ovarian corrosion casts indicated that NS-398 inhibited the establishment of luteal capillary vessels following the injection of hCG. The results are consistent with the hypothesis that the activity of COX-II is associated with the formation of functional CL via its stimulation of angiogenesis. 
External beam radiotherapy for subretinal neovascularization in age-related macular degeneration: is this treatment efficient? 
 
PURPOSE: Control of the natural course of subretinal neovascularization (SRNV) in age-related macular degeneration (AMD) is difficult. Only a subset of patients is suitable for laser coagulation. This prospective study aimed to determine the efficacy and individual benefit of external beam radiotherapy (EBRT). METHODS AND MATERIALS: The prospective trial included 287 patients with subfoveal neovascularization due to AMD which was verified by fluorescein angiography. Patients have been treated between January 1996 and October 1997. All patients received a total dose of 16 Gy in 2-Gy daily fractions with 5-6 MeV photons based on computerized treatment planning in individual head mask fixation. This first analysis is based on 73 patients (50 women, 23 men, median age 74.3 years), with a median follow-up of 13.3 months and a minimum follow-up of 11 months. RESULTS: All patients completed therapy and tolerability was good. First clinical control with second angiography was performed 6 weeks after irradiation, then in 3-month intervals. Eighteen patients with SRNV refusing radiotherapy served as a control group and were matched with 18 irradiated patients. After 7 months median visual acuity (VA) was 20/160 for the irradiated and 20/400 for the untreated patients. One year after radiotherapy final median VA was 20/400 in both groups. CONCLUSION: These results suggest that 16 Gy of conventionally fractionated external beam irradiation slows down the visual loss in exudative AMD for only a few months. Patients' reading vision could not be saved for a long-term run. 
Enforced expression of tissue inhibitor of matrix metalloproteinase-3 affects functional capillary morphogenesis and inhibits tumor growth in a murine tumor model. 
 
Homeostasis of the extracellular matrix is a delicate balance between degradation and remodeling, the balance being maintained by the interaction of activated matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs) and specific tissue inhibitors of matrix metalloproteinases (TIMPs). Up-regulation of MMP activity, favoring proteolytic degradation of the basement membrane and extracellular matrix, has been linked to tumor growth and metastasis, as well as tumor-associated angiogenesis, whereas inhibition of MMP activity appears to restrict these processes. We have used retroviral-mediated gene delivery to effect sustained autocrine expression of TIMP-3 in murine neuroblastoma and melanoma tumor cells in order to further examine the ability of TIMPs to inhibit angiogenesis in vivo. Growth of both histologic types of gene-modified tumor cells in severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) mice was significantly restricted when compared with controls. Grossly, these tumors were small and had few feeding vessels. Histologic evaluation revealed that although tumors overexpressing TIMP-3 had an increased number of CD31(+) endothelial cells, these endothelial cells had not formed functional tubules, as evidenced by decreased vessel continuity and minimal pericyte recruitment. This effect appears to be mediated, in part, by decreased expression of vascular endothelial (VE)-cadherin by endothelial cells in the presence of TIMP-3 as seen both in an in vitro assay and in TIMP-3 overexpressing tumors. Taken together, these results demonstrate that overexpression of TIMP-3 can inhibit angiogenesis and associated tumor growth, and that the     angiogenic effects of TIMP-3 appear to be mediated through the inhibition of functional capillary morphogenesis. 
Conjunctival hypoxia in diabetes mellitus. 
 
A frequently cited theory for the pathogenesis of neovascularization in diabetic retinopathy is that retinal hypoxia and/or ischemia release a factor which stimulates neovascularization. To the authors' knowledge, there is no direct in vivo evidence in the human proving this theory. One hundred and twenty-two diabetic subjects were studied to see whether worsening retinopathy was associated with changes in conjunctival oxygen tension (pO2). Diabetics without retinopathy had a conjunctival pO2 which was similar to an age-matched normal population. Diabetics with only background retinopathy had a significantly lower conjunctival pO2 than those without retinopathy (P less than 0.01). Diabetics with proliferative retinopathy showed a conjunctival pO2 that was significantly lower than either of the first two groups (P less than 0.05). The lowest value of all was found in patients with rubeosis iridis. Duration of diabetes alone did not correlate significantly to conjunctival pO2. These findings support the hypoxic theory of diabetic neovascular retinopathy. 
VEGF, angiopoietin-1 and -2 in bronchial asthma: new molecular targets in airway angiogenesis and microvascular remodeling. 
 
Airway angiogenesis and microvascular remodeling are known features of bronchial asthma, but the mechanisms of these structural alterations are just beginning to be elucidated. Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), one of the most potent angiogenic factors, stimulates endothelial cell proliferation and induces the angiogenesis. Recently, considerable attentions have been devoted to the physiological roles of angiopoietin (Ang)-1 and -2 as regulatory factors of VEGF. Ang-1 has been shown to induce the migration and sprouting of endothelial cells, and coexpression of Ang-1 and VEGF enhanced angiogenesis. In the presence of high levels of VEGF, Ang-2 also promotes rapid increase in capillary diameter, remodeling of the basal lamina, proliferation and migration of endothelial cells, and stimulates sprouting of new blood vessels. Thus, VEGF, Ang-1 and -2 may play complementary and coordinated roles in airway angiogenesis and microvascular remodeling, and these structural changes are potentially reversible by therapeutic intervention. The scope of the present review is to discuss from a clinical point of view the potential interactions between VEGF and angiopoietins in the asthmatic airways, and focus on the therapeutic implications targeting for these angiogenic factors. Recently, there is an increasing number of patents which have been focused on the inhibitors of VEGF action. These inhibitors are directed towards the receptors of VEGF or intracellular substrates for the receptors. We will also discuss several patents regarding inhibitors of VEGF action in the present review. 
GDP and AGE receptors: mechanisms of peritoneal damage. 
 
Long-term peritoneal dialysis (PD) is limited by morphological changes of the peritoneal membrane. Structural changes were promoted by toxicity of glucose degradation products (GDPs) which are generated during heat sterilization in peritoneal dialysis fluids (PDFs). Besides their direct toxicity GDPs promote formation of advanced glycation endproducts (AGEs). RAGE (receptor for AGE) is the best characterized signal transduction receptor for AGEs and is expressed on mesothelial cells. The effects of PDFs with different amounts of GDPs were compared on morphological changes in the peritoneal membrane in a RAGE -/- mouse model. It could be demonstrated that RAGE plays a pivotal role in structural damage (e.g. inflammation, neoangiogenesis and fibrosis) of the peritoneal membrane. Further investigations of this pathway with regard to preventing peritoneal fibrosis should be performed to maintain the integrity of the peritoneal membrane in peritoneal dialysis patients. 
Photodynamic therapy with verteporfin for subfoveal choroidal neovascularization secondary to pathologic myopia: long-term study. 
 
PURPOSE: To assess the safety and effectiveness of photodynamic therapy (PDT) with verteporfin for subfoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to pathologic myopia (PM). METHODS: Sixty-two patients (62 eyes) with PM underwent PDT according to the guidelines of the Verteporfin in Photodynamic Therapy Study. Clinical evaluations performed at all study visits included measurement of best-corrected Snellen visual acuity, slit-lamp biomicroscopy, and fundus fluorescein angiography. Patients were followed up at 1 month and 3 months after treatment and thereafter at 3-month intervals. RESULTS: The final visual acuity of the study patients, after a median follow-up of 31 months, improved by  greater than or=1 Snellen lines in 8 patients (13%), deteriorated in 20 (32%), and remained stable in 34 (55%). The baseline visual acuity was similar in the various study groups. The final mean visual acuity in group A (55 years of age or younger) was 20/80 and significantly (P=0.006) better than that (20/138) in group B (older than 55 years of age). The mean final visual acuity in eyes with higher refractive error at baseline (greater than -17 diopters) was significantly better (P=0.014) than that in eyes with lower refractive error (-6 to -10 diopters). CNV size did not affect visual outcomes. CONCLUSION: PDT preserves vision in patients with CNV associated with PM. Younger patients and eyes with higher refractive error appear more likely to benefit from PDT with verteporfin. 
Effect of U-995, a potent shark cartilage-derived angiogenesis inhibitor, on anti angiogenesis and anti-tumor activities. 
 
BACKGROUND: A potent angiogenesis inhibitor, U-995, has been purified from the cartilage of the blue shark (Prionace glauca). U-995 is composed of two single peptides with molecular mass of 10 and 14 kDa, respectively. MATERIALS AND METHODS: U-995 was designed to study human umbilical vein endothelial cell (HUVEC) migration and proliferation in vitro and angiogenesis induced by TNF alpha in chicken chorioallantoic membrane (CAM). Furthermore, we determined the ability of U-995 to inhibiting tumor cell growth and metastasis. RESULTS: U-995 (15 and 30 micrograms/ml) markedly inhibited HUVEC migration and, at 15-50 micrograms/ml produced a dose-dependent decline in [3H]-thymidine incorporation. 30 and 50 micrograms/ml of U-995, when added to TNF alpha induced angiogenesis caused discontinuous and disrupted blood vessels. Moreover, U-995 (30 micrograms/ml) markedly prevented collagenase induced collagenolysis. In addition, when 200 micrograms U-995 was injected i.p. into mice it suppressed sarcoma-180 cell growth and B16-F10 mouse melanoma cell metastasis in vivo. CONCLUSIONS: These results suggest that the anti angiogenic effects of U-995 may be be due to interference with the proliferation and migration of HUVECs as well as inhibition of collagenolysis, thereby leading to inhibition of both angiogenesis and tumor cell growth. 
The in vivo properties of STX243: a potent angiogenesis inhibitor in breast cancer. 
 
The steroidal-based drug 2-ethyloestradiol-3,17-O,O-bis-sulphamate (STX243) has been developed as a potent antiangiogenic and antitumour compound. The objective of this study was to ascertain whether STX243 is more active in vivo than the clinically relevant drug 2-methoxyoestradiol (2-MeOE2) and the structurally similar compound 2-MeOE2-3,17-O,O-bis-sulphamate (STX140). The tumour growth inhibition efficacy, antiangiogenic potential and pharmacokinetics of STX243 were examined using four in vivo models. Both STX243 and STX140 were capable of retarding the growth of MDA-MB-231 xenograft tumours (72 and 63%, respectively), whereas no inhibition was observed for animals treated with 2-MeOE2. Further tumour inhibition studies showed that STX243 was also active against MCF-7 paclitaxel-resistant tumours. Using a Matrigel plug-based model, in vivo angiogenesis was restricted with STX243 and STX140 (50 and 72%, respectively, using a 10 mg kg(-1) oral dose), thereby showing the antiangiogenic activity of both compounds. The pharmacokinetics of STX243 were examined at two different doses using adult female rats. The compound was orally bioavailable (31% after a single 10 mg kg(-1) dose) and resistant to metabolism. These results show that STX243 is a potent in vivo drug and could be clinically effective at treating a number of oncological conditions. 
[Role of the tumor suppressor ARF in oncogenesis] 
 
The paper reviews the data available in the literature on a role of the tumor suppressor ARF in oncogenesis and considers the structure of a gene encoding ARF protein. The p53-dependent and p-53-independent functions of this protein are under many studies. There is evidence for the implication of ARF in angiogenesis. There is more and more information on the role of ARF in the regulation of a cell cycle, apoptosis, and autophagy. The importance of this tumor suppressor in the mechanisms of carcinogenesis is beyond question as the inactivation of ARF suppressor activity leads to the rapid growth of neoplasia. However, the exact mechanisms of ARF action yet remain unclear and require further studies by different specialists at both the molecular genetic and other levels of investigation. 
[Intraepithelial neoplasm of the uterine cervix and angiogenesis: morphologic study] 
 
Thirty uterine cervix specimens sampled following conization or total hysterectomy were studied using histology, histoenzymology (vessel phosphatase alkaline activity), and immunohistochemistry (demonstration of laminin and type IV collagen in epithelium and vessel basement membranes). Pathologic conditions included dystrophia, moderate dysplasia, severe dysplasia, and intraepithelial carcinoma. Results were compared to findings in a control group. We found that the severity of vascular abnormalities correlated positively with the severity of histologic epithelial lesions; this finding is consistent with colposcopic results. Anarchic angiogenesis with large, moniliform, tortuous vessels was seen in severe dysplasias and carcinomas. The vascular anomalies seem to precede the development of histologic lesions in some instances. Histogenesis of the abnormal vessels may involve production of an angiogenic factor by the cancerized epithelia. 
Angiogenesis associated with visceral and subcutaneous adipose tissue in severe human obesity. 
 
OBJECTIVE: The expansion of adipose tissue is linked to the development of its vasculature. However, the regulation of adipose tissue angiogenesis in humans has not been extensively studied. Our aim was to compare the angiogenesis associated with subcutaneous adipose tissue (SAT) and visceral adipose tissue (VAT) from the same obese patients in an in vivo model. RESEARCH DESIGN AND METHODS: Adipose tissue samples from visceral (VAT) and subcutaneous (SAT) sites, obtained from 36 obese patients (mean BMI 46.5 kg/m(2)) during bariatric surgery, were layered on chick chorioallantoic membrane (CAM). RESULTS: Both SAT and VAT expressed angiogenic factors without significant difference for vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) expression. Adipose tissue layered on CAM stimulated angiogenesis. Angiogenic stimulation was macroscopically detectable, with engulfment of the samples, in 39% and was evidenced by angiography in 59% of the samples. A connection between CAM and adipose tissue vessels was evidenced by immunohistochemistry, with recruitment of both avian and human endothelial cells. The angiogenic potency of adipose tissue was not related to its localization (with an angiogenic stimulation in 60% of SAT samples and 61% of VAT samples) or to adipocyte size or inflammatory infiltrate assessed in adipose samples before the graft on CAM. Stimulation of angiogenesis by adipose tissue was nearly abolished by bevacizumab, which specifically targets human VEGF. CONCLUSIONS: We have established a model to study the regulation of angiogenesis by human adipose tissue. This model highlighted the role of VEGF in angiogenesis in both SAT and VAT. 
Expression of basic fibroblast growth factor in normal human tissues. 
 
The distribution of basic fibroblast growth factor (bFGF) was studied immunohistochemically in fresh frozen sections of normal human tissues. Immunodetection was performed with a specific anti-bFGF mouse monoclonal antibody that was found to react with recombinant human bFGF in Western blot analysis, and to specifically neutralize the mitogenic activity of bFGF on bovine vascular endothelial cells. Expression of bFGF on normal human tissues was ubiquitously detected in the basement membranes of all size blood vessels, but was not found in epidermal or epithelial basement membranes of a variety of tissues tested. Intensity and patterns of localization in blood vessels was consistent in various tissues, but varied among different regions of the vascular bed. Whereas homogeneous and intense immunoreactivity were observed in large and intermediate size blood vessels, heterogeneity of expression was found in capillaries. The most intense immunoreactivity was observed in branching capillaries. Endothelial cell staining was heterogeneous and varied in different regions. Strong staining for bFGF was also found in cardiac muscle fibers, smooth muscle cells of mid-size blood vessels, the gut and the myometrium, in central nervous system neurons and cerebellar Purkinje cells, and on epithelial cells of the bronchi, colon, endometrium, and sweat gland ducts of the skin. The presence of bFGF in the extracellular compartment of a diverse variety of organs may play a role in angiogenesis. However, the function of bFGF in parenchymal cells remains to be determined. 
Inhibition of angiogenesis by the cancer chemopreventive agent conjugated linoleic acid. 
 
Dietary conjugated linoleic acid (CLA) has been shown previously to inhibit rat mammary carcinogenesis. In addition to direct effects on mammary epithelial cells,including decreased proliferation and induction of apoptosis, CLA may exert its effects indirectly by inhibiting the differentiation of mammary stromal cells to an endothelial cell type. Specifically, CLA was found to decrease the ability of mammary stromal cells to form complex anastomosing microcapillary networks in vitro on Engelbreth-Holm-Swarm-derived reconstituted basement membrane. This suggested that CLA might inhibit angiogenesis in vivo. To test this possibility, CD2/F(1) mice were placed on synthetic diets containing 0, 1, or 2% CLA for 6 weeks, before angiogenic challenge by s.c. injection with an angiogenic gel substrate (Matrigel pellet assay). After 7 days, the pellets from animals fed the control diet were infiltrated by abundant branching networks of blood vessels with patent lumen-containing RBCs. In contrast, pellets from the CLA-fed animals contained fewer infiltrating cells, which formed limited branching cellular networks, the majority of which had collapsed lumen and no RBCs. Both levels of dietary CLA showed similar effects, with the number of RBC-containing vessels per 20x field decreased to a third of that seen in control. Dietary CLA decreased serum levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and whole mammary gland levels of VEGF and its receptor Flk-1. Both cis-9, trans-11 and trans-10, cis-12 CLA isomers were effective in inhibiting angiogenesis in vitro in a dose-dependent fashion. The ability of CLA to inhibit angiogenesis may contribute to its efficacy as a chemopreventive agent. 
Angiopoietin-1 prevents VEGF-induced endothelial permeability by sequestering Src through mDia. 
 
Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and Angiopoietin 1 (Ang1) are both potent proangiogenic factors, but, whereas VEGF causes vascular permeability, Ang1 stabilizes blood vessels and protects them from VEGF-induced plasma leakage. The antivascular permeability mechanisms deployed by Ang1 are still undefined. Here, we demonstrate that Ang1 halts the ability of VEGF to induce the phosphorylation dependent redistribution of the adhesion molecule VE-cadherin, thereby rescuing the endothelial barrier function. Ang1 inhibits the activation of Src by VEGF, the most upstream component of the pathway linking VEGF receptors to VE-cadherin internalization. Indeed, Ang1 promotes the activation of mDia through RhoA, resulting in the association of mDia with Src. This ultimately deprives VEGF receptors of an essential molecule required for promoting the disruption of endothelial cell-cell contacts and paracellular permeability. 
Vascular endothelial growth factor-B and vascular endothelial growth factor-C expression in renal cell carcinomas: regulation by the von Hippel-Lindau gene and hypoxia. 
 
Angiogenesis is essential for tumor growth and metastasis. It is regulated by numerous angiogenic factors, one of the most important being vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF). Recently VEGF-B and VEGF-C, two new VEGF family members, have been identified that bind to the tyrosine kinase receptors flt-1 (VEGFR1), KDR (VEGFR2), and flt-4 (VEGFR3). Although the importance of VEGF-A has been shown in renal carcinomas, the contribution of these new ligands in kidney tumors is not clear. We have, therefore, measured the mRNA level of VEGF-B and VEGF-C together with their receptors by RNase protection assay (RPA) in 26 normal kidney samples and 45 renal cell cancers. We observed a significant up-regulation of VEGF-B (P = 0.002) but not VEGF-C (P = 0.3) in neoplastic kidney compared with normal tissues. In addition, although VEGF receptors were higher in tumors than normal kidney, there was a significant up-regulation of only flt-1 (P = 0.003) but not KDR (P = 0.12) or flt-4 (P = 0.09). There was also a significant correlation between VEGF-C and both of its receptors flt-4 (P = 0.006) and KDR (P = 0.03) but no association between VEGF-B and its receptor flt-1 (P = 0.23). A significant increase was observed in flt-1 (P  less than  0.001), KDR (P = 0.02), and flt-4 (P = 0.01) but not VEGF-B (P = 0.82) or VEGF-C (P = 0.52) expression in clear cell compared with chromophil (papillary) carcinomas. No significant association was demonstrated between VEGF-B, VEGF-C, flt-1, KDR, and flt-4 with patient sex, patient age, or tumor size (P  greater than  0.05). The effect of von Hippel-Lindau (VHL) gene and hypoxia on VEGF-B and VEGF-C expression in the renal carcinoma cell line 786-0 transfected with wild-type and mutant VHL was determined by growing cells under 21% O2- and 0.1% O2. In wild-type VHL cells, whereas VEGF-A was significantly up-regulated under hypoxic compared with normoxic conditions (P  less than  0.001), expression of VEGF-C was reduced (P  less than  0.002). Nevertheless, the repression of VEGF-C was lost in mutant VHL cell lines under hypoxia. In contrast VEGF-B was not regulated by VHL despite clear up-regulation in vivo. These findings strongly support an enhanced role for this pathway in clear cell carcinomas by regulating angiogenesis and/or lymphangiogenesis. The study shows that clear cell tumors are able to up-regulate angiogenic growth factor receptors more efficiently than chromophil (papillary), that clear cell tumors can use pathways independent of VHL to regulate angiogenesis, and that this combined regulation may account for their more aggressive phenotype, which suggests that targeting VEGFR1 (flt-l) may be particularly effective in these tumor types. 
Evaluation of electrical stimulation for ischemic wound therapy: a feasibility study using the lapine wound model. 
 
Chronic wounds are a major secondary complication for many people with impaired mobility. Electrical stimulation (ES) has been recommended as a adjunctive therapy, however optimal treatment paradigms have not been established. Our group seeks to determine the basic mechanisms underlying ES wound therapy, an area where understanding is currently limited. A feasibility study was carried out to develop the Ahn/Mustoe lapine wound model for systematic investigation of the effects of electrical stimulation on ischemic wound therapy. A standardized surgical procedure incorporated a hybrid stimulation system comprising an implantable mini-stimulator and surface electrodes, with creation of repeatable ischemic wounds. Twenty mature male New Zealand white rabbits (3 kg weight) were employed to evaluate the effects of two empirically selected stimulation paradigms applied continuously for 7-21 days, using each animal as its own control. Outcomes measures included transcutaneous blood gas levels, histology, total RNA content and analysis of alpha2 (I) collagen (COL-I), type IV collagen (COL-IV), alpha1 (V) collagen (COL-V), and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) expression using real-time quantitative PCR. All markers for stimulated wounds showed increased activity relative to non-stimulated control wounds between 7 and 14 days following injury, with peak activity at 14 days. By 21 days post-injury, all activity had returned to near baseline level. VEGF and COL-IV levels were found to be significantly higher for pattern A (110 mus pulse width) compared to pattern B (5 mus pulse width) at 14 days, implying that pattern A may be more effective at promoting angiogenesis. All wounds were fully re-epithelialized by 10 days post-injury. Both COL-I and COL-V showed statistically significant (P  less than  0.05) increased activity between day 7 and day 14 for pattern A, potentially indicating a continued effect on matrix remodeling. The early closure of all wounds implies that the rabbit ear model may not be valid for chronic wound studies. 
 
